[Image]

Thank you for downloading this Simon & Schuster ebook.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Get a FREE ebook when you join our mailing list. Plus, get updates on
new releases, deals, recommended reads, and more from Simon & Schuster.
Click below to sign up and see terms and conditions.

CLICK HERE TO SIGN UP

Already a subscriber? Provide your email again so we can register this
ebook and send you more of what you like to read. You will continue to
receive exclusive offers in your inbox.

[images]


Contents

Preface: On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs

Chapter 1

What Is a Bullshit Job?

Why a Mafia Hit Man Is Not a Good Example of a Bullshit Job | On the
Importance of the Subjective Element, and Also, Why It Can Be Assumed
That Those Who Believe They Have Bullshit Jobs Are Generally Correct |
On the Common Misconception That Bullshit Jobs Are Confined Largely to
the Public Sector | Why Hairdressers Are a Poor Example of a Bullshit
Job | On the Difference Between Partly Bullshit Jobs, Mostly Bullshit
Jobs, and Purely and Entirely Bullshit Jobs

Chapter 2

What Sorts of Bullshit Jobs Are There?

The Five Major Varieties of Bullshit Jobs | 1. What Flunkies Do |
2. What Goons Do | 3. What Duct Tapers Do | 4. What Box Tickers Do |
5. What Taskmasters Do | On Complex Multiform Bullshit Jobs | A Word on
Second-Order Bullshit Jobs | A Final Note, with a Brief Return to the
Question: Is It Possible to Have a Bullshit Job and Not Know It?

Chapter 3

Why Do Those in Bullshit Jobs Regularly Report Themselves Unhappy?

(On Spiritual Violence, Part 1)

About One Young Man Apparently Handed a Sinecure Who Nonetheless Found
Himself Unable to Handle the Situation | Concerning the Experience of
Falseness and Purposelessness at the Core of Bullshit Jobs, and the
Importance Now Felt of Conveying the Experience of Falseness and
Purposelessness to Youth | Why Many of Our Fundamental Assumptions on
Human Motivation Appear to Be Incorrect | A Brief Excursus on the
History of Make-Work, and Particularly of the Concept of Buying Other
People’s Time | Concerning the Clash Between the Morality of Time and
Natural Work Rhythms, and the Resentment It Creates

Chapter 4

What Is It Like to Have a Bullshit Job?

(On Spiritual Violence, Part 2)

Why Having a Bullshit Job Is Not Always Necessarily That Bad | On the
Misery of Ambiguity and Forced Pretense | On the Misery of Not Being a
Cause | On the Misery of Not Feeling Entitled to One’s Misery | On the
Misery of Knowing That One Is Doing Harm | Coda: On the Effects of
Bullshit Jobs on Human Creativity, and On Why Attempts to Assert Oneself
Creatively or Politically Against Pointless Employment Might Be
Considered a Form of Spiritual Warfare

Chapter 5

Why Are Bullshit Jobs Proliferating?

A Brief Excursus on Causality and the Nature of Sociological Explanation
| Sundry Notes on the Role of Government in Creating and Maintaining
Bullshit Jobs | Concerning Some False Explanations for the Rise of
Bullshit Jobs | Why the Financial Industry Might Be Considered a
Paradigm for Bullshit Job Creation | On Some Ways in Which the Current
Form of Managerial Feudalism Resembles Classical Feudalism, and Other
Ways in Which It Does Not | How Managerial Feudalism Manifests Itself in
the Creative Industries through an Endless Multiplication of
Intermediary Executive Ranks | Conclusion, with a Brief Return to the
Question of Three Levels of Causation

Chapter 6

Why Do We as a Society Not Object to the Growth of Pointless Employment?

On the Impossibility of Developing an Absolute Measure of Value | How
Most People in Contemporary Society Do Accept the Notion of a Social
Value That Can Be Distinguished from Economic Value, Even If It Is Very
Difficult to Pin Down What It Is | Concerning the Inverse Relationship
Between the Social Value of Work and the Amount of Money One Is Likely
to Be Paid for It | On the Theological Roots of Our Attitudes Toward
Labor | On the Origins of the Northern European Notion of Paid Labor as
Necessary to the Full Formation of an Adult Human Being | How, with the
Advent of Capitalism, Work Came to Be Seen in Many Quarters Either as a
Means of Social Reform or Ultimately as a Virtue in Its Own Right, and
How Laborers Countered by Embracing the Labor Theory of Value |
Concerning the Key Flaw in the Labor Theory of Value as It Became
Popular in the Nineteenth Century, and How the Owners of Capital
Exploited That Flaw | How, over the Course of the Twentieth Century,
Work Came to Be Increasingly Valued Primarily as a Form of Discipline
and Self-Sacrifice

Chapter 7

What Are the Political Effects of Bullshit Jobs, and Is There Anything
That Can Be Done About This Situation?

On How the Political Culture under Managerial Feudalism Comes to Be
Maintained by a Balance of Resentments | How the Current Crisis over
Robotization Relates to the Larger Problem of Bullshit Jobs | On the
Political Ramifications of Bullshitization and Consequent Decline of
Productivity in the Caring Sector as It Relates to the Possibility of a
Revolt of the Caring Classes | On Universal Basic Income as an Example
of a Program That Might Begin to Detach Work from Compensation and Put
an End to the Dilemmas Described in This Book

Acknowledgments

About the Author

Notes

Bibliography

To anyone who would rather be doing something useful with themselves.


Preface:


On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs

In the spring of 2013, I unwittingly set off a very minor international
sensation.

It all began when I was asked to write an essay for a new radical
magazine called Strike! The editor asked if I had anything provocative
that no one else would be likely to publish. I usually have one or two
essay ideas like that stewing around, so I drafted one up and presented
him with a brief piece entitled “On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs.”

The essay was based on a hunch. Everyone is familiar with those sort of
jobs that don’t seem, to the outsider, to really do much of anything: HR
consultants, communications coordinators, PR researchers, financial
strategists, corporate lawyers, or the sort of people (very familiar in
academic contexts) who spend their time staffing committees that discuss
the problem of unnecessary committees. The list was seemingly endless.
What, I wondered, if these jobs really are useless, and those who hold
them are aware of it? Certainly you meet people now and then who seem to
feel their jobs are pointless and unnecessary. Could there be anything
more demoralizing than having to wake up in the morning five out of
seven days of one’s adult life to perform a task that one secretly
believed did not need to be performed—that was simply a waste of time or
resources, or that even made the world worse? Would this not be a
terrible psychic wound running across our society? Yet if so, it was one
that no one ever seemed to talk about. There were plenty of surveys over
whether people were happy at work. There were none, as far as I knew,
about whether or not they felt their jobs had any good reason to exist.

This possibility that our society is riddled with useless jobs that no
one wants to talk about did not seem inherently implausible. The subject
of work is riddled with taboos. Even the fact that most people don’t
like their jobs and would relish an excuse not to go to work is
considered something that can’t really be admitted on TV—certainly not
on the TV news, even if it might occasionally be alluded to in
documentaries and stand-up comedy. I had experienced these taboos
myself: I had once acted as the media liaison for an activist group
that, rumor had it, was planning a civil disobedience campaign to shut
down the Washington, DC, transport system as part of a protest against a
global economic summit. In the days leading up to it, you could hardly
go anywhere looking like an anarchist without some cheerful civil
servant walking up to you and asking whether it was really true he or
she wouldn’t have to go to work on Monday. Yet at the same time, TV
crews managed dutifully to interview city employees—and I wouldn’t be
surprised if some of them were the same city employees—commenting on how
terribly tragic it would be if they wouldn’t be able to get to work,
since they knew that’s what it would take to get them on TV. No one
seems to feel free to say what they really feel about such matters—at
least in public.

It was plausible, but I didn’t really know. In a way, I wrote the piece
as a kind of experiment. I was interested to see what sort of response
it would elicit.

This is what I wrote for the August 2013 issue:

On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs

In the year 1930, John Maynard Keynes predicted that, by century’s end,
technology would have advanced sufficiently that countries like Great
Britain or the United States would have achieved a fifteen-hour work
week. There’s every reason to believe he was right. In technological
terms, we are quite capable of this. And yet it didn’t happen. Instead,
technology has been marshaled, if anything, to figure out ways to make
us all work more. In order to achieve this, jobs have had to be created
that are, effectively, pointless. Huge swathes of people, in Europe and
North America in particular, spend their entire working lives performing
tasks they secretly believe do not really need to be performed. The
moral and spiritual damage that comes from this situation is profound.
It is a scar across our collective soul. Yet virtually no one talks
about it.

Why did Keynes’s promised utopia—still being eagerly awaited in the
sixties—never materialize? The standard line today is that he didn’t
figure in the massive increase in consumerism. Given the choice between
less hours and more toys and pleasures, we’ve collectively chosen the
latter. This presents a nice morality tale, but even a moment’s
reflection shows it can’t really be true. Yes, we have witnessed the
creation of an endless variety of new jobs and industries since the
twenties, but very few have anything to do with the production and
distribution of sushi, iPhones, or fancy sneakers.

So what are these new jobs, precisely? A recent report comparing
employment in the US between 1910 and 2000 gives us a clear picture (and
I note, one pretty much exactly echoed in the UK). Over the course of
the last century, the number of workers employed as domestic servants,
in industry, and in the farm sector has collapsed dramatically. At the
same time, “professional, managerial, clerical, sales, and service
workers” tripled, growing “from one-quarter to three-quarters of total
employment.” In other words, productive jobs have, just as predicted,
been largely automated away. (Even if you count industrial workers
globally, including the toiling masses in India and China, such workers
are still not nearly so large a percentage of the world population as
they used to be.)

But rather than allowing a massive reduction of working hours to free
the world’s population to pursue their own projects, pleasures, visions,
and ideas, we have seen the ballooning not even so much of the “service”
sector as of the administrative sector, up to and including the creation
of whole new industries like financial services or telemarketing, or the
unprecedented expansion of sectors like corporate law, academic and
health administration, human resources, and public relations. And these
numbers do not even reflect all those people whose job is to provide
administrative, technical, or security support for these industries, or,
for that matter, the whole host of ancillary industries (dog washers,
all-night pizza deliverymen) that only exist because everyone else is
spending so much of their time working in all the other ones.

These are what I propose to call “bullshit jobs.”

It’s as if someone were out there making up pointless jobs just for the
sake of keeping us all working. And here, precisely, lies the mystery.
In capitalism, this is precisely what is not supposed to happen. Sure,
in the old inefficient Socialist states like the Soviet Union, where
employment was considered both a right and a sacred duty, the system
made up as many jobs as it had to. (This is why in Soviet department
stores it took three clerks to sell a piece of meat.) But, of course,
this is the very sort of problem market competition is supposed to fix.
According to economic theory, at least, the last thing a profit-seeking
firm is going to do is shell out money to workers they don’t really need
to employ. Still, somehow, it happens.

While corporations may engage in ruthless downsizing, the layoffs and
speed-ups invariably fall on that class of people who are actually
making, moving, fixing, and maintaining things. Through some strange
alchemy no one can quite explain, the number of salaried paper pushers
ultimately seems to expand, and more and more employees find
themselves—not unlike Soviet workers, actually—working forty- or even
fifty-hour weeks on paper but effectively working fifteen hours just as
Keynes predicted, since the rest of their time is spent organizing or
attending motivational seminars, updating their Facebook profiles, or
downloading TV box sets.

The answer clearly isn’t economic: it’s moral and political. The ruling
class has figured out that a happy and productive population with free
time on their hands is a mortal danger. (Think of what started to happen
when this even began to be approximated in the sixties.) And, on the
other hand, the feeling that work is a moral value in itself, and that
anyone not willing to submit themselves to some kind of intense work
discipline for most of their waking hours deserves nothing, is
extraordinarily convenient for them.

Once, when contemplating the apparently endless growth of administrative
responsibilities in British academic departments, I came up with one
possible vision of hell. Hell is a collection of individuals who are
spending the bulk of their time working on a task they don’t like and
are not especially good at. Say they were hired because they were
excellent cabinetmakers, and then discover they are expected to spend a
great deal of their time frying fish. Nor does the task really need to
be done—at least, there’s only a very limited number of fish that need
to be fried. Yet somehow they all become so obsessed with resentment at
the thought that some of their coworkers might be spending more time
making cabinets and not doing their fair share of the fish-frying
responsibilities that before long, there’s endless piles of useless,
badly cooked fish piling up all over the workshop, and it’s all that
anyone really does.

I think this is actually a pretty accurate description of the moral
dynamics of our own economy.

Now, I realize any such argument is going to run into immediate
objections: “Who are you to say what jobs are really ‘necessary’? What’s
‘necessary,’ anyway? You’re an anthropology professor—what’s the ‘need’
for that?” (And, indeed, a lot of tabloid readers would take the
existence of my job as the very definition of wasteful social
expenditure.) And on one level, this is obviously true. There can be no
objective measure of social value.

I would not presume to tell someone who is convinced they are making a
meaningful contribution to the world that, really, they are not. But
what about those people who are themselves convinced their jobs are
meaningless? Not long ago, I got back in touch with a school friend whom
I hadn’t seen since I was fifteen. I was amazed to discover that in the
interim, he had become first a poet, then the front man in an indie rock
band. I’d heard some of his songs on the radio, having no idea the
singer was someone I actually knew. He was obviously brilliant,
innovative, and his work had unquestionably brightened and improved the
lives of people all over the world. Yet, after a couple of unsuccessful
albums, he’d lost his contract, and, plagued with debts and a newborn
daughter, ended up, as he put it, “taking the default choice of so many
directionless folk: law school.” Now he’s a corporate lawyer working in
a prominent New York firm. He was the first to admit that his job was
utterly meaningless, contributed nothing to the world, and, in his own
estimation, should not really exist.

There’s a lot of questions one could ask here, starting with, What does
it say about our society that it seems to generate an extremely limited
demand for talented poet-musicians but an apparently infinite demand for
specialists in corporate law? (Answer: If 1 percent of the population
controls most of the disposable wealth, what we call “the market”
reflects what they think is useful or important, not anybody else.) But
even more, it shows that most people in pointless jobs are ultimately
aware of it. In fact, I’m not sure I’ve ever met a corporate lawyer who
didn’t think their job was bullshit. The same goes for almost all the
new industries outlined above. There is a whole class of salaried
professionals that, should you meet them at parties and admit that you
do something that might be considered interesting (an anthropologist,
for example), will want to avoid even discussing their line of work
entirely. Give them a few drinks, and they will launch into tirades
about how pointless and stupid their job really is.

This is a profound psychological violence here. How can one even begin
to speak of dignity in labor when one secretly feels one’s job should
not exist? How can it not create a sense of deep rage and resentment?
Yet it is the peculiar genius of our society that its rulers have
figured out a way, as in the case of the fish fryers, to ensure that
rage is directed precisely against those who actually do get to do
meaningful work. For instance: in our society, there seems to be a
general rule that, the more obviously one’s work benefits other people,
the less one is likely to be paid for it. Again, an objective measure is
hard to find, but one easy way to get a sense is to ask: What would
happen were this entire class of people to simply disappear? Say what
you like about nurses, garbage collectors, or mechanics, it’s obvious
that were they to vanish in a puff of smoke, the results would be
immediate and catastrophic. A world without teachers or dockworkers
would soon be in trouble, and even one without science-fiction writers
or ska musicians would clearly be a lesser place. It’s not entirely
clear how humanity would suffer were all private equity CEOs, lobbyists,
PR researchers, actuaries, telemarketers, bailiffs, or legal consultants
to similarly vanish.¹ (Many suspect it might improve markedly.) Yet
apart from a handful of well-touted exceptions (doctors), the rule holds
surprisingly well.

Even more perverse, there seems to be a broad sense that this is the way
things should be. This is one of the secret strengths of right-wing
populism. You can see it when tabloids whip up resentment against tube
workers for paralyzing London during contract disputes: the very fact
that tube workers can paralyze London shows that their work is actually
necessary, but this seems to be precisely what annoys people. It’s even
clearer in the United States, where Republicans have had remarkable
success mobilizing resentment against schoolteachers and autoworkers
(and not, significantly, against the school administrators or auto
industry executives who actually cause the problems) for their
supposedly bloated wages and benefits. It’s as if they are being told
“But you get to teach children! Or make cars! You get to have real jobs!
And on top of that, you have the nerve to also expect middle-class
pensions and health care?”

If someone had designed a work regime perfectly suited to maintaining
the power of finance capital, it’s hard to see how he or she could have
done a better job. Real, productive workers are relentlessly squeezed
and exploited. The remainder are divided between a terrorized stratum of
the universally reviled unemployed and a larger stratum who are
basically paid to do nothing, in positions designed to make them
identify with the perspectives and sensibilities of the ruling class
(managers, administrators, etc.)—and particularly its financial
avatars—but, at the same time, foster a simmering resentment against
anyone whose work has clear and undeniable social value. Clearly, the
system was never consciously designed. It emerged from almost a century
of trial and error. But it is the only explanation for why, despite our
technological capacities, we are not all working three- to four-hour
days.

If ever an essay’s hypothesis was confirmed by its reception, this was
it. “On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs” produced an explosion.

The irony was that the two weeks after the piece came out were the same
two weeks that my partner and I had decided to spend with a basket of
books, and each other, in a cabin in rural Quebec. We’d made a point of
finding a location with no wireless. This left me in the awkward
position of having to observe the results only on my mobile phone. The
essay went viral almost immediately. Within weeks, it had been
translated into at least a dozen languages, including German, Norwegian,
Swedish, French, Czech, Romanian, Russian, Turkish, Latvian, Polish,
Greek, Estonian, Catalan, and Korean, and was reprinted in newspapers
from Switzerland to Australia. The original Strike! page received more
than a million hits and crashed repeatedly from too much traffic. Blogs
sprouted. Comments sections filled up with confessions from white-collar
professionals; people wrote me asking for guidance or to tell me I had
inspired them to quit their jobs to find something more meaningful. Here
is one enthusiastic response (I’ve collected hundreds) from the comments
section of Australia’s Canberra Times:

Wow! Nail on the head! I am a corporate lawyer (tax litigator, to be
specific). I contribute nothing to this world and am utterly miserable
all of the time. I don’t like it when people have the nerve to say “Why
do it, then?” because it is so clearly not that simple. It so happens to
be the only way right now for me to contribute to the 1 percent in such
a significant way so as to reward me with a house in Sydney to raise my
future kids . . . Thanks to technology, we are probably as productive in
two days as we previously were in five. But thanks to greed and some
busy-bee syndrome of productivity, we are still asked to slave away for
the profit of others ahead of our own nonremunerated ambitions. Whether
you believe in intelligent design or evolution, humans were not made to
work—so to me, this is all just greed propped up by inflated prices of
necessities.²

At one point, I got a message from one anonymous fan who said that he
was part of an impromptu group circulating the piece within the
financial services community; he’d received five emails containing the
essay just that day (certainly one sign that many in financial services
don’t have much to do). None of this answered the question of how many
people really felt that way about their jobs—as opposed to, say, passing
on the piece as a way to drop subtle hints to others—but before long,
statistical evidence did indeed surface.

On January 5, 2015, a little more than a year after the article came
out, on the first Monday of the new year—that is, the day most Londoners
were returning to work from their winter holidays—someone took several
hundred ads in London Underground cars and replaced them with a series
of guerrilla posters consisting of quotes from the original essay. These
were the ones they chose:

• Huge swathes of people spend their days performing tasks they secretly
believe do not really need to be performed.

• It’s as if someone were out there making up pointless jobs for the
sake of keeping us all working.

• The moral and spiritual damage that comes from this situation is
profound. It is a scar across our collective soul. Yet virtually no one
talks about it.

• How can one even begin to speak of dignity in labor when one secretly
feels one’s job should not exist?

The response to the poster campaign was another spate of discussion in
the media (I appeared briefly on Russia Today), as a result of which the
polling agency YouGov took it upon itself to test the hypothesis and
conducted a poll of Britons using language taken directly from the
essay: for example, Does your job “make a meaningful contribution to the
world”? Astonishingly, more than a third—37 percent—said they believed
that it did not (whereas 50 percent said it did, and 13 percent were
uncertain).

This was almost twice what I had anticipated—I’d imagined the percentage
of bullshit jobs was probably around 20 percent. What’s more, a later
poll in Holland came up with almost exactly the same results: in fact, a
little higher, as 40 percent of Dutch workers reported that their jobs
had no good reason to exist.

So not only has the hypothesis been confirmed by public reaction, it has
now been overwhelmingly confirmed by statistical research.

•  •  •

Clearly, then, we have an important social phenomenon that has received
almost no systematic attention.³ Simply opening up a way to talk about
it became, for many, cathartic. It was obvious that a larger exploration
was in order.

What I want to do here is a bit more systematic than the original essay.
The 2013 piece was for a magazine about revolutionary politics, and it
emphasized the political implications of the problem. In fact, the essay
was just one of a series of arguments I was developing at the time that
the neoliberal (“free market”) ideology that had dominated the world
since the days of Thatcher and Reagan was really the opposite of what it
claimed to be; it was really a political project dressed up as an
economic one.

I had come to this conclusion because it seemed to be the only way to
explain how those in power actually behaved. While neoliberal rhetoric
was always all about unleashing the magic of the marketplace and placing
economic efficiency over all other values, the overall effect of free
market policies has been that rates of economic growth have slowed
pretty much everywhere except India and China; scientific and
technological advance has stagnated; and in most wealthy countries, the
younger generations can, for the first time in centuries, expect to lead
less prosperous lives than their parents did. Yet on observing these
effects, proponents of market ideology always reply with calls for even
stronger doses of the same medicine, and politicians duly enact them.
This struck me as odd. If a private company hired a consultant to come
up with a business plan, and it resulted in a sharp decline in profits,
that consultant would be fired. At the very least, he’d be asked to come
up with a different plan. With free market reforms, this never seemed to
happen. The more they failed, the more they were enacted. The only
logical conclusion was that economic imperatives weren’t really driving
the project.

What was? It seemed to me the answer had to lie in the mind-set of the
political class. Almost all of those making the key decisions had
attended college in the 1960s, when campuses were at the very epicenter
of political ferment, and they felt strongly that such things must never
happen again. As a result, while they might have been concerned with
declining economic indicators, they were also quite delighted to note
that the combination of globalization, gutting the power of unions, and
creating an insecure and overworked workforce—along with aggressively
paying lip service to sixties calls to hedonistic personal liberation
(what came to be known as “lifestyle liberalism, fiscal
conservativism”)—had the effect of simultaneously shifting more and more
wealth and power to the wealthy and almost completely destroying the
basis for organized challenges to their power. It might not have worked
very well economically, but politically it worked like a dream. If
nothing else, they had little incentive to abandon such policies. All I
did in the essay was to pursue this insight: whenever you find someone
doing something in the name of economic efficiency that seems completely
economically irrational (like, say, paying people good money to do
nothing all day), one had best start by asking, as the ancient Romans
did, “Qui bono?”—“Who benefits?”—and how.

This is less a conspiracy theory approach than it is an anticonspiracy
theory. I was asking why action wasn’t taken. Economic trends happen for
all sorts of reasons, but if they cause problems for the rich and
powerful, those rich and powerful people will pressure institutions to
step in and do something about the matter. This is why after the
financial crisis of 2008–09, large investment banks were bailed out but
ordinary mortgage holders weren’t. The proliferation of bullshit jobs,
as we’ll see, happened for a variety of reasons. The real question I was
asking is why no one intervened (“conspired,” if you like) to do
something about the matter.

•  •  •

In this book I want to do considerably more than that.

I believe that the phenomenon of bullshit employment can provide us with
a window on much deeper social problems. We need to ask ourselves, not
just how did such a large proportion of our workforce find themselves
laboring at tasks that they themselves consider pointless, but also why
do so many people believe this state of affairs to be normal,
inevitable—even desirable? More oddly still, why, despite the fact that
they hold these opinions in the abstract, and even believe that it is
entirely appropriate that those who labor at pointless jobs should be
paid more and receive more honor and recognition than those who do
something they consider to be useful, do they nonetheless find
themselves depressed and miserable if they themselves end up in
positions where they are being paid to do nothing, or nothing that they
feel benefits others in any way? There is clearly a jumble of
contradictory ideas and impulses at play here. One thing I want to do in
this book is begin to sort them out. This will mean asking practical
questions such as: How do bullshit jobs actually happen? It will also
mean asking deep historical questions, like, When and how did we come to
believe that creativity was supposed to be painful, or, how did we ever
come up with the notion that it would be possible to sell one’s time?
And finally, it will mean asking fundamental questions about human
nature.

Writing this book also serves a political purpose.

I would like this book to be an arrow aimed at the heart of our
civilization. There is something very wrong with what we have made
ourselves. We have become a civilization based on work—not even
“productive work” but work as an end and meaning in itself. We have come
to believe that men and women who do not work harder than they wish at
jobs they do not particularly enjoy are bad people unworthy of love,
care, or assistance from their communities. It is as if we have
collectively acquiesced to our own enslavement. The main political
reaction to our awareness that half the time we are engaged in utterly
meaningless or even counterproductive activities—usually under the
orders of a person we dislike—is to rankle with resentment over the fact
there might be others out there who are not in the same trap. As a
result, hatred, resentment, and suspicion have become the glue that
holds society together. This is a disastrous state of affairs. I wish it
to end.

If this book can in any way contribute to that end, it will have been
worth writing.


Chapter 1


What Is a Bullshit Job?

Let us begin with what might be considered a paradigmatic example of a
bullshit job.

Kurt works for a subcontractor for the German military. Or . . .
actually, he is employed by a subcontractor of a subcontractor of a
subcontractor for the German military. Here is how he describes his
work:

The German military has a subcontractor that does their IT work.

The IT firm has a subcontractor that does their logistics.

The logistics firm has a subcontractor that does their personnel
management, and I work for that company.

Let’s say soldier A moves to an office two rooms farther down the hall.
Instead of just carrying his computer over there, he has to fill out a
form.

The IT subcontractor will get the form, people will read it and approve
it, and forward it to the logistics firm.

The logistics firm will then have to approve the moving down the hall
and will request personnel from us.

The office people in my company will then do whatever they do, and now I
come in.

I get an email: “Be at barracks B at time C.” Usually these barracks are
one hundred to five hundred kilometers [62–310 miles] away from my home,
so I will get a rental car. I take the rental car, drive to the
barracks, let dispatch know that I arrived, fill out a form, unhook the
computer, load the computer into a box, seal the box, have a guy from
the logistics firm carry the box to the next room, where I unseal the
box, fill out another form, hook up the computer, call dispatch to tell
them how long I took, get a couple of signatures, take my rental car
back home, send dispatch a letter with all of the paperwork and then get
paid.

So instead of the soldier carrying his computer for five meters, two
people drive for a combined six to ten hours, fill out around fifteen
pages of paperwork, and waste a good four hundred euros of taxpayers’
money.¹

This might sound like a classic example of ridiculous military red tape
of the sort Joseph Heller made famous in his 1961 novel Catch-22, except
for one key element: almost nobody in this story actually works for the
military. Technically, they’re all part of the private sector. There was
a time, of course, when any national army also had its own
communications, logistics, and personnel departments, but nowadays it
all has to be done through multiple layers of private outsourcing.

Kurt’s job might be considered a paradigmatic example of a bullshit job
for one simple reason: if the position were eliminated, it would make no
discernible difference in the world. Likely as not, things would
improve, since German military bases would presumably have to come up
with a more reasonable way to move equipment. Crucially, not only is
Kurt’s job absurd, but Kurt himself is perfectly well aware of this. (In
fact, on the blog where he posted this story, he ended up defending the
claim that the job served no purpose against a host of free market
enthusiasts who popped up instantly—as free market enthusiasts tend to
do on internet forums—to insist that since his job was created by the
private sector, it by definition had to serve a legitimate purpose.)

This I consider the defining feature of a bullshit job: one so
completely pointless that even the person who has to perform it every
day cannot convince himself there’s a good reason for him to be doing
it. He might not be able to admit this to his coworkers—often there are
very good reasons not to do so. But he is convinced the job is pointless
nonetheless.

So let this stand as an initial provisional definition:

Provisional Definition: a bullshit job is a form of employment that is
so completely pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious that even the
employee cannot justify its existence.

Some jobs are so pointless that no one even notices if the person who
has the job vanishes. This usually happens in the public sector:

Spanish Civil Servant Skips Work for Six Years to Study Spinoza

—Jewish Times, February 26, 2016

A Spanish civil servant who collected a salary for at least six years
without working used the time to become an expert on the writings of
Jewish philosopher Baruch Spinoza, Spanish media reported.

A court in Cadiz in southern Spain last month ordered Joaquin Garcia,
sixty-nine, to pay approximately $30,000 in fines for failing to show up
for work at the water board, Agua de Cadiz, where Garcia was employed as
an engineer since 1996, the news site euronews.com reported last week.

His absence was first noticed in 2010, when Garcia was due to receive a
medal for long service. Deputy Mayor Jorge Blas Fernandez began making
inquiries that led him to discover that Garcia had not been seen at his
office in six years.

Reached by the newspaper El Mundo, unnamed sources close to Garcia said
he devoted himself in the years before 2010 to studying the writings of
Spinoza, a seventeenth-century heretic Jew from Amsterdam. One source
interviewed by El Mundo said Garcia became an expert on Spinoza but
denied claims Garcia never showed up for work, saying he came in at
irregular times.²

This story made headlines in Spain. At a time when the country was
undergoing severe austerity and high unemployment, it seemed outrageous
that there were civil servants who could skip work for years without
anybody noticing. Garcia’s defense, however, is not without merit. He
explained that while he had worked for many years dutifully monitoring
the city’s water treatment plant, the water board eventually came under
the control of higher-ups who loathed him for his Socialist politics and
refused to assign him any responsibilities. He found this situation so
demoralizing that he was eventually obliged to seek clinical help for
depression. Finally, and with the concurrence of his therapist, he
decided that rather than just continue to sit around all day pretending
to look busy, he would convince the water board he was being supervised
by the municipality, and the municipality that he was being supervised
by the water board, check in if there was a problem, but otherwise just
go home and do something useful with his life.³

Similar stories about the public sector appear at regular intervals. One
popular one is about postal carriers who decide that rather than
delivering the mail, they prefer to dump it in closets, sheds, or
Dumpsters—with the result that tons of letters and packages pile up for
years without anyone figuring it out.⁴ David Foster Wallace’s novel The
Pale King, about life inside an Internal Revenue Service office in
Peoria, Illinois, goes even further: it culminates in an auditor dying
at his desk and remaining propped in his chair for days before anyone
notices. This seems pure absurdist caricature, but in 2002, something
almost exactly like this did happen in Helsinki. A Finnish tax auditor
working in a closed office sat dead at his desk for more than
forty-eight hours while thirty colleagues carried on around him. “People
thought he wanted to work in peace, and no one disturbed him,” remarked
his supervisor—which, if you think about it, is actually rather
thoughtful.⁵

It’s stories like these, of course, that inspire politicians all over
the world to call for a larger role for the private sector—where, it is
always claimed, such abuses would not occur. And while it is true so far
that we have not heard any stories of FedEx or UPS employees stowing
their parcels in garden sheds, privatization generates its own, often
much less genteel, varieties of madness—as Kurt’s story shows. I need
hardly point out the irony in the fact that Kurt was, ultimately,
working for the German military. The German military has been accused of
many things over the years, but inefficiency was rarely one of them.
Still, a rising tide of bullshit soils all boats. In the twenty-first
century, even panzer divisions have come to be surrounded by a vast
penumbra of sub-, sub-sub-, and sub-sub-subcontractors; tank commanders
are obliged to perform complex and exotic bureaucratic rituals in order
to move equipment from one room to another, even as those providing the
paperwork secretly post elaborate complaints to blogs about how idiotic
the whole thing is.

If these cases are anything to go by, the main difference between the
public and private sectors is not that either is more, or less, likely
to generate pointless work. It does not even necessarily lie in the kind
of pointless work each tends to generate. The main difference is that
pointless work in the private sector is likely to be far more closely
supervised. This is not always the case. As we’ll learn, the number of
employees of banks, pharmaceutical companies, and engineering firms
allowed to spend most of their time updating their Facebook profiles is
surprisingly high. Still, in the private sector, there are limits. If
Kurt were to simply walk off the job to take up the study of his
favorite seventeenth-century Jewish philosopher, he would be swiftly
relieved of his position. If the Cadiz Water Board had been privatized,
Joaquin Garcia might well still have been deprived of responsibilities
by managers who disliked him, but he would have been expected to sit at
his desk and pretend to work every day anyway, or find alternate
employment.

I will leave readers to decide for themselves whether such a state of
affairs should be considered an improvement.

why a mafia hit man is not a good example of a bullshit job

To recap: what I am calling “bullshit jobs” are jobs that are primarily
or entirely made up of tasks that the person doing that job considers to
be pointless, unnecessary, or even pernicious. Jobs that, were they to
disappear, would make no difference whatsoever. Above all, these are
jobs that the holders themselves feel should not exist.

Contemporary capitalism seems riddled with such jobs. As I mentioned in
the preface, a YouGov poll found that in the United Kingdom only 50
percent of those who had full-time jobs were entirely sure their job
made any sort of meaningful contribution to the world, and 37 percent
were quite sure it did not. A poll by the firm Schouten & Nelissen
carried out in Holland put the latter number as high as 40 percent.⁶ If
you think about it, these are staggering statistics. After all, a very
large percentage of jobs involves doing things that no one could
possibly see as pointless. One must assume that the percentage of
nurses, bus drivers, dentists, street cleaners, farmers, music teachers,
repairmen, gardeners, firefighters, set designers, plumbers,
journalists, safety inspectors, musicians, tailors, and school crossing
guards who checked “no” to the question “Does your job make any
meaningful difference in the world?” was approximately zero. My own
research suggests that store clerks, restaurant workers, and other
low-level service providers rarely see themselves as having bullshit
jobs, either. Many service workers hate their jobs; but even those who
do are aware that what they do does make some sort of meaningful
difference in the world.⁷

So if 37 percent to 40 percent of a country’s working population insist
their work makes no difference whatsoever, and another substantial chunk
suspects that it might not, one can only conclude that any office worker
who one might suspect secretly believes themselves to have a bullshit
job does, indeed, believe this.

•  •  •

The main thing I would like to do in this first chapter is to define
what I mean by bullshit jobs; in the next chapter I will lay out a
typology of what I believe the main varieties of bullshit jobs to be.
This will open the way, in later chapters, to considering how bullshit
jobs come about, why they have come to be so prevalent, and to
considering their psychological, social, and political effects. I am
convinced these effects are deeply insidious. We have created societies
where much of the population, trapped in useless employment, have come
to resent and despise equally those who do the most useful work in
society, and those who do no paid work at all. But before we can analyze
this situation, it will be necessary to address some potential
objections.

The reader may have noticed a certain ambiguity in my initial
definition. I describe bullshit jobs as involving tasks the holder
considers to be “pointless, unnecessary, or even pernicious.” But, of
course, jobs that have no significant effect on the world and jobs that
have pernicious effects on the world are hardly the same thing. Most of
us would agree that a Mafia hit man does more harm than good in the
world, overall; but could you really call Mafia hit man a bullshit job?
That just feels somehow wrong.

As Socrates teaches us, when this happens—when our own definitions
produce results that seem intuitively wrong to us—it’s because we’re not
aware of what we really think. (Hence, he suggests that the true role of
philosophers is to tell people what they already know but don’t realize
that they know. One could argue that anthropologists like myself do
something similar.) The phrase “bullshit jobs” clearly strikes a chord
with many people. It makes sense to them in some way. This means they
have, at least on some sort of tacit intuitive level, criteria in their
minds that allow them to say “That was such a bullshit job” or “That one
was bad, but I wouldn’t say it was exactly bullshit.” Many people with
pernicious jobs feel the phrase fits them; others clearly don’t. The
best way to tease out what those criteria are is to examine borderline
cases.

So, why does it feel wrong to say a hit man has a bullshit job?⁸

I suspect there are multiple reasons, but one is that the Mafia hit man
(unlike, say, a foreign currency speculator or a brand marketing
researcher) is unlikely to make false claims. True, a mafioso will
usually claim he is merely a “businessman.” But insofar as he is willing
to own up to the nature of his actual occupation at all, he will tend to
be pretty up front about what he does. He is unlikely to pretend his
work is in any way beneficial to society, even to the extent of
insisting it contributes to the success of a team that’s providing some
useful product or service (drugs, prostitution, and so on), or if he
does, the pretense is likely to be paper thin.

This allows us to refine our definition. Bullshit jobs are not just jobs
that are useless or pernicious; typically, there has to be some degree
of pretense and fraud involved as well. The jobholder must feel obliged
to pretend that there is, in fact, a good reason why her job exists,
even if, privately, she finds such claims ridiculous. There has to be
some kind of gap between pretense and reality. (This makes sense
etymologically⁹: “bullshitting” is, after all, a form of dishonesty.¹⁰)

So we might make a second pass:

Provisional Definition 2: a bullshit job is a form of employment that is
so completely pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious that even the
employee cannot justify its existence even though the employee feels
obliged to pretend that this is not the case.

Of course, there is another reason why hit man should not be considered
a bullshit job. The hit man is not personally convinced his job should
not exist. Most mafiosi believe they are part of an ancient and
honorable tradition that is a value in its own right, whether or not it
contributes to the larger social good. This is, incidentally, the reason
why “feudal overlord” is not a bullshit job, either. Kings, earls,
emperors, pashas, emirs, squires, zamindars, landlords, and the like
might, arguably, be useless people; many of us would insist (and I would
be inclined to agree) that they play pernicious roles in human affairs.
But they don’t think so. So unless the king is secretly a Marxist, or a
Republican, one can say confidently that “king” is not a bullshit job.

This is a useful point to bear in mind because most people who do a
great deal of harm in the world are protected against the knowledge that
they do so. Or they allow themselves to believe the endless accretion of
paid flunkies and yes-men that inevitably assemble around them to come
up with reasons why they are really doing good. (Nowadays, these are
sometimes referred to as think tanks.) This is just as true of
financial-speculating investment bank CEOs as it is of military
strongmen in countries such as North Korea and Azerbaijan. Mafiosi
families are unusual perhaps because they make few such pretensions—but
in the end, they are just miniature, illicit versions of the same feudal
tradition, being originally enforcers for local landlords in Sicily who
have over time come to operate on their own hook.¹¹

There is one final reason why hit man cannot be considered a bullshit
job: it’s not entirely clear that hit man is a “job” in the first place.
True, the hit man might well be employed by the local crime boss in some
capacity or other. Perhaps the crime boss makes up some dummy security
job for him in his casino. In that case, we can definitely say that job
is a bullshit job. But he is not receiving a paycheck in his capacity as
a hit man.

•  •  •

This point allows us to refine our definition even further. When people
speak of bullshit jobs, they are generally referring to employment that
involves being paid to work for someone else, either on a waged or
salaried basis (most would also include paid consultancies). Obviously,
there are many self-employed people who manage to get money from others
by means of falsely pretending to provide them with some benefit or
service (normally we call them grifters, scam artists, charlatans, or
frauds), just as there are self-employed people who get money off others
by doing or threatening to do them harm (normally we refer to them as
muggers, burglars, extortionists, or thieves). In the first case, at
least, we can definitely speak of bullshit, but not of bullshit jobs,
because these aren’t “jobs,” properly speaking. A con job is an act, not
a profession. So is a Brink’s job. People do sometimes speak of
professional burglars, but this is just a way of saying that theft is
the burglar’s primary source of income.¹² No one is actually paying the
burglar regular wages or a salary to break into people’s homes. For this
reason, one cannot say that burglar is, precisely, a job, either.¹³

These considerations allow us to formulate what I think can serve as a
final working definition:

Final Working Definition: a bullshit job is a form of paid employment
that is so completely pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious that even
the employee cannot justify its existence even though, as part of the
conditions of employment, the employee feels obliged to pretend that
this is not the case.

on the importance of the subjective element, and also, why it can be assumed that those who believe they have bullshit jobs are generally correct

This, I think, is a serviceable definition; good enough, anyway, for the
purposes of this book.

The attentive reader may have noticed one remaining ambiguity. The
definition is mainly subjective. I define a bullshit job as one that the
worker considers to be pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious—but I also
suggest that the worker is correct.¹⁴ I’m assuming there is an
underlying reality here. One really has to make this assumption because
otherwise we’d be stuck with accepting that the exact same job could be
bullshit one day and nonbullshit the next, depending on the vagaries of
some fickle worker’s mood. All I’m really saying here is that since
there is such a thing as social value, as apart from mere market value,
but since no one has ever figured out an adequate way to measure it, the
worker’s perspective is about as close as one is likely to get to an
accurate assessment of the situation.¹⁵

Often it’s pretty obvious why this should be the case: if an office
worker is really spending 80 percent of her time designing cat memes,
her coworkers in the next cubicle may or may not be aware of what’s
going on, but there’s no way that she is going to be under any illusions
about what she’s doing. But even in more complicated cases, where it’s a
question of how much the worker really contributes to an organization, I
think it’s safe to assume the worker knows best. I’m aware this position
will be taken as controversial in certain quarters. Executives and other
bigwigs will often insist that most people who work for a large
corporation don’t fully understand their contributions, since the big
picture can be seen only from the top. I am not saying this is entirely
untrue: frequently there are some parts of the larger context that
lower-level workers cannot see or simply aren’t told about. This is
especially true if the company is up to anything illegal.¹⁶ But it’s
been my experience that any underling who works for the same outfit for
any length of time—say, a year or two—will normally be taken aside and
let in on the company secrets.

True, there are exceptions. Sometimes managers intentionally break up
tasks in such a way that the workers don’t really understand how their
efforts contribute to the overall enterprise. Banks will often do this.
I’ve even heard examples of factories in America where many of the line
workers were unaware of what the plant was actually making; though in
such cases, it almost always turned out to be because the owners had
intentionally hired people who didn’t speak English. Still, in those
cases, workers tend to assume that their jobs are useful; they just
don’t know how. Generally speaking, I think employees can be expected to
know what’s going on in an office or on a shop floor, and, certainly, to
understand how their work does, or does not, contribute to the
enterprise—at least, better than anybody else.¹⁷ With the higher-ups,
that’s not always clear. One frequent theme I encountered in my research
was of underlings wondering in effect, “Does my supervisor actually know
that I spend eighty percent of my time designing cat memes? Are they
just pretending not to notice, or are they actually unaware?” And since
the higher up the chain of command you are, the more reason people have
to hide things from you, the worse this situation tends to become.

The real sticky problem comes in when it’s a question of whether certain
kinds of work (say, telemarketing, market research, consulting) are
bullshit—that is, whether they can be said to produce any sort of
positive social value. Here, all I’m saying is that it’s best to defer
to the judgment of those who do that kind of work. Social value, after
all, is largely just what people think it is. In which case, who else is
in a better position to judge? In this instance, I’d say: if the
preponderance of those engaged in a certain occupation privately believe
their work is of no social value, one should proceed along the
assumption they are right.¹⁸

Sticklers will no doubt raise objections here too. They might ask: How
can one actually know for sure what the majority of people working in an
industry secretly think? And the answer is that obviously, you can’t.
Even if it were possible to conduct a poll of lobbyists or financial
consultants, it’s not clear how many would give honest answers. When I
spoke in broad strokes about useless industries in the original essay, I
did so on the assumption that lobbyists and financial consultants are,
in fact, largely aware of their uselessness—indeed, that many if not
most of them are haunted by the knowledge that nothing of value would be
lost to the world were their jobs simply to disappear.

I could be wrong. It is possible that corporate lobbyists or financial
consultants genuinely subscribe to a theory of social value that holds
their work to be essential to the health and prosperity of the nation.
It is possible they therefore sleep securely in their beds, confident
that their work is a blessing for everyone around them. I don’t know,
but I suspect this is more likely to be true as one moves up the food
chain, since it would appear to be a general truth that the more harm a
category of powerful people do in the world, the more yes-men and
propagandists will tend to accumulate around them, coming up with
reasons why they are really doing good—and the more likely it is that at
least some of those powerful people will believe them.¹⁹ Corporate
lobbyists and financial consultants certainly do seem responsible for a
disproportionately large share of the harm done in the world (at least,
harm carried out as part of one’s professional duties). Perhaps they
really do have to force themselves to believe in what they do.

In that case, finance and lobbying wouldn’t be bullshit jobs at all;
they’d actually be more like hit men. At the very, very top of the food
chain, this does appear to be the case. I remarked in the original 2013
piece, for instance, that I’d never known a corporate lawyer who didn’t
think his or her job was bullshit. But, of course, that’s also a
reflection of the sort of corporate lawyers that I’m likely to know: the
sort who used to be poet-musicians. But even more significantly: the
sort who are not particularly high ranking. It’s my impression that
genuinely powerful corporate lawyers think their roles are entirely
legitimate. Or perhaps they simply don’t care whether they’re doing good
or harm.

At the very top of the financial food chain, that’s certainly the case.
In April 2013, by a strange coincidence, I happened to be present at a
conference on “Fixing the Banking System for Good” held inside the
Philadelphia Federal Reserve, where Jeffrey Sachs, the Columbia
University economist most famous for having designed the “shock therapy”
reforms applied to the former Soviet Union, had a live-on-video-link
session in which he startled everyone by presenting what careful
journalists might describe as an “unusually candid” assessment of those
in charge of America’s financial institutions. Sachs’s testimony is
especially valuable because, as he kept emphasizing, many of these
people were quite up front with him because they assumed (not entirely
without reason) that he was on their side:

Look, I meet a lot of these people on Wall Street on a regular basis
right now . . . I know them. These are the people I have lunch with. And
I am going to put it very bluntly: I regard the moral environment as
pathological. [These people] have no responsibility to pay taxes; they
have no responsibility to their clients; they have no responsibility to
counterparties in transactions. They are tough, greedy, aggressive, and
feel absolutely out of control in a quite literal sense, and they have
gamed the system to a remarkable extent. They genuinely believe they
have a God-given right to take as much money as they possibly can in any
way that they can get it, legal or otherwise.

If you look at the campaign contributions, which I happened to do
yesterday for another purpose, the financial markets are the number one
campaign contributors in the US system now. We have a corrupt politics
to the core . . . both parties are up to their necks in this.

But what it’s led to is this sense of impunity that is really stunning,
and you feel it on the individual level right now. And it’s very, very
unhealthy, I have waited for four years . . . five years now to see one
figure on Wall Street speak in a moral language. And I’ve have not seen
it once.²⁰

So there you have it. If Sachs was right—and honestly, who is in a
better position to know?—then at the commanding heights of the financial
system, we’re not actually talking about bullshit jobs. We’re not even
talking about people who have come to believe their own propagandists.
Really we’re just talking about a bunch of crooks.

Another distinction that’s important to bear in mind is between jobs
that are pointless and jobs that are merely bad. I will refer to the
latter as “shit jobs,” since people often do.

The only reason I bring up the matter is because the two are so often
confused—which is odd, because they’re in no way similar. In fact, they
might almost be considered opposites. Bullshit jobs often pay quite well
and tend to offer excellent working conditions. They’re just pointless.
Shit jobs are usually not at all bullshit; they typically involve work
that needs to be done and is clearly of benefit to society; it’s just
that the workers who do them are paid and treated badly.

Some jobs, of course, are intrinsically unpleasant but fulfilling in
other ways. (There’s an old joke about the man whose job it was to clean
up elephant dung after the circus. No matter what he did, he couldn’t
get the smell off his body. He’d change his clothes, wash his hair,
scrub himself endlessly, but he still reeked, and women tended to avoid
him. An old friend finally asked him, “Why do you do this to yourself?
There are so many other jobs you could do.” The man answered, “What? And
give up show business!?”) These jobs can be considered neither shit nor
bullshit, whatever the content of the work. Other jobs—ordinary
cleaning, for example—are in no sense inherently degrading, but they can
easily be made so.

The cleaners at my current university, for instance, are treated very
badly. As in most universities these days, their work has been
outsourced. They are employed not directly by the school but by an
agency, the name of which is emblazoned on the purple uniforms they
wear. They are paid little, obliged to work with dangerous chemicals
that often damage their hands or otherwise force them to have to take
time off to recover (for which time they are not compensated), and
generally treated with arbitrariness and disrespect. There is no
particular reason that cleaners have to be treated in such an abusive
fashion. But at the very least, they take some pride in knowing—and, in
fact, I can attest, for the most part do take pride in knowing—that
buildings do need to be cleaned, and, therefore, without them, the
business of the university could not go on.²¹

Shit jobs tend to be blue collar and pay by the hour, whereas bullshit
jobs tend to be white collar and salaried. Those who work shit jobs tend
to be the object of indignities; they not only work hard but also are
held in low esteem for that very reason. But at least they know they’re
doing something useful. Those who work bullshit jobs are often
surrounded by honor and prestige; they are respected as professionals,
well paid, and treated as high achievers—as the sort of people who can
be justly proud of what they do. Yet secretly they are aware that they
have achieved nothing; they feel they have done nothing to earn the
consumer toys with which they fill their lives; they feel it’s all based
on a lie—as, indeed, it is.

These are two profoundly different forms of oppression. I certainly
wouldn’t want to equate them; few people I know would trade in a
pointless middle-management position for a job as a ditchdigger, even if
they knew that the ditches really did need to be dug. (I do know people
who quit such jobs to become cleaners, though, and are quite happy that
they did.) All I wish to emphasize here is that each is indeed
oppressive in its own way.²²

It is also theoretically possible to have a job that is both shit and
bullshit. I think it’s fair to say that if one is trying to imagine the
worst type of job one could possibly have, it would have to be some kind
of combination of the two. Once, while serving time in exile at a
Siberian prison camp, Dostoyevsky developed the theory that the worst
torture one could possibly devise would be to force someone to endlessly
perform an obviously pointless task. Even though convicts sent to
Siberia had theoretically been sentenced to “hard labor,” he observed,
the work wasn’t actually all that hard. Most peasants worked far harder.
But peasants were working at least partly for themselves. In prison
camps, the “hardness” of the labor was the fact that the laborer got
nothing out of it:

It once came into my head that if it were desired to reduce a man to
nothing—to punish him atrociously, to crush him in such a manner that
the most hardened murderer would tremble before such a punishment, and
take fright beforehand—it would only be necessary to give to his work a
character of complete uselessness, even to absurdity.

Hard labor, as it is now carried on, presents no interest to the
convict; but it has its utility. The convict makes bricks, digs the
earth, builds; and all his occupations have a meaning and an end.
Sometimes the prisoner may even take an interest in what he is doing. He
then wishes to work more skillfully, more advantageously. But let him be
constrained to pour water from one vessel into another, to pound sand,
to move a heap of earth from one place to another, and then immediately
move it back again, then I am persuaded that at the end of a few days,
the prisoner would hang himself or commit a thousand capital crimes,
preferring rather to die than endure such humiliation, shame, and
torture.²³

on the common misconception that bullshit jobs are confined largely to the public sector

So far, we have established three broad categories of jobs: useful jobs
(which may or may not be shit jobs), bullshit jobs, and a small but ugly
penumbra of jobs such as gangsters, slumlords, top corporate lawyers, or
hedge fund CEOs, made up of people who are basically just selfish
bastards and don’t really pretend to be anything else.²⁴ In each case, I
think it’s fair to trust that those who have these jobs know best which
category they belong to. What I’d like to do next, before turning to the
typology, is to clear up a few common misconceptions. If you toss out
the notion of bullshit jobs to someone who hasn’t heard the term before,
that person may assume you’re really talking about shit jobs. But if you
clarify, he is likely to fall back on one of two common stereotypes: he
may assume you’re talking about government bureaucrats. Or, if he’s a
fan of Douglas Adams’s The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, he may
assume you’re talking about hairdressers.

Let me deal with the bureaucrats first, since it’s the easiest to
address. I doubt anyone would deny that there are plenty of useless
bureaucrats in the world. What’s significant to me, though, is that
nowadays, useless bureaucrats seem just as rife in the private sector as
in the public sector. You are as likely to encounter an exasperating
little man in a suit reading out incomprehensible rules and regulations
in a bank or mobile phone outlet than in the passport office or zoning
board. Even more, public and private bureaucracies have become so
increasingly entangled that it’s often very difficult to tell them
apart. That’s one reason I started this chapter the way I did, with the
story of a man working for a private firm contracting with the German
military. Not only did it highlight how wrong it is to assume that
bullshit jobs exist largely in government bureaucracies, but also it
illustrates how “market reforms” almost invariably create more
bureaucracy, not less.²⁵ As I pointed out in an earlier book, The Utopia
of Rules, if you complain about getting some bureaucratic run-around
from your bank, bank officials are likely to tell you it’s all the fault
of government regulations; but if you research where those regulations
actually come from, you’ll likely discover that most of them were
written by the bank.

Nonetheless, the assumption that government is necessarily top-heavy
with featherbedding and unnecessary levels of administrative hierarchy,
while the private sector is lean and mean, is by now so firmly lodged in
people’s heads that it seems no amount of evidence will dislodge it.

No doubt some of this misconception is due to memories of countries such
as the Soviet Union, which had a policy of full employment and was
therefore obliged to make up jobs for everyone whether a need existed or
not. This is how the USSR ended up with shops where customers had to go
through three different clerks to buy a loaf of bread, or road crews
where, at any given moment, two-thirds of the workers were drinking,
playing cards, or dozing off. This is always represented as exactly what
would never happen under capitalism. The last thing a private firm,
competing with other private firms, would do is to hire people it
doesn’t actually need. If anything, the usual complaint about capitalism
is that it’s too efficient, with private workplaces endlessly hounding
employees with constant speed-ups, quotas, and surveillance.

Obviously, I’m not going to deny that the latter is often the case. In
fact, the pressure on corporations to downsize and increase efficiency
has redoubled since the mergers and acquisitions frenzy of the 1980s.
But this pressure has been directed almost exclusively at the people at
the bottom of the pyramid, the ones who are actually making,
maintaining, fixing, or transporting things. Anyone forced to wear a
uniform in the exercise of his daily labors, for instance, is likely to
be hard-pressed.²⁶ FedEx and UPS delivery workers have backbreaking
schedules designed with “scientific” efficiency. In the upper echelons
of those same companies, things are not the same. We can, if we like,
trace this back to the key weakness in the managerial cult of
efficiency—its Achilles’ heel, if you will. When managers began trying
to come up with scientific studies of the most time- and
energy-efficient ways to deploy human labor, they never applied those
same techniques to themselves—or if they did, the effect appears to have
been the opposite of what they intended. As a result, the same period
that saw the most ruthless application of speed-ups and downsizing in
the blue-collar sector also brought a rapid multiplication of
meaningless managerial and administrative posts in almost all large
firms. It’s as if businesses were endlessly trimming the fat on the shop
floor and using the resulting savings to acquire even more unnecessary
workers in the offices upstairs. (As we’ll see, in some companies, this
was literally the case.) The end result was that, just as Socialist
regimes had created millions of dummy proletarian jobs, capitalist
regimes somehow ended up presiding over the creation of millions of
dummy white-collar jobs instead.

We’ll examine how this happened in detail later in the book. For now,
let me just emphasize that almost all the dynamics we will be describing
happen equally in the public and private sectors, and that this is
hardly surprising, considering that today, the two sectors are almost
impossible to tell apart.

why hairdressers are a poor example of a bullshit job

If one common reaction is to blame government, another is, oddly, to
blame women. Once you put aside the notion that you’re only talking
about government bureaucrats, many will assume you must be talking above
all about secretaries, receptionists, and various sorts of (typically
female) administrative staff. Now, clearly, many such administrative
jobs are indeed bullshit by the definition developed here, but the
assumption that it’s mainly women who end up in bullshit jobs is not
only sexist but also represents, to my mind, a profound ignorance of how
most offices actually work. It’s far more likely that the (female)
administrative assistant for a (male) vice dean or “Strategic Network
Manager” is the only person doing any real work in that office, and that
it’s her boss who might as well be lounging around in his office playing
World of Warcraft, or very possibly, actually is.

I will return to this dynamic in the next chapter when we examine the
role of flunkies; here I will just emphasize that we do have statistical
evidence in this regard. While the YouGov survey didn’t break down its
results by occupation, which is a shame, it did break them down by
gender. The result was to reveal that men are far more likely to feel
that their jobs are pointless (42 percent) than women do (32 percent).
Again, it seems reasonable to assume that they are right.²⁷

Finally, the hairdressers. I’m afraid to say that Douglas Adams has a
lot to answer for here. Sometimes it seemed to me that whenever I would
propose the notion that a large percentage of the work being done in our
society was unnecessary, some man (it was always a man) would pop up and
say, “Oh, yes, you mean, like, hairdressers?” Then he would usually make
it clear that he was referring to Douglas Adams’s sci-fi comedic novel
The Restaurant at the End of the Universe, in which the leaders of a
planet called Golgafrincham decide to rid themselves of their most
useless inhabitants by claiming, falsely, that the planet is about to be
destroyed. To deal with the crisis they create an “Ark Fleet” of three
ships, A, B, and C, the first to contain the creative third of the
population, the last to include blue-collar workers, and the middle one
to contain the useless remainder. All are to be placed in suspended
animation and sent to a new world; except that only the B ship is
actually built and it is sent on a collision course with the sun. The
book’s heroes accidentally find themselves on Ship B, investigating a
hall full of millions of space sarcophagi, full of such useless people
whom they initially assume to be dead. One begins reading off the
plaques next to each sarcophagus:

“It says ‘Golgafrincham Ark Fleet, Ship B, Hold Seven, Telephone
Sanitizer, Second Class’—and a serial number.”

“A telephone sanitizer?” said Arthur. “A dead telephone sanitizer?”

“Best kind.”

“But what’s he doing here?”

Ford peered through the top at the figure within.

“Not a lot,” he said, and suddenly flashed one of those grins of his
which always made people think he’d been overdoing things recently and
should try to get some rest.

He scampered over to another sarcophagus. A moment’s brisk towel work,
and he announced:

“This one’s a dead hairdresser. Hoopy!”

The next sarcophagus revealed itself to be the last resting place of an
advertising account executive; the one after that contained a secondhand
car salesman, third class.²⁸

Now, it’s obvious why this story might seem relevant to those who first
hear of bullshit jobs, but the list is actually quite odd. For one
thing, professional telephone sanitizers don’t really exist,²⁹ and while
advertising executives and used-car salesmen do—and are indeed
professions society could arguably be better off without—for some
reason, when Douglas Adams aficionados recall the story, it’s always the
hairdressers they remember.

I will be honest here. I have no particular bone to pick with Douglas
Adams; in fact, I have a fondness for all manifestations of humorous
British seventies sci-fi; but nonetheless, I find this particular
fantasy alarmingly condescending. First of all, the list is not really a
list of useless professions at all. It’s a list of the sort of people a
middle-class bohemian living in Islington around that time would find
mildly annoying. Does that mean that they deserve to die?³⁰ Myself, I
fantasize about eliminating the jobs, not the people who have to do
them. To justify extermination, Adams seems to have intentionally
selected people that he thought were not only useless but also could be
thought of as embracing or identifying with what they did.

•  •  •

Before moving on, then, let us reflect on the status of hairdressers.
Why is a hairdresser not a bullshit job? Well, the most obvious reason
is precisely because most hairdressers do not believe it to be one. To
cut and style hair makes a demonstrable difference in the world, and the
notion that it is unnecessary vanity is purely subjective: Who is to say
whose judgment of the intrinsic value of hairstyling is correct? Adams’s
first novel, The Hitchhiker’s Guide to the Galaxy, which became
something of a cultural phenomenon, was published in 1979. I well
remember, as a teenager in New York in that year, observing how small
crowds would often gather outside the barbershop on Astor Place to watch
punk rockers get elaborate purple mohawks. Was Douglas Adams suggesting
those giving them the mohawks also deserved to die, or just those
hairdressers whose style sense he did not appreciate? In working-class
communities, hair parlors often serve as gathering places; women of a
certain age and background are known to spend hours at the neighborhood
hair parlor, which becomes a place to swap local news and gossip.³¹ It’s
hard to escape the impression, though, that in the minds of those who
invoke hairdressers as a prime example of a useless job, this is
precisely the problem. They seem to be imagining a gaggle of middle-aged
women idly gossiping under their metallic helmets while others fuss
about making some marginal attempts at beautification on a person who
(it is suggested), being too fat, too old, and too working class, will
never be attractive no matter what is done to her. It’s basically just
snobbery, with a dose of gratuitous sexism thrown in.

Logically, objecting to hairdressers on this basis makes about as much
sense as saying running a bowling alley or playing bagpipes is a
bullshit job because you personally don’t enjoy bowling or bagpipe music
and don’t much like the sort of people who do.

Now, some might feel I am being unfair. How do you know, they might
object, that Douglas Adams wasn’t really thinking, not of those who
hairdress for the poor, but of those who hairdress for the very rich?
What about superposh hairdressers who charge insane amounts of money to
make the daughters of financiers or movie executives look odd in some
up-to-the-moment fashion? Might they not harbor a secret suspicion that
their work is valueless, even pernicious? Would not that then qualify
them as having a bullshit job?

In theory, of course, we must allow this could be correct. But let us
explore the possibility more deeply. Obviously, there is no objective
measure of quality whereby one can say that haircut X is worth $15,
haircut Y, $150, and haircut Z, $1,500. In the latter case, most of the
time, what the customer is paying for anyway is mainly just the ability
to say she paid $1,500 for a haircut, or perhaps that he got his hair
done by the same stylist as Kim Kardashian or Tom Cruise. We are
speaking of overt displays of wastefulness and extravagance. Now, one
could certainly make the argument that there’s a deep structural
affinity between wasteful extravagance and bullshit, and theorists of
economic psychology from Thorstein Veblen, to Sigmund Freud, to Georges
Bataille have pointed out that at the very pinnacle of the wealth
pyramid—think here of Donald Trump’s gilded elevators—there is a very
thin line between extreme luxury and total crap. (There’s a reason why
in dreams, gold is often symbolized by excrement, and vice versa.)

What’s more, there is indeed a long literary tradition—starting with the
French writer Émile Zola’s Au Bonheur des Dames (The Ladies’ Delight)
(in 1883) and running through innumerable British comedy
routines—celebrating the profound feelings of contempt and loathing that
merchants and sales staff in retail outlets often feel for both their
clients and the products they sell them. If the retail worker genuinely
believes that he provides nothing of value to his customers, can we then
say that retail worker does, indeed, have a bullshit job? I would say
the technical answer, according to our working definition, would have to
be yes; but at least according to my own research, the number of retail
workers who feel this way is actually quite small. Purveyors of
expensive perfumes might think their products are overpriced and their
clients are mostly boorish idiots, but they rarely feel the perfume
industry itself should be abolished.

My own research indicated that within the service economy, there were
only three significant exceptions to this rule: information technology
(IT) providers, telemarketers, and sex workers. Many of the first
category, and pretty much all of the second, were convinced they were
basically engaged in scams. The final example is more complicated and
probably moves us into territory that extends beyond the precise
confines of “bullshit job” into something more pernicious, but I think
it’s worth taking note of nonetheless. While I was conducting research,
a number of women wrote to me or told me about their time as pole
dancers, Playboy Club bunnies, frequenters of “Sugar Daddy” websites and
the like, and suggested that such occupations should be mentioned in my
book. The most compelling argument to this effect was from a former
exotic dancer, now professor, who made a case that most sex work should
be considered a bullshit job because, while she acknowledged that sex
work clearly did answer a genuine consumer demand, something was
terribly, terribly wrong with any society that effectively tells the
vast majority of its female population they are worth more dancing on
boxes between the ages of eighteen and twenty-five than they will be at
any subsequent point in their lives, whatever their talents or
accomplishments. If the same woman can make five times as much money
stripping as she could teaching as a world-recognized scholar, could not
the stripping job be considered bullshit simply on that basis?³²

It’s hard to deny the power of her argument. (One might add that the
mutual contempt between service provider and service user in the sex
industry is often far greater than what one might expect to find in even
the fanciest boutique.) The only objection I could really raise here is
that her argument might not go far enough. It’s not so much that
stripper is a bullshit job, perhaps, but that this situation shows us to
be living in a bullshit society.³³

on the difference between partly bullshit jobs, mostly bullshit jobs, and purely and entirely bullshit jobs

Finally, I must very briefly address the inevitable question: What about
jobs that are just partly bullshit?

This is a tough one because there are very few jobs that don’t involve
at least a few pointless or idiotic elements. To some degree, this is
probably just the inevitable side effect of the workings of any complex
organization. Still, it’s clear there is a problem and the problem is
getting worse. I don’t think I know anyone who has had the same job for
thirty years or more who doesn’t feel that the bullshit quotient has
increased over the time he or she has been doing it. I might add that
this is certainly true of my own work as a professor. Teachers in higher
education spend increasing amounts of time filling out administrative
paperwork. This can actually be documented, since one of the pointless
tasks we are asked to do (and never used to be asked to do) is to fill
out quarterly time allocation surveys in which we record precisely how
much time each week we spend on administrative paperwork. All
indications suggest that this trend is gathering steam. As the French
version of Slate magazine noted in 2013, “la bullshitisation de
l’économie n’en est qu’à ses débuts.” (The bullshitization of the
economy has only just begun.)³⁴

However inexorable, the process of bullshitization is highly
inconsistent. It has, for obvious reasons, affected middle-class
employment more than working-class employment, and within the working
class, it has been traditionally female, caregiving work that has been
the main target of bullshitization: many nurses, for instance,
complained to me that as much as 80 percent of their time is now taken
up with paperwork, meetings, and the like, while truck drivers and
bricklayers still carry on largely unaffected. In this area, we do have
some statistics. Figure 1 is excerpted from the US edition of the
2016–2017 State of Enterprise Work Report (see next page).

According to this survey, the amount of time American office workers say
they devoted to their actual duties declined from 46 percent in 2015 to
39 percent in 2016, owing to a proportionate rise in time dealing with
emails (up from 12 percent to 16 percent), “wasteful” meetings (8
percent to 10 percent), and administrative tasks (9 percent to 11
percent). Figures that dramatic must be partly the result of random
statistical noise—after all, if such trends really continued, in less
than a decade, no US office worker would be doing any real work at
all—but if nothing else, the survey makes abundantly clear that (1) more
than half of working hours in American offices are spent on bullshit,
and (2) the problem is getting worse.

As a result, it is indeed possible to say there are partly bullshit
jobs, mostly bullshit jobs, and purely and entirely bullshit jobs. This
just happens to be a book about the latter (or, to be precise, about
entirely or overwhelmingly bullshit jobs—not mostly bullshit jobs, where
the meter hovers anywhere near 50 percent).

Figure 1

[Image]

In no sense am I denying that the bullshitization of all aspects of the
economy is a critically important social issue. Simply consider the
figures cited earlier. If 37 percent to 40 percent of jobs are
completely pointless, and at least 50 percent of the work done in
nonpointless office jobs is equally pointless, we can probably conclude
that at least half of all work being done in our society could be
eliminated without making any real difference at all. Actually, the
number is almost certainly higher, because this would not even be taking
into consideration second-order bullshit jobs: real jobs done in support
of those engaged in bullshit. (I’ll discuss these in chapter 2.) We
could easily become societies of leisure and institute a twenty-hour
workweek. Maybe even a fifteen-hour week. Instead, we find ourselves, as
a society, condemned to spending most of our time at work, performing
tasks that we feel make no difference in the world whatsoever.

In the rest of this book, I will explore how we ended up in this
alarming state of affairs.


Chapter 2


What Sorts of Bullshit Jobs Are There?

My research has revealed five basic types of bullshit jobs. In this
chapter, I will describe them and outline their essential features.

First, a word about this research. I am drawing on two large bodies of
data. In the wake of my original 2013 essay, “On the Phenomenon of
Bullshit Jobs,” a number of newspapers in different countries ran the
essay as an opinion piece, and it was also reproduced on a number of
blogs. As a result, there was a great deal of online discussion, over
the course of which many participants made references to personal
experiences of jobs they considered particularly absurd or pointless. I
downloaded 124 of these and spent some time sorting through them.

The second body of data was actively solicited. In the second half of
2016, I created an email account devoted solely to research and used my
Twitter account to encourage people who felt they now or once had a
bullshit job to send in firsthand testimonies.¹ The response was
impressive. I ended up assembling over 250 such testimonies, ranging
from single paragraphs to eleven-page essays detailing whole sequences
of bullshit jobs, along with speculations about the organizational or
social dynamics that produced them, and descriptions of their social and
psychological effects. Most of these testimonies were from citizens of
English-speaking countries, but I also received testimonies from all
over Continental Europe, as well as Mexico, Brazil, Egypt, India, South
Africa, and Japan. Some of these were deeply moving, even painful to
read. Many were hilarious. Needless to say, almost all respondents
insisted their names not be used.²

After culling the responses and trimming them of extraneous material, I
found myself with a database of more than 110,000 words, which I duly
color coded. The results might not be adequate for most forms of
statistical analysis, but I have found them an extraordinarily rich
source for qualitative analysis, especially since in many cases I’ve
been able to ask follow-up questions and, in some, to engage in long
conversations with informants. Some of the key concepts I’ll be
developing in the book were first suggested in or inspired by such
conversations—so, in a way, the book can be seen as a collaborative
project. This is particularly true of the following typology, which grew
directly from these conversations and which I like to see less as my own
creation and more as the product of an ongoing dialogue.³

the five major varieties of bullshit jobs

No typology is perfect, and I’m sure there are many ways one could draw
the lines, each revealing in its own way,⁴ but over the course of my
research, I have found it most useful to break down the types of
bullshit job into five categories. I will call these: flunkies, goons,
duct tapers, box tickers, and taskmasters.

Let us consider each in turn.

1. what flunkies do

Flunky jobs are those that exist only or primarily to make someone else
look or feel important.

Another term for this category might be “feudal retainers.” Throughout
recorded history, rich and powerful men and women have tended to
surround themselves with servants, clients, sycophants, and minions of
one sort or another. Not all of these are actually employed in the
grandee’s household, and many of those who are, are expected to do at
least some actual work; but especially at the top of the pyramid, there
is usually a certain portion whose job it is to basically just stand
around and look impressive.⁵ You cannot be magnificent without an
entourage. And for the truly magnificent, the very uselessness of the
uniformed retainers hovering around you is the greatest testimony to
your greatness. Well into the Victorian era, for instance, wealthy
families in England still employed footmen: liveried servants whose
entire purpose was to run alongside carriages checking for bumps in the
road.⁶

Servants of this sort are normally given some minor task to justify
their existence, but this is really just a pretext: in reality, the
whole point is to employ handsome young men in flashy uniforms ready to
stand by the door looking regal while you hold court, or to stride
gravely in front of you when you enter the room. Often retainers are
given military-style costumes and paraphernalia to create the impression
that the rich person who employs them has something resembling a palace
guard. Such roles tend to multiply in economies based on rent extraction
and the subsequent redistribution of the loot.

Just as a thought experiment: imagine you are a feudal class extracting
50 percent of every peasant household’s product. If so, you are in
possession of an awful lot of food. Enough, in fact, to support a
population exactly as large as that of peasant food producers.⁷ You have
to do something with it—and there are only so many people any given
feudal lord can keep around as chefs, wine stewards, scullery maids,
harem eunuchs, musicians, jewelers, and the like. Even after you’ve
taken care to ensure you have enough men trained in the use of weapons
to suppress any potential rebellion, there’s likely to be a great deal
left over. As a result, indigents, runaways, orphans, criminals, women
in desperate situations, and other dislocated people will inevitably
begin to accumulate around your mansion (because, after all, that’s
where all the food is). You can drive them away, but then they’re likely
to form a dangerous vagabond class that might become a political threat.
The obvious thing to do is to slap a uniform on them and assign them
some minor or unnecessary task. It makes you look good, and at least
that way, you can keep an eye on them.

Now, later I’m going suggest that a dynamic not entirely different
happens under the existing form of capitalism, but for the moment, all I
really want to stress is that assigning people minor tasks as an excuse
to have them hang around making you look impressive has a long and
honorable history.⁸

So, what might the modern equivalent be?

•  •  •

Some old-fashioned feudal-style retainer jobs still do exist.⁹ Doormen
are the most obvious example. They perform the same function in the
houses of the very rich that electronic intercoms have performed for
everyone else since at least the 1950s. One former concierge complains:

Bill: Another bullshit job—concierge in one of these buildings. Half my
time was spent pressing a button to open the front door for residents
and saying hello as they passed through the lobby. If I didn’t get to
that button in time and a resident had to open the door manually, I’d
hear about it from my manager.

In some countries, such as Brazil, such buildings still have uniformed
elevator operators whose entire job is to push the button for you. There
is a continuum from explicit feudal leftovers of this type to
receptionists and front-desk personnel at places that obviously don’t
need them.

Gerte: In 2010 I worked as a receptionist at a Dutch publishing company.
The phone rang maybe once a day, so I was given a couple of other tasks:

• Keep candy dish full of mints. (Mints were supplied by someone else at
the company; I just had to take a handful out of a drawer next to the
candy dish and put them in the candy dish.)

• Once a week, I would go to a conference room and wind a grandfather
clock. (I found this task stressful, actually, because they told me that
if I forgot or waited too long, all of the weights would fall, and I
would be left with the onerous task of grandfather clock repair.)

• The task that took the most time was managing another receptionist’s
Avon sales.

Clearly, one call a day could be handled by someone else at the press in
the same manner it is in most people’s homes: whoever happens to be the
closest to the phone and isn’t in the middle of something else picks it
up and answers. Why shell out a full-time salary and benefits package
for a woman—actually, it would seem, in this case, two women—just to sit
at the front desk all day doing nothing? The answer is: because not
doing so would be shocking and bizarre. No one would take a company
seriously if it had no one at all sitting at the front desk. Any
publisher who defied convention that blatantly would cause potential
authors or merchants or contractors to ask themselves, “If they don’t
feel they have to have a receptionist, what other things that publishers
are normally expected to do might they just decide doesn’t apply to
them? Pay me, for example?”¹⁰

Receptionists are required as a Badge of Seriousness even if there’s
nothing else for them to do. Other flunkies are Badges of Importance.
The following account is from Jack, who was hired as a cold caller in a
low-level securities trading firm. Such firms, he explains, “operate by
stolen corporate directories: internal company phonebooks that some
enterprising individual has stolen a physical copy of and then sold to
various firms.” Brokers then call upper-level employees of the companies
and try to pitch them stocks.

Jack: My job, as a cold caller, was to call these people. Not to try to
sell them stocks, but rather, to offer “free research material on a
promising company that is about to go public,” emphasizing that I was
calling on behalf of a broker. That last point was especially stressed
to me during my training. The reasoning behind this was that the brokers
themselves would seem, to the potential client, to be more capable and
professional if they were so damn busy making money that they needed an
assistant to make this call for them. There was literally no other
purpose to this job than to make my neighbor the broker appear to be
more successful than he actually was.

I was paid two hundred dollars per week, cash, literally from the
broker’s wallet, for making him look like a high roller. But this didn’t
just make for social capital for the broker with regards to his clients;
in the office itself, being a broker with your own cold caller was a
status symbol, and an important one in such a hypermasculine,
hypercompetitive office environment. I was some kind of totem figure for
him. Owning me could mean the difference between his getting a meeting
with a visiting regional head or not; but for the most part, it just put
him on a slightly higher rung on the social ladder of the workplace.

The ultimate goal of such brokers being to sufficiently impress their
boss that they would be moved from the lowly “trading pit” to an office
of their own upstairs. Jack’s conclusion: “My position at this company
was wholly unnecessary and served no purpose whatsoever other than to
make my immediate superior look and feel like a big shot.”

This is the very definition of a flunky job.

The pettiness of the game here—even in the 1990s, $200 was not a lot of
money—helps lay bare dynamics that might express themselves in more
opaque ways in larger and more complex corporate environments. There we
often find cases where no one is entirely sure how or why certain
positions were invented and maintained. Here is Ophelia, who works for
an organization that runs social marketing campaigns:

Ophelia: My current job title is Portfolio Coordinator, and everyone
always asks what that means, or what it is I actually do? I have no
idea. I’m still trying to figure it out. My job description says all
sorts of stuff about facilitating relationships between partners, etc.,
which as far as I’m concerned, just means answering occasional queries.

It has occurred to me that my actual title refers to a bullshit job.
However, the reality of my working life is functioning as a Personal
Assistant to the Director. And in that role, I do have actual work tasks
that need doing, simply because the people I assist are either too
“busy” or too important to do this stuff themselves. In fact, most of
the time, I seem to be the only one at my workplace who has something to
do. Some days I run around frantically, whilst most of the midlevel
managers sit around and stare at a wall, seemingly bored to death and
just trying to kill time doing pointless things (like that one guy who
rearranges his backpack for a half hour every day).

Obviously, there isn’t enough work to keep most of us occupied, but—in a
weird logic that probably just makes them all feel more important about
their own jobs—we are now recruiting another manager. Maybe this is to
keep up the illusion that there’s so much to do?

Ophelia suspects her job was originally just an empty place filler,
created so that someone could boast about the number of employees he had
working under him. But once it was created, a perverse dynamic began to
set in, whereby managers off-loaded more and more of their
responsibilities onto the lowest-ranking female subordinate (her) to
give the impression that they were too busy to do such things
themselves, leading, of course, to their having even less to do than
previously—a spiral culminating in the apparently bizarre decision to
hire another manager to stare at the wall or play Pokémon all day, just
because hiring him would make it look like that was not what everyone
else was doing. Ophelia ends up sometimes working frenetically; in part
because the few necessary tasks (handed off to her) are augmented with
completely made-up responsibilities designed to keep low-level staff
bustling:

Ophelia: We are divided between two organizations and two buildings. If
my boss (the boss of the whole place, in fact) goes to the other
building, I have to fill in a form to book a room for her. Every time.
It is absolute insanity, but it certainly keeps the receptionist over
there very busy and therefore, indispensable. It also makes her appear
very organized, juggling and filing all this paperwork. It occurs to me
that this is what they really mean in job ads when they say that they
expect you to make office procedures more efficient: that you create
more bureaucracy to fill the time.

Ophelia’s example highlights a common ambiguity: Whose job is really
bullshit, that of the flunky? Or the boss? Sometimes, as we’ve seen with
Jack, it’s clearly the former—the flunky really does only exist to make
his or her immediate superior look or feel important. In cases like
that, no one minds if the flunky does absolutely nothing:

Steve: I just graduated, and my new “job” basically consists of my boss
forwarding emails to me with the message “Steve refer to the below,” and
I reply that the email is inconsequential or straight-up spam.

In other cases, as with Ophelia, the flunkies end up effectively doing
the bosses’ jobs for them. This, of course, was the traditional role of
female secretaries (now relabeled “administrative assistants”) working
for male executives during most of the twentieth century: while in
theory secretaries were there just to answer the phone, take dictation,
and do some light filing, in fact, they often ended up doing 80 percent
to 90 percent of their bosses’ jobs, and sometimes, 100 percent of its
nonbullshit aspects. It would be fascinating—though probably
impossible—to write a history of books, designs, plans, and documents
attributed to famous men that were actually written by their
secretaries.¹¹

So, in such cases, who has the bullshit job?

Here again, I think we are forced to fall back on the subjective
element. The middle manager in Ophelia’s office reorganizing his
backpack for a half hour every day may or may not have been willing to
admit his job was pointless, but those hired just to make someone like
him seem important almost invariably know it and resent it—even when it
doesn’t involve making up unnecessary busywork:

Judy: The only full-time job I ever had—in Human Resources in a private
sector engineering firm—was wholly not necessary. It was there only
because the HR Specialist was lazy and didn’t want to leave his desk. I
was an HR Assistant. My job took, I shit you not, one hour a day—an hour
and a half max. The other seven or so hours were spent playing 2048 or
watching YouTube. Phone never rang, Data were entered in five minutes or
less. I got paid to be bored. My boss could have easily done my job yet
again—fucking lazy turd.

•  •  •

When I was doing anthropological fieldwork in highland Madagascar, I
noticed that wherever one found the tomb of a famous nobleman, one also
invariably found two or three modest graves directly at its foot. When I
asked what these modest graves were, I would always be told these were
his “soldiers”—really a euphemism for “slaves.” The meaning was clear:
to be an aristocrat meant to have the power to order others around. Even
in death, if you didn’t have underlings, you couldn’t really claim to be
a noble.

An analogous logic seems to be at work in corporate environments. Why
did the Dutch publishing outfit need a receptionist? Because a company
has to have three levels of command in order to be considered a “real”
company. At the very least, there must be a boss, and editors, and those
editors have to have some sort of underlings or assistants—at the very
minimum, the one receptionist who is a kind of collective underling to
all of them. Otherwise you wouldn’t be a corporation but just some kind
of hippie collective. Once the unnecessary flunky is hired, whether or
not that flunky ends up being given anything to do is an entirely
secondary consideration—that depends on a whole list of extraneous
factors: for instance, whether or not there is any work to do, the needs
and attitudes of the superiors, gender dynamics, and institutional
constraints. If the organization grows in size, higher-ups’ importance
will almost invariably be measured by the total number of employees
working under them, which, in turn, creates an even more powerful
incentive for those on top of the organizational ladder to either hire
employees and only then decide what they are going to do with them
or—even more often, perhaps—to resist any efforts to eliminate jobs that
are found to be redundant. As we’ll see, testimonies from consultants
hired to introduce efficiencies in a large corporation (say, a bank, or
a medical supply corporation) attest to the awkward silences and
outright hostility that ensue when executives realize those efficiencies
will have the effect of automating away a significant portion of their
subordinates. By doing so, they would effectively reduce managers to
nothing. Kings of the air. For without flunkies, to whom, exactly, would
they be “superior”?

2. what goons do

The use of this term is, of course, metaphorical: I’m not using it to
mean actual gangsters or other forms of hired muscle. Rather, I’m
referring to people whose jobs have an aggressive element, but,
crucially, who exist only because other people employ them.

The most obvious example of this are national armed forces. Countries
need armies only because other countries have armies.¹² If no one had an
army, armies would not be needed. But the same can be said of most
lobbyists, PR specialists, telemarketers, and corporate lawyers. Also,
like literal goons, they have a largely negative impact on society. I
think almost anyone would concur that, were all telemarketers to
disappear, the world would be a better place. But I think most would
also agree that if all corporate lawyers, bank lobbyists, or marketing
gurus were to similarly vanish in a puff of smoke, the world would be at
least a little bit more bearable.

The obvious question is: Are these really bullshit jobs at all? Would
these not be more like the Mafia hit men of the last chapter? After all,
in most cases, goons are clearly doing something to further the
interests of those who employ them, even if the overall effect of their
profession’s existence might be considered detrimental to humanity as a
whole.

Here again we must appeal to the subjective element. Sometimes the
ultimate pointlessness of a line of work is so obvious that few involved
make much effort to deny it. Most universities in the United Kingdom now
have public relations offices with staffs several times larger than
would be typical for, say, a bank or an auto manufacturer of roughly the
same size. Does Oxford really need to employ a dozen-plus PR specialists
to convince the public it’s a top-notch university? I’d imagine it would
take at least that many PR agents quite a number of years to convince
the public Oxford was not a top-notch university, and even then, I
suspect the task would prove impossible. Obviously, I am being slightly
facetious here: this is not the only thing a PR department does. I’m
sure in the case of Oxford much of its day-to-day concerns involve more
practical matters such as attracting to the university the children of
oil magnates or corrupt politicians from foreign lands who might
otherwise have gone to Cambridge. But still, those in charge of public
relations, “strategic communications,” and the like at many elite
universities in the UK have sent me testimonies making it clear that
they do indeed feel their jobs are largely pointless.

I have included goons as a category of bullshit job largely for this
reason: because so many of those who hold them feel their jobs have no
social value and ought not to exist. Recall the words of the tax
litigator from the preface: “I am a corporate lawyer . . . I contribute
nothing to this world and am utterly miserable all of the time.”
Unfortunately, it is almost impossible to ascertain how many corporate
lawyers secretly share this feeling. The YouGov survey did not break
down its results by profession, and while my own research confirms such
feelings are by no means unique, none of those who reported such
attitudes were particularly high-level. The same is true of those who
work in marketing or PR.

The reason I thought the word “goon” appropriate is because in almost
all cases, goons find their jobs objectionable not just because they
feel they lack positive value but also because they see them as
essentially manipulative and aggressive:

Tom: I work for a very large American-owned postproduction company based
in London. There are parts of my job that have always been very
enjoyable and fulfilling: I get to make cars fly, buildings explode, and
dinosaurs attack alien spaceships for movie studios, providing
entertainment for audiences worldwide.

More recently, however, a growing percentage of our customers are
advertising agencies. They bring us adverts for well-known branded
products: shampoos, toothpastes, moisturizing creams, washing powders,
etc., and we use visual effects trickery to make it seem like these
products actually work.

We also work on TV shows and music videos. We reduce bags under the eyes
of women, make hair shinier, teeth whiter, make pop stars and film stars
look thinner, etc. We airbrush skin to remove spots, isolate the teeth
and color correct them to make them whiter (also done on the clothes in
washing powder ads), paint out split ends and add shiny highlights to
hair in shampoo commercials, and there are special deforming tools to
make people thinner. These techniques are literally used in every
commercial on TV, plus most TV drama shows, and lots of movies.
Particularly on female actors but also on men. We essentially make
viewers feel inadequate whilst they’re watching the main programs and
then exaggerate the effectiveness of the “solutions” provided in the
commercial breaks.

I get paid £100,000 a year to do this.

When I asked why he considered his job to be bullshit (as opposed to
merely, say, evil), Tom replied:

Tom: I consider a worthwhile job to be one that fulfills a preexisting
need, or creates a product or service that people hadn’t thought of,
that somehow enhances and improves their lives. I believe we passed the
point where most jobs were these type of jobs a long time ago. Supply
has far outpaced demand in most industries, so now it is demand that is
manufactured. My job is a combination of manufacturing demand and then
exaggerating the usefulness of the products sold to fix it. In fact, you
could argue that that is the job of every single person that works in or
for the entire advertising industry. If we’re at the point where in
order to sell products, you have to first of all trick people into
thinking they need them, then I think you’d be hard-pressed to argue
that these jobs aren’t bullshit.¹³

In advertising, marketing, and publicity, discontent of this sort runs
so high that there is even a magazine, Adbusters, produced entirely by
workers in the industry who resent what they are made to do for a living
and wish to use the powers they’ve acquired in advertising for good
instead of evil—for instance, by designing flashy “subvertising” that
attacks consumer culture as a whole.

Tom, for his part, didn’t consider his job bullshit because he objected
to consumer culture in itself. He objected because he saw his “beauty
work,” as he called it, as inherently coercive and manipulative. He was
drawing a distinction between what might be called honest illusions and
dishonest ones. When you make dinosaurs attack spaceships, no one
actually thinks that’s real. Much as with a stage magician, half the fun
is that everyone knows a trick is being played—they just don’t know
exactly how it’s done. When you subtly enhance the appearance of
celebrities, in contrast, you are trying to change viewers’ unconscious
assumptions about what everyday reality—in this case, of men’s and
women’s bodies—ought to be like, so as to create an uncomfortable
feeling that their lived reality is itself an inadequate substitute for
the real thing. Where honest illusions add joy into the world, dishonest
ones are intentionally aimed toward convincing people their worlds are a
tawdry and miserable sort of place.

Similarly, I received a very large number of testimonies from call
center employees. None considered his or her job bullshit because of
conditions of employment—actually, these appear to vary enormously, from
nightmarish levels of surveillance to surprisingly relaxed—but because
the work involved tricking or pressuring people into doing things that
weren’t really in their best interest. Here’s a sampling:

• “I had a bunch of bullshit call center jobs selling things that people
didn’t really want/need, taking insurance claims, conducting pointless
market research.”

• “It’s a bait and switch, offering a ‘free’ service first, and then
asking you for $1.95 for a two-week trial subscription in order for you
to finish the process and get you what you went on the website to
acquire, and then signing you up for an auto-renewal for a monthly
service that’s more than ten times that amount.”

• “It’s not just a lack of positive contribution, but you’re making an
active negative contribution to people’s day. I called people up to hock
them useless shit they didn’t need: specifically, access to their
‘credit score’ that they could obtain for free elsewhere, but that we
were offering (with some mindless add-ons) for £6.99 a month.”

• “Most of the support covered basic computer operations the customer
could easily google. They were geared toward old people or those that
didn’t know better, I think.”

• “Our call center’s resources are almost wholly devoted to coaching
agents on how to talk people into things they don’t need as opposed to
solving the real problems they are calling about.”

So once again, what really irks is (1) the aggression and (2) the
deception. Here I can speak from personal experience, having done such
jobs, albeit usually very, very briefly: there are few things less
pleasant than being forced against your better nature to try to convince
others to do things that defy their common sense. I will be discussing
this issue in greater depth in the next chapter, on spiritual violence,
but for now, let us merely note that this is at the very heart of what
it is to be a goon.

3. what duct tapers do

Duct tapers are employees whose jobs exist only because of a glitch or
fault in the organization; who are there to solve a problem that ought
not to exist. I am adopting the term from the software industry, but I
think it has more general applicability. One testimony from a software
developer describes the industry like this:

Pablo: Basically, we have two kinds of jobs. One kind involves working
on core technologies, solving hard and challenging problems, etc.

The other one is taking a bunch of core technologies and applying some
duct tape to make them work together.

The former is generally seen as useful. The latter is often seen as less
useful or even useless, but, in any case, much less gratifying than the
first kind. The feeling is probably based on the observation that if
core technologies were done properly, there would be little or no need
for duct tape.

Pablo’s main point is that with the growing reliance on free software
(freeware), paid employment is increasingly reduced to duct taping.
Coders are often happy to perform the interesting and rewarding work on
core technologies for free at night but, since that means they have less
and less incentive to think about how such creations will ultimately be
made compatible, that means the same coders are reduced during the day
to the tedious (but paid) work of making them fit together. This is a
very important insight, and I’ll be discussing some of its implications
at length later; but for now, let’s just consider the notion of duct
taping itself.

Cleaning is a necessary function: things get dusty even if they just sit
there, and the ordinary conduct of life tends to leave traces that need
to be tidied up. But cleaning up after someone who makes a completely
gratuitous and unnecessary mess is always irritating. Having a full-time
occupation cleaning up after such a person can only breed resentment.
Sigmund Freud even spoke of “housewife’s neurosis”: a condition that he
believed affected women forced to limit their life horizons to tidying
up after others, and who therefore became fanatical about domestic
hygiene as a form of revenge. This is often the moral agony of the duct
taper: to be forced to organize one’s working life around caring about a
certain value (say, cleanliness) precisely because more important people
could not care less.

The most obvious examples of duct tapers are underlings whose jobs are
to undo the damage done by sloppy or incompetent superiors.

Magda: I once worked for an SME [a small or medium-size enterprise]
where I was the “tester.” I was required to proofread research reports
written by their posh star researcher-statistician.

The man didn’t know the first thing about statistics, and he struggled
to produce grammatically correct sentences. He tended to avoid using
verbs. He was so bad, I’d reward myself with a cake if I found a
coherent paragraph. I lost twelve pounds working in that company. My job
was to convince him to undertake a major reworking of every report he
produced. Of course, he would never agree to correct anything, let alone
undertake a rework, so I would then have to take the report to the
company directors. They were statistically illiterate too, but being the
directors, they could drag things out even more.

There is, it seems, a whole genre of jobs that involve correcting the
damage done by a superior who holds his position for reasons unrelated
to ability to do the work. (This overlaps somewhat with flunky positions
where the jobholder has to do the superior’s work, but it’s not exactly
the same thing.) Here’s another example, of a programmer who got a job
for a firm run by a Viennese psychologist who fancied himself an
old-style scientific revolutionary, and who had invented what was, in
the company, referred to simply as “the algorithm.” The algorithm aimed
to reproduce human speech. The company sold it to pharmacists to use on
their websites. Except it didn’t work:

Nouri: The company’s founding “genius” was this Viennese research
psychologist, who claimed to have discovered the Algorithm. For many
months, I was never allowed to see it. I just wrote stuff that used it.

The psychologist’s code kept failing to give sensible results. Typical
cycle:

• I demonstrate his code barfs on a ridiculously basic sentence.

• He’d wear Confused Frown: “Oh . . . how strange . . .” like I just
discovered the Death Star’s one tiny weakness.

• He’d disappear into his cave for two hours . . .

• Triumphantly emerges with bug fix—now it’s perfect!

• Go to step one.

In the end, the programmer was reduced to writing very primitive Eliza
scripts¹⁴ to mimic speech for the Web pages just to cover up the fact
that the Algorithm was basically gibberish, and the company, it turned
out, was a pure vanity project run by a rented CEO who used to manage a
gym.

Many duct-taper jobs are the result of a glitch in the system that no
one has bothered to correct—tasks that could easily be automated, for
instance, but haven’t been either because no one has gotten around to
it, or because the manager wants to maintain as many subordinates as
possible, or because of some structural confusion, or because of some
combination of the three. I have any number of testimonies of this sort.
Here’s a sampling:

• “I worked as a programmer for a travel company. Some poor person’s job
was to receive updated plane timetables via email several times a week
and copy them by hand into Excel.”

• “My job was to transfer information about the state’s oil wells into a
different set of notebooks than they were currently in.”

• “My day consisted of photocopying veterans’ health records for seven
and a half hours a day . . . Workers were told time and again that it
was too costly to buy the machines for digitizing.”

• “I was given one responsibility: watching an in-box that received
emails in a certain form from employees in the company asking for tech
help, and copy and paste it into a different form. Not only was this a
textbook example of an automatable job, it actually used to be
automated! There was some kind of disagreement between various managers
that led to higher-ups issuing a standardization that nullified the
automation.”

On the social level, duct taping has traditionally been women’s work.
Throughout history, prominent men have wandered about oblivious to half
of what’s going on around them, treading on a thousand toes; it was
typically their wives, sisters, mothers, or daughters who were left with
the responsibility of performing the emotional labor of soothing egos,
calming nerves, and negotiating solutions to the problems they created.
In a more material sense, duct taping might be considered a classic
working-class function. The architect may come up with a plan that looks
stunning on paper, but it’s the builder who has to figure out how to
actually install electrical sockets in a circular room or to use real
duct tape to hold things together that in reality simply don’t fit
together the way the blueprints say they should.

In this latter case, we’re not really talking about a bullshit job at
all, any more than we’re talking about a bullshit job when an orchestra
conductor interprets the score of a Beethoven symphony or an actress
plays Lady Macbeth. There will always be a certain gap between
blueprints, schemas, and plans and their real-world implementation;
therefore, there will always be people charged with making the necessary
adjustments. What makes such a role bullshit is when the plan obviously
can’t work and any competent architect should have known it; when the
system is so stupidly designed that it will fail in completely
predictable ways, but rather than fix the problem, the organization
prefers to hire full-time employees whose main or entire job is to deal
with the damage. It’s as if a homeowner, upon discovering a leak in the
roof, decided it was too much bother to hire a roofer to reshingle it,
and instead stuck a bucket underneath and hired someone whose full-time
job was to periodically dump the water.

It goes without saying that duct tapers are almost always aware they
have a bullshit job and are usually quite angry about it.

I encountered a classic example of a duct taper while working as a
lecturer at a prominent British university. One day the wall shelves in
my office collapsed. This left books scattered all over the floor, and a
jagged half-dislocated metal frame that once held the shelves in place
dangling cheerfully over my desk. A carpenter appeared an hour later to
inspect the damage but announced gravely that, since there were books
all over the floor, safety rules prevented him from entering the room or
taking further action. I would have to stack the books and then not
touch anything else, whereupon he would return at the earliest available
opportunity to remove the dangling frame.

I duly stacked the books, but the carpenter never reappeared. There
ensued a series of daily calls from Anthropology to Buildings and
Grounds. Each day someone in the Anthropology Department would call,
often multiple times, to ask about the fate of the carpenter, who always
turned out to have something extremely pressing to do. By the time a
week was out, I had taken to doing my work on the floor in a kind of
little nest assembled from fallen books, and it had become apparent that
there was one man employed by Buildings and Grounds whose entire job it
was to apologize for the fact that the carpenter hadn’t come. He seemed
like a nice man. He was exceedingly polite and even-tempered, and always
had just a slight trace of wistful melancholy about him, which made him
quite well suited for the job. Still, it’s hard to imagine he was
particularly happy with his choice of career. Most of all: there didn’t
seem any obvious reason the school couldn’t simply get rid of the
position and use the money to hire another carpenter, in which case his
job would not be needed anyway.

4. what box tickers do

I am using the term “box tickers” to refer to employees who exist only
or primarily to allow an organization to be able to claim it is doing
something that, in fact, it is not doing. The following testimony is
from a woman hired to coordinate leisure activities in a care home:

Betsy: Most of my job was to interview residents and fill out a
recreation form that listed their preferences. That form was then logged
on a computer and promptly forgotten about forever. The paper form was
also kept in a binder, for some reason. Completion of the forms was by
far the most important part of my job in the eyes of my boss, and I
would catch hell if I got behind on them. A lot of the time, I would
complete a form for a short-term resident, and they would check out the
next day. I threw away mountains of paper. The interviews mostly just
annoyed the residents, as they knew it was just bullshit paperwork, and
no one was going to care about their individual preferences.

The most miserable thing about box-ticking jobs is that the employee is
usually aware that not only does the box-ticking exercise do nothing
toward accomplishing its ostensible purpose, it actually undermines it,
since it diverts time and resources away from the purpose itself. So
here Betsy was aware that the time she spent processing forms about how
residents might wish to be entertained was time not spent entertaining
them. She did manage to engage in some leisure activities with the
residents (“Fortunately, I was able to play the piano for the residents
every day before dinner, and that was a beautiful time, with singing,
smiling, and tears”), but as so often in such situations, there was a
sense that these moments were indulgences granted her as a reward for
carrying out her primary duties, which consisted of the filling out and
proper disposition of forms.¹⁵

We’re all familiar with box ticking as a form of government. If a
government’s employees are caught doing something very bad—taking
bribes, for instance, or regularly shooting citizens at traffic
stops—the first reaction is invariably to create a “fact-finding
commission” to get to the bottom of things. This serves two functions.
First of all, it’s a way of insisting that, aside from a small group of
miscreants, no one had any idea that any of this was happening (this, of
course, is rarely true); second of all, it’s a way of implying that once
all the facts are in, someone will definitely do something about it.
(This is usually not true, either.) A fact-finding commission is a way
of telling the public that the government is doing something it is not.
But large corporations will behave in exactly the same way if, say, they
are revealed to be employing slaves or child laborers in their garment
factories or dumping toxic waste. All of this is bullshit, but the true
bullshit job category applies to those who are not just there to stave
off the public (this at least could be said to serve some kind of useful
purpose for the company) but to those who do so within the organization
itself.¹⁶

The corporate compliance industry might be considered an intermediary
form. It is explicitly created by (US) government regulation:

Layla: I work in a growing industry born out of the federal regulation
the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act.

Basically US companies have to do due diligence to make sure they aren’t
doing business with corrupt overseas firms. Clients are big
companies—tech, auto companies, etc.—who might have myriad smallish
businesses they supply or work with in places like China (my region).

Our company creates due diligence reports for our clients: basically one
to two hours of internet research that is then edited into a report.
There is a lot of jargon and training that goes into making sure every
report is consistent.

Sometimes the internet reveals something that’s an easy red flag—like a
company’s boss had a criminal case—but I would say the realness/bullshit
factor is 20/80. Unless someone has been criminally charged, I have no
way of knowing from my apartment in Brooklyn if they’ve been handed an
envelope full of cash in Guangzhou.¹⁷

Of course, on some level, all bureaucracies work on this principle: once
you introduce formal measures of success, “reality”—for the
organization—becomes that which exists on paper, and the human reality
that lies behind it is a secondary consideration at best. I vividly
remember the endless discussions that ensued, when I was a junior
professor at Yale University, about a first-year archaeology graduate
student whose husband had died in a car crash on the first day of the
term. For some reason, the shock caused her to develop a mental block on
doing paperwork. She still attended lectures and was an avid participant
in class discussions; and she turned in papers and got excellent grades.
But eventually the professor would always discover she hadn’t formally
signed up for the class. As the éminence grise of the department would
point out during faculty meetings, that was all that really mattered.

“As far as the guys in Registration are concerned, if you don’t get the
forms in on time, you didn’t take the course. So your performance is
completely irrelevant.” Other professors would mumble and fuss, and
there would be occasional careful allusions to her “personal
tragedy”—the exact nature of which was never specified. (I had to learn
about it from other students later on.) But no one raised any
fundamental objections to Registration’s attitude. That was just
reality—from an administrative point of view.

Eventually, after last-minute attempts to have her fill out a sheaf of
late-application appeal documents also met with no response, and after
numerous long soliloquies from the Director of Graduate Studies about
just how inconsiderate it was of her to make things so difficult for
those who were only trying to help her,¹⁸ the student was expelled from
the program on the grounds that anyone so incapable of handling
paperwork was obviously not suited for an academic career.

This mentality seems to increase, not decrease, when government
functions are reorganized to be more like a business, and citizens, for
example, are redefined as “customers.” Mark is Senior Quality and
Performance Officer in a local council in the United Kingdom:

Mark: Most of what I do—especially since moving away from frontline
customer-facing roles—involves ticking boxes, pretending things are
great to senior managers, and generally “feeding the beast” with
meaningless numbers that give the illusion of control. None of which
helps the citizens of that council in the slightest.

I’ve heard an apocryphal story about a Chief Executive who turned on the
fire alarm, so all the staff gathered in the car park. He then told all
the employees who were with a customer when the alarm went off to return
to the building immediately. The other employees could return when one
of the people dealing with a customer needed them for something, and so
on and so forth. If this had happened when I was at that council, I
would have been in the car park for a very long time!

Mark goes on to describe local government as little more than an endless
sequence of box-ticking rituals revolving around monthly “target
figures.” These were put up on posters in the office and coded green for
“improving,” amber for “stable,” and red for “decline.” Supervisors
appeared innocent even of the basic concept of random statistical
variation—or at least, pretended to be—as each month, those with
green-coded figures were rewarded, while those with red urged to do a
better job. Almost none of this had any real bearing on providing
services:

Mark: One project I worked on was to come up with some housing “service
standards.” The project involved playing lip service to customers, and
having long discussions with managers at meetings, before finally
writing up a report that got praised (mainly because it was presented
and laid out attractively) by managers in the meeting. The report then
got filed away—making absolutely no difference to the residents but
still somehow requiring many hours of staff time, not to mention all the
hours the residents themselves spent filling in surveys or attending
focus groups. In my experience, this is how most policy works in local
government.¹⁹

Note here the importance of the physical attractiveness of the report.
This is a theme that comes up frequently in testimonies about
box-ticking operations and even more so in the corporate sector than in
government. If the ongoing importance of a manager is measured by how
many people he has working under him, the immediate material
manifestation of that manager’s power and prestige is the visual quality
of his presentations and reports. The meetings in which such emblems are
displayed might be considered the high rituals of the corporate world.
And just as the retinues of a feudal lord might include servants whose
only role²⁰ was to polish his horses’ armor or tweeze his mustache
before tournaments or pageants, so may present-day executives keep
employees whose sole purpose is to prepare their PowerPoint
presentations or craft the maps, cartoons, photographs, or illustrations
that accompany their reports. Many of these reports are nothing more
than props in a Kabuki-like corporate theater—no one actually reads them
all the way through.²¹ But this doesn’t stop ambitious executives from
cheerfully shelling out half a workman’s yearly wages of company money
just to be able to say, “Ooh yes, we commissioned a report on that.”

Hannibal: I do digital consultancy for global pharmaceutical companies’
marketing departments. I often work with global PR agencies on this, and
write reports with titles like How to Improve Engagement Among Key
Digital Health Care Stakeholders. It is pure, unadulterated bullshit,
and serves no purpose beyond ticking boxes for marketing departments.
But it is very easy to charge a very large amount of money to write
bullshit reports. I was recently able to charge around twelve thousand
pounds to write a two-page report for a pharmaceutical client to present
during a global strategy meeting. The report wasn’t used in the end
because they didn’t manage to get to that agenda point during their
allotted meeting time, but the team I wrote it for was very happy with
it nonetheless.

There are whole minor industries that exist just to facilitate such
box-ticking gestures. I worked for some years for the Interlibrary Loan
Office in the University of Chicago Science Library, and at least 90
percent of what people did there was photocopy and mail out articles
from medical journals with titles such as the Journal of Cell Biology,
Clinical Endocrinology, and the American Journal of Internal Medicine.
(I was lucky. I did something else.) For the first few months, I was
under the naïve impression that these articles were being sent to
doctors. To the contrary, a bemused coworker eventually explained to me:
the overwhelming majority were being sent to lawyers.²² Apparently, if
you are suing a doctor for malpractice, part of the show involves
assembling an impressive pile of scientific papers to plunk down on the
table at an appropriately theatrical moment and then enter into
evidence. While everyone knows that no one will actually read these
papers, there is always the possibility that the defense attorney or one
of his expert witnesses might pick one up at random for inspection—so it
is considered important to ensure your legal aides locate articles that
can at least plausibly be said to bear in some way on the case.

As we will see in later chapters, there are all sorts of different ways
that private companies employ people to be able to tell themselves they
are doing something that they aren’t really doing. Many large
corporations, for instance, maintain their own in-house magazines or
even television channels, the ostensible purpose of which is to keep
employees up to date on interesting news and developments, but which, in
fact, exist for almost no reason other than to allow executives to
experience that warm and pleasant feeling that comes when you see a
favorable story about you in the media, or to know what it’s like to be
interviewed by people who look and act exactly like reporters but never
ask questions you wouldn’t want them to ask. Such venues tend to reward
their writers, producers, and technicians very handsomely, often at two
or three times the market rate. But I’ve never talked to anyone who does
such work full-time who doesn’t say the job is bullshit.²³

5. what taskmasters do

Taskmasters fall into two subcategories. Type 1 contains those whose
role consists entirely of assigning work to others. This job can be
considered bullshit if the taskmaster herself believes that there is no
need for her intervention, and that if she were not there, underlings
would be perfectly capable of carrying on by themselves. Type 1
taskmasters can thus be considered the opposite of flunkies: unnecessary
superiors rather than unnecessary subordinates.

Whereas the first variety of taskmaster is merely useless, the second
variety does actual harm. These are taskmasters whose primary role is to
create bullshit tasks for others to do, to supervise bullshit, or even
to create entirely new bullshit jobs. One might also refer to them as
bullshit generators. Type 2 taskmasters may also have real duties in
addition to their role as taskmaster, but if all or most of what they do
is create bullshit tasks for others, then their own jobs can be
classified as bullshit too.

As one might imagine, it is especially difficult to gather testimonies
from taskmasters. Even if they do secretly think their jobs are useless,
they are much less likely to admit it.²⁴ But I found a small number
willing to come clean.

Ben represents a classic example of type 1. He is a middle manager:

Ben: I have a bullshit job, and it happens to be in middle management.
Ten people work for me, but from what I can tell, they can all do the
work without my oversight. My only function is to hand them work, which
I suppose the people that actually generate the work could do
themselves. (I will say that in a lot of cases, the work that is
assigned is a product of other managers with bullshit jobs, which makes
my job two levels of bullshit.)

I just got promoted to this job, and I spend a lot of my time looking
around and wondering what I’m supposed to be doing. As best I can tell,
I’m supposed to be motivating the workers. I sort of doubt that I’m
earning my salary doing that, even if I’m really trying!

Ben calculates that he spends at least 75 percent of his time allocating
tasks and then monitoring if the underling is doing them, even though,
he insists, he has absolutely no reason to believe the underlings in
question would behave any differently if he weren’t there. He also says
he keeps trying to allocate himself real work on the sly, but when he
does so, his own superiors eventually notice and tell him to cut it out.
But then, when he sent in his testimony, Ben had only been at the job
for two and a half months—which might explain his candor. If he does
succumb eventually and accepts his new role in life, he will come to
understand that, as another testimony put it, “The entire job of middle
management is to ensure the lower-level people hit their ‘productivity
numbers’ ”—and will therefore start coming up with formal statistical
metrics that his underlings can try to falsify.

Being forced to supervise people who don’t need supervision is actually
a fairly common complaint. Here, for instance, is the testimony of an
Assistant Localization Manager named Alphonso:

Alphonso: My job is to oversee and coordinate a team of five
translators. The problem with that is that the team is perfectly capable
of managing itself: they are trained in all the tools they need to use
and they can, of course, manage their time and tasks. So I normally act
as a “task gatekeeper.” Requests come to me through Jira (a bureaucratic
online tool for managing tasks), and I pass them on to the relevant
person or persons. Other than that, I’m in charge of sending periodic
reports to my manager, who, in turn, will incorporate them into “more
important” reports to be sent to the CEO.

This kind of combination of taskmastering and box ticking would appear
to be the very essence of middle management.

In Alphonso’s case, he did actually serve one useful function—but only
because his team of translators, based in Ireland, was assigned so
little work by the central office in Japan that he had to constantly
figure out ways to finagle the reports to make it look like they were
very busy and no one needed to be laid off.

•  •  •

Let us move on, then, to taskmasters of the second type: those who make
up bullshit for others to do.

We may begin with Chloe, who held the post of Academic Dean at a
prominent British university, with a specific responsibility to provide
“strategic leadership” to a troubled campus.

Now, those of us toiling in the academic mills who still like to think
of ourselves as teachers and scholars before all else have come to fear
the word “strategic.” “Strategic mission statements” (or even worse,
“strategic vision documents”) instill a particular terror, since these
are the primary means by which corporate management techniques—setting
up quantifiable methods for assessing performance, forcing teachers and
scholars to spend more and more of their time assessing and justifying
what they do and less and less time actually doing it—are insinuated
into academic life. The same suspicions hold for any document that
repeatedly uses the words “quality,” “excellence,” “leadership,” or
“stakeholder.” So for my own part, my immediate reaction upon hearing
that Chloe was in a “strategic leadership” position was to suspect that
not only was her job bullshit, it actively inserted bullshit into
others’ lives as well.

According to Chloe’s testimony, this was exactly the case—though, if at
first, not precisely for the reasons I imagined.

Chloe: The reason that my Dean’s role was a bullshit job is the same
reason that all nonexecutive Deans, PVCs [Pro-Vice Chancellors], and
other “strategic” roles in universities are bullshit jobs. The real
roles of power and responsibility within a university trace the flow of
money through the organization. An executive PVC or Dean (in other
words, s/he who holds the budget) can cajole, coerce, encourage, bully,
and negotiate with departments about what they can, ought, or might want
to do, using the stick (or carrot) of money. Strategic Deans and other
such roles have no carrots or sticks. They are nonexecutive. They hold
no money, just (as was once described to me) “the power of persuasion
and influence.”

I did not sit on university leadership and so was not part of the
bunfights about targets, overall strategy, performance measures, audits,
etc. I had no budget. I had no authority over the buildings, the
timetable, or any other operational matters. All I could do was come up
with a new strategy that was in effect a re-spin of already agreed-upon
university strategies.

So her primary role was to come up with yet another strategic vision
statement, of the kind that are regularly deployed to justify the number
crunching and box ticking that has become so central to British academic
life.²⁵ But since Chloe had no actual power, it was all meaningless
shadow play. What she did get was what all high-level university
administrators now receive as their primary badge of honor: her own tiny
empire of administrative staff.

Chloe: I was given a 75% full-time equivalent Personal Assistant, a 75%
full-time equivalent “Special Project and Policy Support Officer,” and a
full-time postdoctoral Research Fellow, plus an “expenses” allowance of
twenty thousand pounds. In other words, a shed-load of (public) money
went into supporting a bullshit job. The Project and Policy Support
Officer was there to help me with projects and policies. The PA was
brilliant but ended up just being a glorified travel agent and diary
secretary. The Research Fellow was a waste of time and money because I
am a lone scholar and don’t actually need an assistant.

So, I spent two years of my life making up work for myself and for other
people.

Actually, Chloe appears to have been a very generous boss. As she spent
her own hours developing strategies she knew would be ignored, her
Special Projects Officer “ran around doing timetable scenarios” and
gathering useful statistics, the Personal Assistant kept her diary, and
the Research Fellow spent her time working on her own personal research.
This in itself seems perfectly innocent. At least none of them was doing
any harm. Who knows, maybe the Research Fellow even ended up making an
important contribution to human knowledge of her own. The truly
disturbing thing about the whole arrangement, according to Chloe, was
her ultimate realization that if she had been given real power, she
probably would have done harm. Because after two years as Dean, she was
unwise enough to accept a gig as head of her old department and was thus
able see things from the other side—that is, before quitting six months
later in horror and disgust:

Chloe: My very brief stint as Head of Department reminded me that at the
very minimum, ninety percent of the role is bullshit: Filling out the
forms that the Faculty Dean sends so that she can write her strategy
documents that get sent up the chain of command. Producing a confetti of
paperwork as part of the auditing and monitoring of research activities
and teaching activities. Producing plan after plan after five-year plan
justifying why departments need to have the money and staff they already
have. Doing bloody annual appraisals that go into a drawer never to be
looked at again. And, in order to get these tasks done, as HoD, you ask
your staff to help out. Bullshit proliferation.

So, what do I think? It is not capitalism per se that produces the
bullshit.²⁶ It is managerialist ideologies put into practice in complex
organizations. As managerialism embeds itself, you get entire cadres of
academic staff whose job it is just to keep the managerialist plates
spinning—strategies, performance targets, audits, reviews, appraisals,
renewed strategies, etc., etc.—which happen in an almost wholly and
entirely disconnected fashion from the real lifeblood of universities:
teaching and education.

On this, I will leave Chloe the last word.

Chloe at least was allocated her staff first and only then had to figure
out how to keep them occupied. Tania, who had a series of taskmaster
jobs in both the public and private sectors, provides us with an
explanation of how entirely new bullshit positions can come about. This
last testimony is unique because it explicitly incorporates the typology
developed in this chapter. Toward the end of my research, I laid out my
then nascent five-part division on Twitter, to encourage comments,
amendments, or reactions. Tania felt the terms fit her experience well:

Tania: I might be a taskmaster in your taxonomy of BS jobs. I was one of
two deputy directors of an administrative services office that handled
HR, budget, grants, contracts, and travel for two bureaus with total
resources of about $600 million and a thousand souls.

At some point as a manager (or as a duct taper helping to fill
functional gaps), you realize that you need to hire a new person to meet
an organizational need. Most of the time, the needs I am trying to fill
are either my own need for a box ticker or a duct taper, or the needs of
other managers, sometimes to hire people for non-BS work or to hire
their ration of goons and flunkies.

The reason I need duct tapers is usually because I have to compensate
for poorly functioning program-management systems (both automated and
human workflows) and, in some cases, a poorly functioning box ticker and
even a non-BS-job subordinate who has job tenure and twenty-five years
of outstanding performance ratings from a succession of previous bosses.

This last is important. Even in corporate environments, it is very
difficult to remove an underling for incompetence if that underling has
seniority and a long history of good performance reviews. As in
government bureaucracies, the easiest way to deal with such people is
often to “kick them upstairs”: promote them to a higher post, where they
become somebody else’s problem. But Tania was already at the top of this
particular hierarchy, so an incompetent would continue to be her problem
even if kicked upstairs. She was left with two options. Either she could
move the incompetent into a bullshit position where he had no meaningful
responsibilities, or, if no such position was currently available, she
could leave him in place and hire someone else to really do his job. But
if you take the latter course, another problem arises: you can’t recruit
someone for the incompetent’s job, since the incompetent already has
that job. Instead, you have to make up a new job with an elaborate job
description that you know to be bullshit, because, really, you’re hiring
that person to do something else. Then you have to go through the
motions of pretending the new person is ideally qualified to do the
made-up job you don’t really want him or her to do. All this involves a
great deal of work.

Tania: In organizations with structured job classifications and position
descriptions, there has to be an established and classified job to which
you can recruit someone. (This is a whole professional universe of BS
jobs and boondogglery unto itself. It’s similar to the world of people
who write grant proposals or contract bids.)

So the creation of a BS job often involves creating a whole universe of
BS narrative that documents the purpose and functions of the position as
well as the qualifications required to successfully perform the job,
while corresponding to the format and special bureaucratese prescribed
by the Office of Personnel Management and my agency’s HR staff.

Once that’s done, there has to be a narrative job announcement of the
same ilk. To be eligible for hire, the applicant must present a resume
incorporating all the themes and phraseology of the announcement so that
the hiring software our agency uses will recognize their qualifications.
After the person is hired, their duties must be spelled out in yet
another document that will form the basis for annual performance
appraisals.

I have rewritten candidates’ resumes myself to ensure that they defeat
the hiring software so I can be allowed to interview and select them. If
they don’t make it past the computer, I can’t consider them.

To present a parable version: imagine you are a feudal lord again. You
acquire a gardener. After twenty years of faithful service, the gardener
develops a serious drinking problem. You keep finding him curled up in
flowerbeds, while dandelions sprout everywhere and the sedge begins to
die. But the gardener is well connected, and getting rid of him would
offend people you don’t feel it would be wise to offend. So you acquire
a new servant, ostensibly to polish the doorknobs or perform some other
meaningless task. In fact, you make sure the person you get as doorknob
polisher is actually an experienced gardener. So far, so good. The
problem is, in a corporate environment, you can’t just summon a new
servant, make up an impressive-sounding title for him (“High Seneschal
of the Entryways”), and tell him his real job is to take over when the
gardener is drunk. You have to come up with an elaborate fake
description of what a doorknob polisher would, in fact, do; coach your
new gardener in how to pretend he’s the best doorknob polisher in the
kingdom; and then use the description of his duties as the basis of
periodic box-ticking performance reviews.

And if the gardener sobers up and doesn’t want some young punk messing
with his business—now you have a full-time doorknob polisher on your
hands.

This, according to Tania, is just one of the many ways that taskmasters
end up creating bullshit jobs.

on complex multiform bullshit jobs

These five categories are not exhaustive, and new types could certainly
be proposed. One compelling suggestion I heard was for a category of
“imaginary friends”—that is, people hired ostensibly to humanize an
inhuman corporate environment but who, in fact, mainly force people to
go through elaborate games of make-believe. We will be hearing about
forced “creativity” and “mindfulness” seminars and obligatory charity
events later on; there are workers whose entire careers are based on
dressing up in costumes or otherwise designing silly games to create
rapport in office environments where everyone would probably be happier
just being left alone. These could be seen as box tickers of a sort, but
they could equally be seen as a phenomenon unto themselves.

As the previous examples suggest, it can also sometimes be clear that a
job is bullshit but still be difficult to determine precisely which of
the five categories it belongs to. Often it may seem to contain elements
of several. A box ticker might also be a flunky, or might end up
becoming a mere flunky if the organization’s internal rules change; a
flunky might also be a part-time duct taper or become a full-time duct
taper if a problem arises and, instead of fixing it, the boss decides it
would be easier to just reassign one of his idle minions to deal with
the effects.

Consider Chloe the nonexecutive Dean. In a way, she, too, was a flunky,
since her post was created by higher-ups for largely symbolic reasons.
But she was also a taskmaster to her own subordinates. Since she and her
subordinates didn’t have much to do, she spent some of her time looking
for problems they could duct-tape until she finally came to the
realization that even if she were given some kind of power, most of what
she’d be doing would just be box-ticking exercises anyway.

I received one testimony from a man who worked for a telemarketing
company with a contract with a major IT firm. (Let’s say Apple. I don’t
know if it was Apple. He didn’t tell me which one it was.) His job was
to call up corporations and try to convince them to book a meeting with
an Apple sales representative. The problem was that all of the firms
they would call already had an Apple sales rep permanently attached to
them, often working out of the same office. What’s more, they were
perfectly aware of this.

Jim: I often asked my managers how they would convince prospects of the
value of taking a meeting with a sales rep from our technology giant
customer when they already had a sales rep from that same technology
giant on their premises. Some were as hapless as I was, but the more
effective managers patiently explained to me that I was missing the
point: an appointment-setting call is a game of social niceties.

Prospects don’t take a meeting because they think it might help solve a
business problem; they take it because they fear it would be impolite
not to.

This is as pointless as pointless can be, but how, exactly, would one
classify it? Certainly Jim, being a telemarketer, would qualify as a
goon. But he was a goon whose entire purpose was to maneuver people into
box ticking.

Another ambiguous multiform category are flak catchers, who might be
considered a combination of flunky and duct taper but who have certain
unique characteristics of their own. Flak catchers are subordinates
hired to be at the receiving end of often legitimate complaints but who
are given that role precisely because they have absolutely no authority
to do anything about them.

The flak catcher is, of course, a familiar role in any bureaucracy. The
man-whose-job-it-was-to-apologize-for-the-fact-that-the-carpenter-didn’t-come
might be considered a flak catcher of sorts, but if so, his position was
an unusually cushy one, since he only really had to talk to university
professors and administrators who were unlikely to scream, pound the
table, or become visibly upset. In other contexts, flak catching can be
genuinely dangerous. When I first came to the United Kingdom in 2008,
one of the first things that struck me was the ubiquity of the notices
in public places reminding citizens not to physically attack minor
government officials. (It struck me this should rather go without
saying. But apparently it doesn’t.)

Sometimes flak catchers are well aware of what they’re there for, as
with Nathaniel, who signed up for a work-study program at a college in
Canada, and was assigned to sit in the registrar’s office and call
people to tell them that some form was filled out incorrectly and they’d
have to do it all over again. (“Since all frontline workers were
students, it kept the cap on how pissed off anyone could reasonably get.
The first line you used when someone became agitated was, ‘Sorry, man, I
know it’s BS. I am a student, too.’ ”) Other flak catchers seem
touchingly innocent:

Tim: I work in a college dormitory during the summer. I have worked at
this job for three years, and at this point, it is still completely
unclear to me what my actual duties are.

Primarily, it seems that my job consists of physically occupying space
at the front desk. This is what I spend approximately seventy percent of
my time doing. While engaged in this, I am free to “pursue my own
projects,” which I take to mean mainly screwing around and creating
rubber band balls out of rubber bands I find in the cabinets. When I am
not busy with this, I might be checking the office email account (I have
basically no training or administrative power, of course, so all I can
do is forward these emails to my boss), moving packages from the door
where they get dropped off to the package room, answering phone calls
(again, I know nothing and rarely answer a question to the caller’s
satisfaction), finding ketchup packets from 2005 in the desk drawers, or
calling maintenance to report that a resident has dropped three forks
down the garbage disposal, and now the sink is spewing decayed food.

In addition, often people will yell at me for things that are clearly
not my fault, such as the fact that they dropped three forks down the
garbage disposal, or the fact that there is construction happening
nearby, or the fact that they have not paid their outstanding rent
balance, and I am forbidden from accepting $1,400 in cash, and my boss
does not work on weekends; or the fact that there is no convenient TV
available on which they can watch The Bachelor. I assume it’s a kind of
catharsis for them to do this yelling, since I am nineteen years old and
clearly abjectly powerless.

For these duties, I am paid fourteen dollars an hour.

On the surface, it may seem as if Tim is just a flunky, like the
unnecessary receptionist in the Dutch publishing house: it just wouldn’t
look good to have no one sitting there at all. But, in fact, it seems
likely that insofar as Tim provides a real service to his employers,
it’s precisely by giving angry students someone they can vent at. Why
else, after three years, would they still be keeping him so completely
in the dark? The main reason I hesitate to make flak catcher a category
of bullshit job is because this is a real service. Tim is not making up
for a structural flaw like the man whose job it was to apologize for the
fact that the carpenter didn’t come. He’s there because if you gather
together a large number of teenagers, a few will invariably throw temper
tantrums about stupid things, and Tim’s employer would prefer they
direct their outrage at someone other than himself. In other words,
Tim’s is a shit job, but it’s not entirely clear that it’s a bullshit
one.

a word on second-order bullshit jobs

A final ambiguous category consists of jobs which are in no sense
pointless in and of themselves, but which are ultimately pointless
because they are performed in support of a pointless enterprise. An
obvious example would be the cleaners, security, maintenance, and other
support staff for a bullshit company. Take Kurt’s office that provides
the paperwork required to move German soldiers’ computers down the hall.
Or Nouri’s firm that promoted an algorithm that didn’t work. Or any of a
hundred fake telemarketing or compliance firms. In every one of those
offices, someone has to water the plants. Someone has to clean the
toilets. Someone has to handle pest control. And while it’s true that
most of the companies in question operate in large office buildings
hosting any number of different sorts of enterprise—which usually makes
it unlikely that any one cleaner or electrician or bug sprayer is
providing services exclusively for those who believe themselves to be
engaged in useless occupations—if one were to measure the total
proportion of cleaning or electrical work that is ultimately performed
in support of bullshit, that number would be very high. (One would have
to assume 37 percent, in fact, if the YouGov survey is accurate.²⁷)

If 37 percent of jobs are bullshit, and 37 percent of the remaining 63
percent are in support of bullshit, then slightly over 50 percent of all
labor falls into the bullshit sector in the broadest sense of the
term.²⁸ If you combine this with the bullshitization of useful
occupations (at least 50 percent in office work; presumably less in
other sorts), and the various professions that basically exist only
because everyone is working too hard (dog washers, all-night pizza
deliverymen, to name a few), we could probably get the real workweek
down to fifteen hours—or even twelve—without anyone noticing much.

a final note, with a brief return to the question: is it possible to have a bullshit job and not know it?

The idea of second-order bullshit jobs once again raises the issue of
the degree to which bullshit jobs are just a matter of subjective
judgment and the degree to which they have objective reality. I believe
bullshit jobs to be very real—when I say we can only rely on the
judgment of the worker, I’m simply talking about what we can, as
observers, know about them. I would also remind the reader that I while
I believe it is right to defer to the particular worker about the
factual question of whether their work actually does anything at all,
when it comes to the rather more subtle issue of whether the work in
question does anything of value, I will think it’s the best thing to
defer to the overall opinion of those who work in the industry.
Otherwise we could end up in the rather silly position of saying that of
thirty legal aides working in the same office and performing the same
tasks, twenty-nine have bullshit jobs because they think they do, but
the one true believer who disagrees does not.

Unless one takes the position that there is absolutely no reality at all
except for individual perception, which is philosophically problematic,
it is hard to deny the possibility that people can be wrong about what
they do. For the purposes of this book, this is not that much of a
problem, because what I am mainly interested in is, as I say, the
subjective element; my primary aim is not so much to lay out a theory of
social utility or social value as to understand the psychological,
social, and political effects of the fact that so many of us labor under
the secret belief that our jobs lack social utility or social value.

I am also assuming that people are not usually wrong, so if one really
did want to map out, say, which sectors of the economy are real and
which are bullshit, the best way to do so would be to examine in which
sectors the preponderance of workers feel their jobs are pointless and
in which sectors the preponderance do not. Even more, one would try to
tease out the tacit theory of social value that led them to this
conclusion: if someone says, “My job is completely pointless,” what are
the unspoken criteria being applied? Some, like Tom the special effects
artist, have thought these things through and can simply tell you. In
other cases, workers are not able to articulate a theory, but you can
tell that one must be there, if only on a not completely conscious
level—so you have to tease out the theory by examining the language
people use and observing their gut reactions to the work they do.

For me, this isn’t really a problem. I’m an anthropologist: teasing out
the implicit theory that lies behind people’s everyday actions and
reactions is what anthropologists are trained to do. But then there’s
the problem that people’s theories are not all the same. For instance,
it has come to my attention, while conducting this research, that many
of those employed in the banking industry are privately convinced that
99 percent of what banks do is bullshit that does not benefit humanity
in any way. I can only assume that others working in the industry
disagree with this assessment. Is there any pattern here? Does it vary
with seniority? Are higher-ups more likely to believe in the social
benefits of banking? Or do many of them secretly agree that their work
has no social value but just don’t care? Maybe they even take delight in
the knowledge that their work does not benefit the public, thinking of
themselves as pirates, or scam artists, in some romantic sense? It’s
impossible to say (though Jeffrey Sachs’s testimony in the last chapter
at least suggests that many at the very top simply feel they have a
right to whatever they can get).

The real problem for my approach comes when one has to deal with those
in professions that everyone else regularly invokes as prime examples of
bullshit jobs who don’t seem to think of their jobs that way themselves.
Again, no one has done detailed comparative survey work in this regard,
but I did notice certain interesting patterns in my own data. I heard
from only a smattering of lawyers (though from a large number of legal
aides), only two PR flacks, and not a single lobbyist. Does this mean we
have to conclude these are largely nonbullshit occupations? Not
necessarily. There are any number of other possible explanations for
their silence. For instance, perhaps fewer of them hang around on
Twitter, or maybe the ones that do are more inclined to lie.

I should add as a final note there was really only one class of people
that not only denied their jobs were pointless but expressed outright
hostility to the very idea that our economy is rife with bullshit jobs.
These were—predictably enough—business owners, and anyone else in charge
of hiring and firing. (Tania appears to be something of an exception in
this regard.) In fact, for many years, I have been receiving periodic
unsolicited communications from indignant entrepreneurs and executives
telling me my entire premise is wrong. No one, they insist, would ever
spend company money on an employee who wasn’t needed. Such
communications rarely offer particularly sophisticated arguments. Most
just employ the usual circular argument that since, in a market economy,
none of the things described in this chapter could have actually
occurred, that therefore they didn’t, so all the people who are
convinced their jobs are worthless must be deluded, or self-important,
or simply don’t understand their real function, which is fully visible
only to those above.

One might be tempted to conclude from these responses that there is at
least one class of people who genuinely don’t realize their jobs are
bullshit. Except, of course, what CEOs do isn’t really bullshit. For
better or for worse, their actions do make a difference in the world.
They’re just blind to all the bullshit they create.


Chapter 3


Why Do Those in Bullshit Jobs Regularly Report Themselves Unhappy?


(On Spiritual Violence, Part 1)

Workplaces are fascist. They’re cults designed to eat your life; bosses
hoard your minutes jealously like dragons hoard gold.

—Nouri

In this chapter, I’d like to start exploring some of the moral and
psychological effects of being trapped inside a bullshit job.

In particular, I want to ask the obvious question: Why is this even a
problem? Or to phrase it more precisely: Why does having a pointless job
so regularly cause people to be miserable? On the face of it, it’s not
obvious that it should. After all, we’re talking about people who are
effectively being paid—often very good money—to do nothing. One might
imagine that those being paid to do nothing would consider themselves
fortunate, especially when they are more or less left to themselves. But
while every now and then I did hear testimonies from those who said they
couldn’t believe their luck in landing such a position, the remarkable
thing is how very few of them there were.¹ Many, in fact, seemed
perplexed by their own reaction, unable to understand why their
situation left them feeling so worthless or depressed. Indeed, the fact
that there was no clear explanation for their feelings—no story they
could tell themselves about the nature of their situation and what was
wrong about it—often contributed to their misery. At least a galley
slave knows that he’s oppressed. An office worker forced to sit for
seven and a half hours a day pretending to type into a screen for $18 an
hour, or a junior member of a consultancy team forced to give the exact
same seminar on innovation and creativity week in and week out for
$50,000 a year, is just confused.

In an earlier book about debt, I wrote about the phenomenon of “moral
confusion.” I took as my example the fact that throughout human history,
most people seem to have agreed both that paying back one’s debts was
the essence of morality and that moneylenders were evil. While the rise
of bullshit jobs is a comparatively recent phenomenon, I think it
creates a similar moral embarrassment. On the one hand, everyone is
encouraged to assume that human beings will always tend to seek their
best advantage, that is, to find themselves a situation where they can
get the most benefit for the least expenditure of time and effort, and
for the most part, we do assume this—especially if we are talking about
such matters in the abstract. (“We can’t just give poor people handouts!
Then they won’t have any incentive to look for work!”) On the other
hand, our own experience, and those of the people we are closest to,
tends to contradict these assumptions at many points. People almost
never act and react to situations in quite the way our theories of human
nature would predict. The only reasonable conclusion is that, at least
in certain key essentials, these theories about human nature are wrong.

In this chapter, I don’t just want to ask why people are so unhappy
doing what seems to them meaningless make-work, but to think more deeply
about what that unhappiness can tell us about what people are and what
they are basically about.

about one young man apparently handed a sinecure who nonetheless found himself unable to handle the situation

I will begin with a story. The following is the tale of a young man
named Eric, whose first experience of the world of work was of a job
that proved absolutely, even comically, pointless.

Eric: I’ve had many, many awful jobs, but the one that was undoubtedly
pure, liquid bullshit was my first “professional job” postgraduation, a
dozen years ago. I was the first in my family to attend university, and
due to a profound naïveté about the purpose of higher education, I
somehow expected that it would open up vistas of hitherto-unforeseen
opportunity.

Instead, it offered graduate training schemes at PricewaterhouseCoopers,
KPMG, etc. I preferred to sit on the dole for six months using my
graduate library privileges to read French and Russian novels before the
dole forced me to attend an interview which, sadly, led to a job.

That job involved working for a large design firm as its “Interface
Administrator.” The Interface was a content management system—an
intranet with a graphical user interface, basically—designed to enable
this company’s work to be shared across its seven offices around the UK.

Eric soon discovered that he was hired only because of a communication
problem in the organization. In other words, he was a duct taper: the
entire computer system was necessary only because the partners were
unable to pick up the phone and coordinate with one another:

Eric: The firm was a partnership, with each office managed by one
partner. All of them seem to have attended one of three private schools
and the same design school (the Royal College of Art). Being
unbelievably competitive fortysomething public schoolboys, they often
tried to outcompete one another to win bids, and on more than one
occasion, two different offices had found themselves arriving at the
same client’s office to pitch work and having to hastily combine their
bids in the parking lot of some dismal business park. The Interface was
designed to make the company supercollaborative, across all of its
offices, to ensure that this (and other myriad fuckups) didn’t happen
again, and my job was to help develop it, run it, and sell it to the
staff.

The problem was, it soon became apparent that Eric wasn’t even really a
duct taper. He was a box ticker: one partner had insisted on the
project, and, rather than argue with him, the others pretended to agree.
Then they did everything in their power to make sure it didn’t work.

Eric: I should have realized that this was one partner’s idea that no
one else actually wanted to implement. Why else would they be paying a
twenty-one-year-old history graduate with no IT experience to do this?
They’d bought the cheapest software they could find, from a bunch of
absolute crooks, so it was buggy, prone to crashing, and looked like a
Windows 3.1 screen saver. The entire workforce was paranoid that it was
designed to monitor their productivity, record their keystrokes, or flag
that they were torrenting porn on the company internet, and so they
wanted nothing to do with it. As I had absolutely no background in
coding or software development, there was very little I could do to
improve the thing, so I was basically tasked with selling and managing a
badly functioning, unwanted turd. After a few months, I realized that
there was very little for me to do at all most days, aside from answer a
few queries from confused designers wanting to know how to upload a
file, or search for someone’s email on the address book.

The utter pointlessness of his situation soon led to subtle—and then,
increasingly unsubtle—acts of rebellion:

Eric: I started arriving late and leaving early. I extended the company
policy of “a pint on Friday lunchtime” into “pints every lunchtime.” I
read novels at my desk. I went out for lunchtime walks that lasted three
hours. I almost perfected my French reading ability, sitting with my
shoes off with a copy of Le Monde and a Petit Robert. I tried to quit,
and my boss offered me a £2,600 raise, which I reluctantly accepted.
They needed me precisely because I didn’t have the skills to implement
something that they didn’t want to implement, and they were willing to
pay to keep me. (Perhaps one could paraphrase Marx’s Economic and
Philosophical Manuscripts of 1844 here: to forestall their fears of
alienation from their own labor, they had to sacrifice me up to a
greater alienation from potential human growth.)

As time went on, Eric became more and more flagrant in his defiance,
hoping he could find something he could do that might actually cause him
to be fired. He started showing up to work drunk and taking paid
“business trips” for nonexistent meetings:

Eric: A colleague from the Edinburgh office, to whom I had poured out my
woes when drunk at the annual general meeting, started to arrange phony
meetings with me, once on a golf course near Gleneagles, me hacking at
the turf in borrowed golf shoes two sizes too large. After getting away
with that, I started arranging fictional meetings with people in the
London office. The firm would put me up in a nicotine-coated room in the
St. Athans in Bloomsbury, and I would meet old London friends for some
good old-fashioned all-day drinking in Soho pubs, which often turned
into all-night drinking in Shoreditch. More than once, I returned to my
office the following Monday in last Wednesday’s work shirt. I’d long
since stopped shaving, and by this point, my hair looked like it was
robbed from a Zeppelin roadie. I tried on two more occasions to quit,
but both times my boss offered me more cash. By the end, I was being
paid a stupid sum for a job that, at most, involved me answering the
phone twice a day. I eventually broke down on the platform of Bristol
Temple Meads train station one late summer’s afternoon. I’d always
fancied seeing Bristol, and so I decided to “visit” the Bristol office
to look at “user take-up.” I actually spent three days taking MDMA at an
anarcho-syndicalist house party in St. Pauls, and the dissociative
comedown made me realize how profoundly upsetting it was to live in a
state of utter purposelessness.

After heroic efforts, Eric did finally manage to get himself replaced:

Eric: Eventually, responding to pressure, my boss hired a junior fresh
out of a computer science degree to see if some improvements could be
made to our graphical user interface. On this kid’s first day at work, I
wrote him a list of what needed to be done—and then immediately wrote my
resignation letter, which I posted under my boss’s door when he took his
next vacation, surrendering my last paycheck over the telephone in lieu
of the statutory notice period. I flew that same week to Morocco to do
very little in the coastal town of Essaouira. When I came back, I spent
the next six months living in a squat, growing my own vegetables on
three acres of land. I read your Strike! piece when it first came out.
It might have been a revelation for some that capitalism creates
unnecessary jobs in order for the wheels to merely keep on turning, but
it wasn’t to me.

The remarkable thing about this story is that many would consider Eric’s
a dream job. He was being paid good money to do nothing. He was also
almost completely unsupervised. He was given respect and every
opportunity to game the system. Yet despite all that, it gradually
destroyed him.

Why?

To a large degree, I think, this is really a story about social class.
Eric was a young man from a working-class background—a child of factory
workers, no less—fresh out of college and full of expectations, suddenly
confronted with a jolting introduction to the “real world.” Reality, in
this instance, consisted of the fact that (a) while middle-aged
executives can be counted on to simply assume that any twentysomething
white male will be at least something of a computer whiz (even if, as in
this case, he had no computer training of any kind), and (b) might even
grant someone like Eric a cushy situation if it suited their momentary
purposes, (c) they basically saw him as something of a joke. Which his
job almost literally was. His presence in the company was very close to
a practical joke some designers were playing on one another.

Even more, what drove Eric crazy was the fact there was simply no way he
could construe his job as serving any sort of purpose. He couldn’t even
tell himself he was doing it to feed his family; he didn’t have one yet.
Coming from a background where most people took pride in making,
maintaining, and fixing things, or anyway felt that was the sort of
thing people should take pride in, he had assumed that going to
university and moving into the professional world would mean doing the
same sorts of thing on a grander, even more meaningful, scale. Instead,
he ended up getting hired precisely for what he wasn’t able to do. He
tried to just resign. They kept offering him more money. He tried to get
himself fired. They wouldn’t fire him. He tried to rub their faces in
it, to make himself a parody of what they seemed to think he was. It
didn’t make the slightest bit of difference.

To get a sense of what was really happening here, let us imagine a
second history major—we can refer to him as anti-Eric—a young man of a
professional background but placed in exactly the same situation. How
might anti-Eric have behaved differently? Well, likely as not, he would
have played along with the charade. Instead of using phony business
trips to practice forms of self-annihilation, anti-Eric would have used
them to accumulate social capital, connections that would eventually
allow him to move on to better things. He would have treated the job as
a stepping-stone, and this very project of professional advancement
would have given him a sense of purpose. But such attitudes and
dispositions don’t come naturally. Children from professional
backgrounds are taught to think like that from an early age. Eric, who
had not been trained to act and think this way, couldn’t bring himself
to do it. As a result, he ended up, for a time, at least, in a squat
growing tomatoes.²

concerning the experience of falseness and purposelessness at the core of bullshit jobs, and the importance now felt of conveying the experience of falseness and purposelessness to youth

In a deeper way, Eric’s story brings together almost everything that
those with bullshit jobs say is distressing about their situation. It’s
not just the purposelessness—though certainly, it’s that. It’s also the
falseness. I’ve already mentioned the indignation telemarketers feel
when they are forced to try to trick or pressure people into doing
something they think is against their best interests. This is a
complicated feeling. We don’t even really have a name for it. When we
think of scams, after all, we think of grifters, confidence artists;
they are easy to see as romantic figures, rebels living by their wits,
as well as admirable because they have achieved a certain form of
mastery. This is why they make acceptable heroes in Hollywood movies. A
confidence artist could easily take delight in what she’s doing. But
being forced to scam someone is altogether different. In such
circumstances, it’s hard not to feel you’re ultimately in the same
situation as the person you’re scamming: you’re both being pressured and
manipulated by your employer, only in your case, with the added
indignity that you’re also betraying the trust of someone whose side you
should be on.

One might imagine the feelings sparked by most bullshit jobs would be
very different. After all, if the employee is scamming anyone, it’s his
employer, and he’s doing it with his employer’s full consent. But
somehow, this is precisely what many report to be so disturbing about
the situation. You don’t even have the satisfaction of knowing you’re
putting something over on someone. You’re not even living your own lie.
Most of the time, you’re not even quite living somebody else’s lie,
either. Your job is more like a boss’s unzippered fly that everyone can
see but also knows better than to mention.

If anything, this appears to compound the sense of purposelessness.

Perhaps anti-Eric would, indeed, have found a way to turn around that
purposelessness and seen himself as in on the joke; perhaps if he were a
real go-getter, he’d have used his administrative skills to effectively
take over the office; but even children of the rich and powerful often
find this difficult to pull off. The following testimony gives a sense
of the moral confusion they can often feel:

Rufus: I got the job because my dad was a Vice President at the company.
I was charged with handling complaints. Given that it was (in name) a
biomedical company, all returned product was considered a biohazard. So
I was able to spend a lot of time in a room all by myself, with no
supervision and essentially no work to do. The bulk of my memory of the
job involves either playing Minesweeper or listening to podcasts.

I did spend hours poring over spreadsheets, tracking changes on Word
documents, etc., but I guarantee you that I contributed nothing to this
company. I spent every minute at the office wearing headphones. I paid
only the smallest attention possible to the people around me and the
“work” I was assigned.

I hated every minute working there. In fact, more days than not, I went
home early from work, took two- or three-hour lunch breaks, spent hours
“in the bathroom” (wandering around), and nobody ever said a word. I was
compensated for every minute.

Thinking back on it, it was kind of a dream job.

Retrospectively, Rufus understands that he got a ridiculously sweet
deal—he seems rather baffled, actually, why he hated the job so much at
the time. But surely he couldn’t have been entirely unaware of how his
coworkers must have seen him: boss’s kid getting paid to goof off; feels
he’s too good to talk to them; supervisors clearly informed “hands off.”
It could hardly have evoked warm feelings.

Still, this story raises another question: If Rufus’s father didn’t
actually expect his son to do the job, why did he insist he take it in
the first place? He could presumably just as easily have given his son
an allowance, or, alternately, assigned him a job that needed doing,
coached him on his duties, and taken some minimal effort to make sure
those tasks were actually carried out. Instead, he seems to have felt it
was more important for Rufus to be able to say he had a job than to
actually acquire work experience.³

That’s puzzling. It’s all the more puzzling because the father’s
attitude appears to be extremely common. It wasn’t always so. There was
once a time when most students in college whose parents could afford it,
or who qualified for scholarships or assistance, received a stipend. It
was considered a good thing that there might be a few years in a young
man’s or woman’s life where money was not the primary motivation; where
he or she could thus be free to pursue other forms of value: say,
philosophy, poetry, athletics, sexual experimentation, altered states of
consciousness, politics, or the history of Western art. Nowadays it is
considered important they should work. However, it is not considered
important they should work at anything useful. In fact, like Rufus
they’re barely expected to work at all, just to show up and pretend to
do so. A number of students wrote just to complain to me about this
phenomenon. Here Patrick reflects on his job as a casual retail
assistant in a student union convenience store:

Patrick: I didn’t actually need the job (I was getting by financially
without it), but after some pressure from my family, I applied for it
out of some warped sense of obligation to get experience in work to
prepare me for whatever lay ahead beyond university. In reality, the job
just took away time and energy from other activities I had been doing,
like campaigning and activism, or reading for pleasure, which I think
made me resent it even more.

The job was pretty standard for a student union convenience store and
involved serving people on the till (could have easily been done by a
machine) with the explicitly stated requirement, in my performance
review after my trial period, that I “should be more positive and happy
when serving customers.” So not only did they want me to do work that
could have been performed by a machine just as effectively, they wanted
me to pretend that I was enjoying that state of affairs.

It was just about bearable if my shift was during lunchtime, when it got
really busy, so time went by relatively quickly. Being on shift on a
Sunday afternoon when nobody frequented the SU was just appalling. They
had this thing about us not being able to just do nothing, even if the
shop was empty. So we couldn’t just sit at the till and read a magazine.
Instead, the manager made up utterly meaningless work for us to do, like
going round the whole shop and checking that things were in date (even
though we knew for a fact they were because of the turnover rate) or
rearranging products on shelves in even more pristine order than they
already were.

The very, very worst thing about the job was that it gave you so much
time to think, because the work was so lacking in any intellectual
demand. So I just thought so much about how bullshit my job was, how it
could be done by a machine, how much I couldn’t wait for full communism,
and just endlessly theorized the alternatives to a system where millions
of human beings have to do that kind of work for their whole lives in
order to survive. I couldn’t stop thinking about how miserable it made
me.

This is what happens, of course, when you first open the entire world of
social and political possibility to a young mind by sending it to
college and then tell it to stop thinking and tidy up already tidy
shelves. Parents now feel it is important that young minds should have
this experience. But what, precisely, was Patrick supposed to be
learning through this exercise?

Here’s another example:

Brendan: I’m at a small college in Massachusetts training to be a high
school history teacher. Recently I started work at the dining commons.

A coworker told me on my first day: “Half of this job is making things
look clean, and the other half is looking busy.”

For the first couple of months, they had me “monitor” the back room. I
would clean the buffet slider, restock the desserts, and wipe down
tables when people left. It’s not a big room, so usually I could do all
my tasks in five minutes out of every thirty. I ended up being able to
get a lot of reading for my coursework done.

However, sometimes one of the less understanding supervisors would be
working. In that case, I would have to keep the corner of my eye open at
all times in order to make sure they would always see me acting busy. I
have no idea why the job description couldn’t just acknowledge that I
wouldn’t have much to do—if I didn’t have to spend so much time and
energy looking busy, I could get my reading and the table cleaning done
quicker and more efficiently.

But of course, efficiency is not the point. In fact, if we are simply
talking about teaching students about efficient work habits, the best
thing would be to leave them to their studies. Schoolwork is, after all,
real work in every sense except that you don’t get paid for it (though
if you’re receiving a scholarship or an allowance, you actually are
getting paid for it). In fact, like almost all the other activities
Patrick or Brendan might have been engaged in had they not been obliged
to take on “real world” jobs, their classwork is actually more real than
the largely make-work projects they ended up being forced to do.
Schoolwork has real content. One must attend classes, do the readings,
write exercises or papers, and be judged on the results. But in
practical terms, this appears to be exactly what makes schoolwork appear
inadequate to those authorities—parents, teachers, governments.
administrators—who have all come to feel that they must also teach
students about the real world. It’s too results-oriented. You can study
any way you want to so long as you pass the test. A successful student
has to learn self-discipline, but this is not the same as learning how
to operate under orders. Of course, the same is true of most of the
other projects and activities students might otherwise be engaged in:
whether rehearsing for plays, playing in a band, political activism, or
baking cookies or growing pot to sell to fellow students. All of which
might be appropriate training for a society of self-employed adults, or
even one made up primarily of the largely autonomous professionals
(doctors, lawyers, architects, and so forth) that universities were once
designed to produce. It might even be appropriate to train young people
for the democratically organized collectives that were the subject of
Patrick’s reveries about full communism. But as Brendan points out, it
is very much not preparation for work in today’s increasingly
bullshitized workplace:

Brendan: A lot of these student work jobs have us doing some sort of
bullshit task like scanning IDs, or monitoring empty rooms, or cleaning
already-clean tables. Everyone is cool with it, because we get money
while we study, but otherwise there’s absolutely no reason not to just
give students the money and automate or eliminate the work.

I’m not altogether familiar with how the whole thing works, but a lot of
this work is funded by the Feds and tied to our student loans. It’s part
of a whole federal system designed to assign students a lot of
debt—thereby promising to coerce them into labor in the future, as
student debts are so hard to get rid of—accompanied by a bullshit
education program designed to train and prepare us for our future
bullshit jobs.

Brendan has a point, and I’ll be returning to his analysis in a later
chapter. Here, though, I want to focus on what students forced into
these make-work jobs actually learn from them—lessons that they do not
learn from more traditional student occupations and pursuits such as
studying for tests, planning parties, and so on. Even judging by
Brendan’s and Patrick’s accounts (and I could easily reference many
others), I think we can conclude that from these jobs, students learn at
least five things:

1. how to operate under others’ direct supervision;

2. how to pretend to work even when nothing needs to done;

3. that one is not paid money to do things, however useful or important,
that one actually enjoys;

4. that one is paid money to do things that are in no way useful or
important and that one does not enjoy; and

5. that at least in jobs requiring interaction with the public, even
when one is being paid to carry out tasks one does not enjoy, one also
has to pretend to be enjoying it.

This is what Brendan meant by how make-work student employment was a way
of “preparing and training” students for their future bullshit jobs. He
was studying to be a high school history teacher—a meaningful job,
certainly, but, as with almost all teaching positions in the United
States, one where the proportion of hours spent teaching in class or
preparing lessons has declined, while the total number of hours
dedicated to administrative tasks has increased dramatically. This is
what Brendan is suggesting: that it’s no coincidence that the more jobs
requiring college degrees become suffused in bullshit, the more pressure
is put on college students to learn about the real world by dedicating
less of their time to self-organized goal-directed activity and more of
it to tasks that will prepare them for the more mindless aspects of
their future careers.

why many of our fundamental assumptions on human motivation appear to be incorrect

I do not think there is any thrill that can go through the human heart
like that felt by the inventor as he sees some creation of the brain
unfolding to success . . . such emotions make a man forget food, sleep,
friends, love, everything.

—Nikola Tesla

If the argument of the previous section is correct, one could perhaps
conclude that Eric’s problem was just that he hadn’t been sufficiently
prepared for the pointlessness of the modern workplace. He had passed
through the old education system—some traces of it are left—designed to
prepare students to actually do things. This led to false expectations
and an initial shock of disillusionment that he could not overcome.

Perhaps. But I don’t think that’s the full story. There is something
much deeper going on here. Eric might have been unusually ill-prepared
to endure the meaninglessness of his first job, but just about everyone
does see such meaninglessness as something to be endured—despite the
fact that we are all trained, in one way or another, to assume that
human beings should be perfectly delighted to find themselves in his
situation of being paid good money not to work.

Let us return to our initial problem. We may begin by asking why we
assume that someone being paid to do nothing should consider himself
fortunate. What is the basis of that theory of human nature from which
this follows? The obvious place to look is at economic theory, which has
turned this kind of thought into a science. According to classical
economic theory, homo oeconomicus, or “economic man”—that is, the model
human being that lies behind every prediction made by the discipline—is
assumed to be motivated above all by a calculus of costs and benefits.
All the mathematical equations by which economists bedazzle their
clients, or the public, are founded on one simple assumption: that
everyone, left to his own devices, will choose the course of action that
provides the most of what he wants for the least expenditure of
resources and effort. It is the simplicity of the formula that makes the
equations possible: if one were to admit that humans have complicated
motivations, there would be too many factors to take into account, it
would be impossible to properly weight them, and predictions could not
be made. Therefore, while an economist will say that while of course
everyone is aware that human beings are not really selfish, calculating
machines, assuming that they are makes it possible to explain a very
large proportion of what humans do, and this proportion—and only this—is
the subject matter of economic science.

This is a reasonable statement as far as it goes. The problem is there
are many domains of human life where the assumption clearly doesn’t
hold—and some of them are precisely in the domain of what we like to
call the economy. If “minimax” (minimize cost, maximize benefit)
assumptions were correct, people like Eric would be delighted with their
situation. He was receiving a lot of money for virtually zero
expenditure of resources and energy—basically bus fare, plus the amount
of calories it took to walk around the office and answer a couple of
calls. Yet all the other factors (class, expectations, personality, and
so on) don’t determine whether someone in that situation would be
unhappy—since it would appear that just about anyone in that situation
would be unhappy. They only really affect how unhappy they will be.

Much of our public discourse about work starts from the assumption that
the economists’ model is correct. People have to be compelled to work;
if the poor are to be given relief so they don’t actually starve, it has
to be delivered in the most humiliating and onerous ways possible,
because otherwise they would become dependent and have no incentive to
find proper jobs.⁴ The underlying assumption is that if humans are
offered the option to be parasites, of course they’ll take it.

In fact, almost every bit of available evidence indicates that this is
not the case. Human beings certainly tend to rankle over what they
consider excessive or degrading work; few may be inclined to work at the
pace or intensity that “scientific managers” have, since the 1920s,
decided they should; people also have a particular aversion to being
humiliated. But leave them to their own devices, and they almost
invariably rankle even more at the prospect of having nothing useful to
do.

There is endless empirical evidence to back this up. To choose a couple
of particularly colorful examples: working-class people who win the
lottery and find themselves multimillionaires rarely quit their jobs
(and if they do, usually they soon say they regret it).⁵ Even in those
prisons where inmates are provided free food and shelter and are not
actually required to work, denying them the right to press shirts in the
prison laundry, clean latrines in the prison gym, or package computers
for Microsoft in the prison workshop is used as a form of punishment—and
this is true even where the work doesn’t pay or where prisoners have
access to other income.⁶ Here we are dealing with people who can be
assumed to be among the least altruistic society has produced, yet they
find sitting around all day watching television a far worse fate than
even the harshest and least rewarding forms of labor.

The redeeming aspect of prison work is, as Dostoyevsky noted, that at
least it was seen to be useful—even if it is not useful to the prisoner
himself.

Actually, one of the few positive side effects of a prison system is
that, simply by providing us with information of what happens, and how
humans behave under extreme situations of deprivation, we can learn
basic truths about what it means to be human. To take another example:
we now know that placing prisoners in solitary confinement for more than
six months at a stretch inevitably results in physically observable
forms of brain damage. Human beings are not just social animals; they
are so intrinsically social that if they are cut off from relations with
other humans, they begin to decay physically.

I suspect the work experiment can be seen in similar terms. Humans may
or may not be cut out for regular nine-to-five labor discipline—it seems
to me that there is considerable evidence that they aren’t—but even
hardened criminals generally find the prospect of just sitting around
doing nothing even worse.

Why should this be the case? And just how deeply rooted are such
dispositions in human psychology? There is reason to believe the answer
is: very deep indeed.

•  •  •

As early as 1901, the German psychologist Karl Groos discovered that
infants express extraordinary happiness when they first figure out they
can cause predictable effects in the world, pretty much regardless of
what that effect is or whether it could be construed as having any
benefit to them. Let’s say they discover that they can move a pencil by
randomly moving their arms. Then they realize they can achieve the same
effect by moving in the same pattern again. Expressions of utter joy
ensue. Groos coined the phrase “the pleasure at being the cause,”
suggesting that it is the basis for play, which he saw as the exercise
of powers simply for the sake of exercising them.

This discovery has powerful implications for understanding human
motivation more generally. Before Groos, most Western political
philosophers—and after them, economists and social scientists—had been
inclined either to assume that humans seek power simply because of an
inherent desire for conquest and domination, or else for a purely
practical desire to guarantee access to the sources of physical
gratification, safety, or reproductive success. Groos’s findings—which
have since been confirmed by a century of experimental
evidence—suggested maybe there was something much simpler behind what
Nietzsche called the “will to power.” Children come to understand that
they exist, that they are discrete entities separate from the world
around them, largely by coming to understand that “they” are the thing
which just caused something to happen—the proof of which is the fact
that they can make it happen again.⁷ Crucially, too, this realization
is, from the very beginning, marked with a species of delight that
remains the fundamental background of all subsequent human experience.⁸
It is hard perhaps to think of our sense of self as grounded in action
because when we are truly engrossed in doing something—especially
something we know how to do very well, from running a race to solving a
complicated logical problem—we tend to forget that we exist. But even as
we dissolve into what we do, the foundational “pleasure at being the
cause” remains, as it were, the unstated ground of our being.

Groos himself was primarily interested in asking why humans play games,
and why they become so passionate and excited over the outcome even when
they know it makes no difference who wins or loses outside the confines
of the game itself. He saw the creation of imaginary worlds as simply an
extension of his core principle. This might be so. But what we’re
concerned with here, unfortunately, is less with the implications for
healthy development and more with what happens when something goes
terribly wrong. In fact, experiments have also shown that if one first
allows a child to discover and experience the delight in being able to
cause a certain effect, and then suddenly denies it to them, the results
are dramatic: first rage, refusal to engage, and then a kind of
catatonic folding in on oneself and withdrawing from the world entirely.
Psychiatrist and psychoanalyst Francis Broucek called this the “trauma
of failed influence” and suspected that such traumatic experiences might
lie behind many mental health issues later in life.⁹

If this is so, then it begins to give us a sense of why being trapped in
a job where one is treated as if one were usefully employed, and has to
play along with the pretense that one is usefully employed, but at the
same time, is keenly aware one is not usefully employed, would have
devastating effects. It’s not just an assault on the person’s sense of
self-importance but also a direct attack on the very foundations of the
sense that one even is a self. A human being unable to have a meaningful
impact on the world ceases to exist.

a brief excursus on the history of make-work and particularly of the concept of buying other people’s time

Boss: How come you’re not working?

Worker: There’s nothing to do.

Boss: Well, you’re supposed to pretend like you’re working.

Worker: Hey, I got a better idea. Why don’t you pretend like I’m
working? You get paid more than me.

—Bill Hicks comedy routine

Groos’s theory of “the pleasure at being the cause” led him to devise a
theory of play as make-believe: humans invent games and diversions, he
proposed, for the exact same reason the infant takes delight in his
ability to move a pencil. We wish to exercise our powers as an end in
themselves. The fact that the situation is made up doesn’t detract from
this; in fact, it adds another level of contrivance. This, Groos
suggested—and here he was falling back on the ideas of Romantic German
philosopher Friedrich Schiller—is really all that freedom is. (Schiller
argued that the desire to create art is simply a manifestation of the
urge to play as the exercise of freedom for its own sake as well.¹⁰)
Freedom is our ability to make things up just for the sake of being able
to do so.

Yet at the same time, it is precisely the make-believe aspect of their
work that student workers like Patrick and Brendan find the most
infuriating—indeed, that just about anyone who’s ever had a wage-labor
job that was closely supervised invariably finds the most maddening
aspect of her job. Working serves a purpose, or is meant to do so. Being
forced to pretend to work just for the sake of working is an indignity,
since the demand is perceived—rightly—as the pure exercise of power for
its own sake. If make-believe play is the purest expression of human
freedom, make-believe work imposed by others is the purest expression of
lack of freedom. It’s not entirely surprising, then, that the first
historical evidence we have for the notion that certain categories of
people really ought to be working at all times, even if there’s nothing
to do, and that work needs to be made up to fill their time, even if
there’s nothing that really needs doing, refers to people who are not
free: prisoners and slaves, two categories that historically have
largely overlapped.¹¹

•  •  •

It would be fascinating, though probably impossible, to write a history
of make-work—to explore when and in what circumstances “idleness” first
came to be seen as a problem, or even a sin. I’m not aware that anyone
has actually tried to do this.¹² But all evidence we have indicates that
the modern form of make-work that Patrick and Brendan are complaining
about is historically new. This is in part because most people who have
ever existed have assumed that normal human work patterns take the form
of periodic intense bursts of energy, followed by relaxation, followed
by slowly picking up again toward another intense bout. This is what
farming is like, for instance: all-hands-on-deck mobilization around
planting and harvest, but otherwise, whole seasons taken up largely by
minding and mending things, minor projects, and puttering around. But
even daily tasks, or projects such as building a house or preparing for
a feast, tend to take roughly this form. In other words, the traditional
student’s pattern of lackadaisical study leading up to intense cramming
before exams and then slacking off again—I like to refer to it as
“punctuated hysteria”—is typical of how human beings have always tended
to go about necessary tasks if no one forces them to act otherwise.¹³
Some students may engage in cartoonishly exaggerated versions of this
pattern.¹⁴ But good students figure out how to get the pace roughly
right. Not only is it what humans will do if left to their own devices,
but there is no reason to believe that forcing them to act otherwise is
likely to cause greater efficiency or productivity. Often it will have
precisely the opposite effect.

Obviously, some tasks are more dramatic and therefore lend themselves
better to alternating intense, frenetic bursts of activity and relative
torpor. This has always been true. Hunting animals is more demanding
than gathering vegetables, even if the latter is done in sporadic
bursts; building houses better lends itself to heroic efforts than
cleaning them. As these examples imply, in most human societies, men
tend to try, and usually succeed, to monopolize the most exciting,
dramatic kinds of work—they’ll set the fires that burn down the forest
on which they plant their fields, for example, and, if they can,
relegate to women the more monotonous and time-consuming tasks, such as
weeding. One might say that men will always take for themselves the kind
of jobs one can tell stories about afterward, and try to assign women
the kind you tell stories during.¹⁵ The more patriarchal the society,
the more power men have over women, the more this will tend to be the
case. The same pattern tends to reproduce itself whenever one group
clearly is in a position of power over another, with very few
exceptions. Feudal lords, insofar as they worked at all, were
fighters¹⁶—their lives tended to alternate between dramatic feats of
arms and near-total idleness and torpor. Peasants and servants obviously
were expected to work more steadily. But even so, their work schedule
was nothing remotely as regular or disciplined as the current
nine-to-five—the typical medieval serf, male or female, probably worked
from dawn to dusk for twenty to thirty days out of any year, but just a
few hours a day otherwise, and on feast days, not at all. And feast days
were not infrequent.

The main reason why work could remain so irregular was because it was
largely unsupervised. This is true not only of medieval feudalism but
also of most labor arrangements anywhere until relatively recent times.
It was true even if those labor arrangements were strikingly unequal. If
those on the bottom produced what was required of them, those on top
didn’t really feel they should have to be bothered knowing what that
entailed. We see this again quite clearly in gender relations. The more
patriarchal a society, the more segregated men’s and women’s quarters
will also tend to be; as a result, the less men tend to know about
women’s work, and certainly, the less able men would be able to perform
women’s work if the women were to disappear. (Women, in contrast,
usually are well aware of what men’s work entails and are often able to
get on quite well were the men for some reason to vanish—this is why in
so many past societies, large percentages of the male population could
take off for long periods for war or trade without causing any
significant disruption.) Insofar as women in patriarchal societies were
supervised, they were supervised by other women. Now, this did often
involve a notion that women, unlike men, should keep themselves busy all
the time. “Idle fingers knit sweaters for the devil,” my
great-grandmother used to warn her daughter back in Poland. But this
kind of traditional moralizing is actually quite different from the
modern “If you have time to lean, you have time to clean,” because its
underlying message is not that you should be working but that you
shouldn’t be doing anything else. Essentially, my great-grandmother was
saying that anything a teenage girl in a Polish shtetl might be getting
up to when she wasn’t knitting was likely to cause trouble. Similarly,
one can find occasional warnings by nineteenth-century plantation owners
in the American South or the Caribbean that it’s better to keep slaves
busy even at made-up tasks than to allow them to idle about in the
off-season; the reason given always being that if slaves were left with
time on their hands, they were likely to start plotting to flee or
revolt.

The modern morality of “You’re on my time; I’m not paying you to lounge
around” is very different. It is the indignity of a man who feels he’s
being robbed. A worker’s time is not his own; it belongs to the person
who bought it. Insofar as an employee is not working, she is stealing
something for which the employer paid good money (or, anyway, has
promised to pay good money for at the end of the week). By this moral
logic, it’s not that idleness is dangerous. Idleness is theft.

This is important to underline because the idea that one person’s time
can belong to someone else is actually quite peculiar. Most human
societies that have ever existed would never have conceived of such a
thing. As the great classicist Moses Finley pointed out: if an ancient
Greek or Roman saw a potter, he could imagine buying his pots. He could
also imagine buying the potter—slavery was a familiar institution in the
ancient world. But he would have simply been baffled by the notion that
he might buy the potter’s time. As Finley observes, any such notion
would have to involve two conceptual leaps which even the most
sophisticated Roman legal theorists found difficult: first, to think of
the potter’s capacity to work, his “labor-power,” as a thing that was
distinct from the potter himself, and second, to devise some way to pour
that capacity out, as it were, into uniform temporal containers—hours,
days, work shifts—that could then be purchased, using cash.¹⁷ To the
average Athenian or Roman, such ideas would have likely seemed weird,
exotic, even mystical. How could you buy time? Time is an abstraction!¹⁸
The closest he would have likely been able to come would be the idea of
renting the potter as a slave for a certain limited time period—a day,
for instance—during which time the potter would, like any slave, be
obliged to do whatever his master ordered. But for this very reason, he
would probably find it impossible to locate a potter willing to enter
into such an arrangement. To be a slave, to be forced to surrender one’s
free will and become the mere instrument of another, even temporarily,
was considered the most degrading thing that could possibly befall a
human being.¹⁹

As a result, the overwhelming majority of examples of wage labor that we
do encounter in the ancient world are of people who are already slaves:
a slave potter might indeed arrange with his master to work in a
ceramics factory, sending half the wages to his master and keeping the
rest for himself.²⁰ Slaves might occasionally do free contract work as
well—say, working as porters at the docks. Free men and women would not.
And this remained true until fairly recently: wage labor, when it did
occur in the Middle Ages, was typical of commercial port cities such as
Venice, or Malacca, or Zanzibar, where it was carried out almost
entirely by unfree labor.²¹

So how did we get to the situation we see today, where it’s considered
perfectly natural for free citizens of democratic countries to rent
themselves out in this way, or for a boss to become indignant if
employees are not working every moment of “his” time?

First of all, it had to involve a change in the common conception of
what time actually was. Human beings have long been acquainted with the
notion of absolute, or sidereal, time by observing the heavens, where
celestial events happen with exact and predictable regularity. But the
skies are typically treated as the domain of perfection. Priests or
monks might organize their lives around celestial time, but life on
earth was typically assumed to be messier. Below the heavens, there is
no absolute yardstick to apply. To give an obvious example: if there are
twelve hours from dawn to dusk, there’s little point saying a place is
three hours’ walk away when you don’t know the season when someone is
traveling, since winter hours will be half the length of summer ones.
When I lived in Madagascar, I found that rural people—who had little use
for clocks—still often described distance the old-fashioned way and said
that to walk to another village would take two cookings of a pot of
rice. In medieval Europe, people spoke similarly of something as taking
“three paternosters,” or two boilings of an egg. This sort of thing is
extremely common. In places without clocks, time is measured by actions
rather than action being measured by time. There is a classic statement
on the subject by the anthropologist Edward Evan Evans-Pritchard on the
subject; he’s speaking of the Nuer, a pastoral people of East Africa:

[T]he Nuer have no expression equivalent to “time” in our language, and
they cannot, therefore, as we can, speak of time as though it were
something actual, which passes, can be wasted, can be saved, and so
forth. I do not think that they ever experience the same feeling of
fighting against time or having to coordinate activities with an
abstract passage of time, because their points of reference are mainly
the activities themselves, which are generally of a leisurely character.
Events follow a logical order, but they are not controlled by an
abstract system, there being no autonomous points of reference to which
activities have to conform with precision. Nuer are fortunate.²²

Time is not a grid against which work can be measured, because the work
is the measure itself.

The English historian E. P. Thompson, who wrote a magnificent 1967 essay
on the origins of the modern time sense called “Time, Work Discipline,
and Industrial Capitalism,”²³ pointed out that what happened were
simultaneous moral and technological changes, each propelling the other.
By the fourteenth century, most European towns had created clock
towers—usually funded and encouraged by the local merchant guild. It was
these same merchants who developed the habit of placing human skulls on
their desks as memento mori, to remind themselves that they should make
good use of their time because each chime of the clock brought them one
hour closer to death.²⁴ The dissemination of domestic clocks and then
pocket watches took much longer, coinciding largely with the advent of
the industrial revolution beginning in the late 1700s, but once it did
happen, it allowed for similar attitudes to diffuse among the middle
classes more generally. Sidereal time, the absolute time of the heavens,
had to come to earth and began to regulate even the most intimate daily
affairs. But time was simultaneously a fixed grid, and a possession.
Everyone was encouraged to see time as did the medieval merchant: as a
finite property to be carefully budgeted and disposed of, much like
money. What’s more, the new technologies also allowed any person’s fixed
time on earth to be chopped up into uniform units that could be bought
and sold for money.

Once time was money, it became possible to speak of “spending time,”
rather than just “passing” it—also of wasting time, killing time, saving
time, losing time, racing against time, and so forth. Puritan,
Methodist, and evangelical preachers soon began instructing their flocks
about the “husbandry of time,” proposing that the careful budgeting of
time was the essence of morality. Factories began employing time clocks;
workers came to be expected to punch the clock upon entering and
leaving; charity schools designed to teach the poor discipline and
punctuality gave way to public school systems where students of all
social classes were made to get up and march from room to room each hour
at the sound of a bell, an arrangement self-consciously designed to
train children for future lives of paid factory labor.²⁵

Modern work discipline and capitalist techniques of supervision have
their own peculiar histories, too, as forms of total control first
developed on merchant ships and slave plantations in the colonies were
imposed on the working poor back home.²⁶ But the new conception of time
was what made it possible. What I want to underline here is that this
was both a technological and a moral change. It is usually laid at the
feet of Puritanism, and Puritanism certainly had something to do with
it; but one could argue equally compellingly that the more dramatic
forms of Calvinist asceticism were just overblown versions of a new time
sense that was, in one way or another, reshaping the sensibilities of
the middle classes across the Christian world. As a result, over the
course of the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, starting in England,
the old episodic style of working came increasingly to be viewed as a
social problem. The middle classes came to see the poor as poor largely
because they lacked time discipline; they spent their time recklessly,
just as they gambled away their money.

Meanwhile, workers rebelling against oppressive conditions began
adopting the same language. Many early factories didn’t allow workers to
bring their own timepieces, since the owner regularly played fast and
loose with the factory clock. Before long, however, workers were arguing
with employers about hourly rates, demanding fixed-hour contracts,
overtime, time and a half, the twelve-hour day, and then the eight-hour
day. But the very act of demanding “free time,” however understandable
under the circumstances, had the effect of subtly reinforcing the idea
that when a worker was “on the clock,” his time truly did belong to the
person who had bought it—a concept that would have seemed perverse and
outrageous to their great-grandparents, as, indeed, to most people who
have ever lived.

concerning the clash between the morality of time and natural work rhythms, and the resentment it creates

It’s impossible to understand the spiritual violence of modern work
without understanding this history, which leads regularly to a direct
clash between the morality of the employer and the common sense of the
employee. No matter how much workers may have been conditioned in time
discipline by primary schooling, they will see the demand to work
continually at a steady pace for eight hours a day regardless of what
there is to do as defying all common sense—and the pretend make-work
they are instructed to perform as absolutely infuriating.²⁷

I well remember my very first job, as a dishwasher in a seaside Italian
restaurant. I was one of three teenage boys hired at the start of the
summer season, and the first time there was a mad rush, we naturally
made a game of it, determined to prove that we were the very best and
most heroic dishwashers of all time, pulling together into a machine of
lightning efficiency, producing a vast and sparkling pile of dishes in
record time. We then kicked back, proud of what we’d accomplished,
pausing perhaps to smoke a cigarette or scarf ourselves a scampi—until,
of course, the boss showed up to ask us what the hell we were doing just
lounging around.

“I don’t care if there are no more dishes coming in right now, you’re on
my time! You can goof around on your own time. Get back to work!”

“So what are we supposed to do?”

“Get some steel wool. You can scour the baseboards.”

“But we already scoured the baseboards.”

“Then get busy scouring the baseboards again!”

Of course, we learned our lesson: if you’re on the clock, do not be too
efficient. You will not be rewarded, not even by a gruff nod of
acknowledgment (which is all we were really expecting). Instead, you’ll
be punished with meaningless busywork. And being forced to pretend to
work, we discovered, was the most absolute indignity—because it was
impossible to pretend it was anything but what it was: pure degradation,
a sheer exercise of the boss’s power for its own sake. It didn’t matter
that we were only pretending to scrub the baseboard. Every moment spent
pretending to scour the baseboard felt like some schoolyard bully
gloating at us over our shoulders—except, of course, this time, the
bully had the full force of law and custom on his side.

So the next time a big rush came, we made sure to take our sweet time.

•  •  •

It’s easy to see why employees might characterize such make-work tasks
as bullshit, and many of the testimonies I received enlarged on the
resentment this produced. Here is an example of what might be called
“traditional make-work,” from Mitch, a former ranch hand in Wyoming.
Ranch work, he wrote, is hard but rewarding, and if you are lucky enough
to work for an easygoing employer, it tends to alternate cheerfully
between intense bursts of effort and just sort of hanging around. Mitch
was not so lucky. His boss, “a very old and well-respected member of the
community, of some regional standing in the Mormon church,” insisted as
a matter of principle that whenever there was nothing to do, free hands
had to spend their time “picking rocks.”

Mitch: He would drop us off in some random field, where we were told to
pick up all the rocks and put them in a pile. The idea, we were told,
was to clear the land so that tractor implements wouldn’t catch on them.

I called BS on that right off. Those fields had been plowed many times
before I ever saw them, plus the frost heaves of the severe winters
there would just raise more rocks to the surface over time. But it kept
the paid hands “busy” and taught us proper work ethic (meaning
obedience, a very high principle as taught in Mormonism), blah, blah.

Riiiight. A hundred-square-foot area of dirt would have hundreds of
rocks the size of a fist or bigger.

I remember once spending several hours in a field, by myself, picking
rocks, and I honestly tried to do my best at it (God knows why), though
I could see how futile it was. It was backbreaking. When the old boss
came back to pick me up to do something else, he looked disapprovingly
at my pile and declared that I hadn’t really done very much work. As if
being told to do menial labor for menial labor’s sake wasn’t degrading
enough, it was made more so by my being told that my hours of hard work,
performed entirely by hand with no wheelbarrow or any other tool
whatsoever, simply wasn’t good enough. Gee, thanks. What’s more, no one
ever came to haul off the rocks I had collected. From that day, they sat
in that field exactly where I had piled them, and I wouldn’t be
surprised if they were still there to this day.

I hated that old man every day until the day he died.

Mitch’s story highlights the religious element: the idea that dutiful
submission even to meaningless work under another’s authority is a form
of moral self-discipline that makes you a better person. This, of
course, is a modern variant of Puritanism. For now, though, I mainly
want to emphasize how this element just adds an even more exasperating
layer to the perverse morality whereby idleness is a theft of someone
else’s time. Despite the humiliation, Mitch could not help but try to
treat even the most pointless task as a challenge to be overcome, at the
same time feeling a visceral rage at having no choice but to play a game
of make-believe he had not invented, and which was arranged in such a
way that he could never possibly win.

Almost as soul destroying as being forced to work for no purpose is
being forced to do nothing at all. In a way it’s even worse, for the
same reason that any prison inmate would prefer spending a year working
on a chain gang breaking rocks to a year staring at the wall in
solitary.

Occasionally the very rich hire their fellow human beings to pose as
statues on their lawns during parties.²⁸ Some “real” jobs seem very
close to this: although one does not need to stand quite as still, one
must also do it for much longer periods of time:

Clarence: I worked as a museum guard for a major global security company
in a museum where one exhibition room was left unused more or less
permanently. My job was to guard that empty room, ensuring no museum
guests touched the . . . well, nothing in the room, and ensure nobody
set any fires. To keep my mind sharp and attention undivided, I was
forbidden any form of mental stimulation, like books, phones, etc.

Since nobody was ever there, in practice I sat still and twiddled my
thumbs for seven and a half hours, waiting for the fire alarm to sound.
If it did, I was to calmly stand up and walk out. That was it.

In a situation like that—I can attest to this because I have been in
roughly analogous situations—it’s very hard not to stand there
calculating “Just how much longer would it likely take me to notice a
fire if I were sitting here reading a novel or playing solitaire? Two
seconds? Three seconds? That is assuming I wouldn’t actually notice it
quicker because my mind would not, as it is now, be so pulped and
liquified by boredom that it had effectively ceased to operate. But even
assuming that it was three seconds, just how many seconds of my life
have been effectively taken from me to eliminate that hypothetical
three-second gap? Let’s work it out (I have a lot of time on my hands
anyway): 27,000 seconds a work shift; 135,000 seconds a week; 3,375,000
seconds a month.” Hardly surprising that those assigned such utterly
empty labor rarely last a year unless someone upstairs takes pity and
gives them something else to do.

Clarence lasted six months (roughly twenty million seconds) and then
took a job at half the pay that afforded at least a modicum of mental
stimulation.

•  •  •

These are obviously extreme examples. But the morality of “You’re on my
time” has become so naturalized that most of us have learned to see the
world from the point of view of the restaurant owner—to the extent that
even members of the public are encouraged to see themselves as bosses
and to feel indignant if public servants (say, transit workers) seem to
be working in a casual or dilatory fashion, let alone just lounging
around. Wendy, who sent me a long history of her most pointless jobs,
reflected that many of them seem to come about because employers can’t
accept the idea that they’re really paying someone to be on call in case
they’re needed:

Wendy: Example one: as a receptionist for a small trade magazine, I was
often given tasks to perform while I was waiting for the phone to ring.
Fair enough—but the tasks were almost uniformly BS. One I will remember
for the rest of my life: one of the ad sales people came to my desk and
dumped thousands of paper clips on my desk and asked me to sort them by
color. I thought she was joking, but she wasn’t. I did it, only to
observe that she then used them interchangeably without the slightest
attention to the color of the clip.

Example two: my grandmother, who lived independently in an apartment in
New York City into her early nineties. She did need help, though, so we
hired a very nice woman to live with her and keep an eye out. Basically,
she was there in case my grandmother fell or needed help, and to help
her do shopping and laundry, but if all went well, there was basically
nothing for her to do. This drove my grandmother crazy. “She’s just
sitting there!” she would complain. We would explain that was the point.

To help my grandmother save face, we asked the woman if she would mind
straightening out cabinets when she wasn’t otherwise occupied. She said
no problem. But the apartment was small, the closets and cabinets were
quickly put in order, and there was nothing to do again. Again, my
grandmother was going crazy that she was just sitting there. Ultimately,
the woman quit. When she did, my mother said to her, “Why? My mother
looks great!” To which the woman responded famously, “Sure, she looks
great. I’ve lost fifteen pounds, and my hair is falling out. I can’t
take her anymore.” The job wasn’t BS, but the need to construct a cover
by way of creating so much BS busywork was deeply demeaning to her. I
think this is a common problem for people working for the elderly. (It
comes up with babysitting, too, but in a very different way.)²⁹

Not just. Once you recognize the logic, it becomes easy to see that
whole jobs, careers, and even industries can come to conform to this
logic—a logic that not so very long ago would have been universally
considered utterly bizarre. It has also spread across the world. Ramadan
Al Sokarry, for example, is a young Egyptian engineer working for a
public enterprise in Cairo:

Ramadan: I graduated from the Electronics and Communications Department
in one of the best engineering schools in my country, where I had
studied a complicated major, and where all the students had high
expectations of careers tied to research and the development of new
technologies.

Well, at least that’s what our studies made us think. But it wasn’t the
case. After graduation, the only job I could find was as a control and
HVAC [heating, ventilating, and air-conditioning] engineer in a
corporatized government company—only to discover immediately that I
hadn’t been hired as an engineer at all but really as some kind of a
technical bureaucrat. All we do here is paperwork, filling out
checklists and forms, and no one actually cares about anything but
whether the paperwork is filed properly.

The position is described officially as follows: “heading a team of
engineers and technicians to carry out all the preventive maintenance,
emergency maintenance operations, and building new systems of control
engineering to achieve maximum efficiency.” In reality, it means I make
a brief daily check on system efficiency, then file the daily paperwork
and maintenance reports.

To state the matter bluntly: the company really just needed to have a
team of engineers to come in every morning to check if the air
conditioners were working and then hang around in case something broke.
Of course, management couldn’t admit that. Ramadan and the other members
of his team could have just as easily been sitting around playing cards
all day, or—who knows?—even working on some of those inventions they’d
been dreaming about in college, so long as they were ready to leap into
action if a convector malfunctioned. Instead, the firm invented an
endless array of forms, drills, and box-ticking rituals calculated to
keep them busy eight hours a day. Fortunately, the company didn’t have
anyone on staff who cared enough to check if they were actually
complying. Ramadan gradually figured out which of the exercises did need
to be carried out, and which ones nobody would notice if he ignored and
used the time to indulge a growing interest in film and literature.

Still, the process left him feeling hollow:

Ramadan: In my experience, this was psychologically exhausting and it
left me depressed, having to go every workday to a job that I considered
pointless. Gradually I started losing interest in my work, and started
watching films and reading novels to fill the empty shifts. I now even
leave my workplace for hours almost each shift without anyone noticing.

Once again, the end result, however exasperating, doesn’t seem all that
impossibly bad. Especially once Ramadan had figured out how to game the
system. Why couldn’t he see it, then, as stealing back time that he’d
sold to the corporation? Why did the pretense and lack of purpose grind
him down?

It would seem we are back at the same question with which we started.
But at this point, we are much better equipped to find the answer. If
the most hateful aspect of any closely supervised wage-labor job is
having to pretend to work to appease a jealous boss, jobs such as
Ramadan’s (and Eric’s) are essentially organized based on the same
principle. They might be infinitely more pleasant than my experience of
having to spend hours (it seemed like hours) applying steel wool to
clean perfectly clean baseboards. Such jobs are likely to be not waged
but salaried. There may not even be an actual boss breathing down one’s
neck—in fact, usually there isn’t. But ultimately, the need to play a
game of make-believe not of one’s own making, a game that exists only as
a form of power imposed on you, is inherently demoralizing.

So the situation was not, in the final analysis, all that fundamentally
different from when me and my fellow dishwashers had to pretend to clean
the baseboards. It is like taking the very worst aspect of most
wage-labor jobs and substituting it for the occupation that was
otherwise supposed to give meaning to your existence. It’s no wonder the
soul cries out. It is a direct assault on everything that makes us
human.


Chapter 4


What Is It Like to Have a Bullshit Job?


(On Spiritual Violence, Part 2)

The official line is that we all have rights and live in a democracy.
Other unfortunates who aren’t free like we are have to live in police
states. These victims obey orders or else, no matter how arbitrary. The
authorities keep them under regular surveillance. State bureaucrats
control even the smallest details of everyday life. The officials who
push them around are answerable only to higher-ups, public or private.
Either way, dissent or disobedience are punished. Informers report
regularly to the authorities. All this is supposed to be a very bad
thing.

And so it is, although it is nothing but a description of the modern
workplace.

—Bob Black, “The Abolition of Work”

In the last chapter, we asked why it was that human beings so regularly
find being paid to do nothing an exasperating, insufferable, or
oppressive experience—often, even when the conditions of employment are
quite good. I suggested the answer reveals certain truths about human
nature largely overlooked by economic science and even by the more
cynical versions of popular common sense. Humans are social beings that
begin to atrophy—even to physically decay—if they are denied regular
contact with other humans; insofar as they do have a sense of being an
autonomous entity separate from the world and from others, it is largely
from conceiving themselves as capable of acting on the world and others
in predictable ways. Deny humans this sense of agency, and they are
nothing. What’s more, in bullshit jobs, the ability to perform acts of
make-believe, which under ordinary circumstances might be considered the
highest and most distinctly human form of action—especially to the
extent that the make-believe worlds so created are in some way actually
brought into reality—is turned against itself. Hence, my inquiry into
the history of pretend work and the social and intellectual origins of
the concept that one’s time can belong to someone else. How does it come
to seem morally wrong to the employer that workers are not working, even
if there is nothing obvious for them to do?

If being forced to pretend to work is so infuriating because it makes
clear the degree to which you are entirely under another person’s power,
then bullshit jobs are, as noted above, entire jobs organized on that
same principle. You’re working, or pretending to work—not for any good
reason, at least any good reason you can find—but just for the sake of
working. Hardly surprising it should rankle.

But there’s one obvious difference, too, between bullshit jobs and a
dishwasher being made to clean the baseboards in a restaurant. In the
latter case, there is a demonstrable bully. You know exactly who is
pushing you around. In the case of bullshit jobs, it’s rarely so
clear-cut. Who exactly is forcing you to pretend to work? The company?
Society? Some strange confluence of social convention and economic
forces that insist no one should be given the means of life without
working, even if there is not enough real work to go around? At least in
the traditional workplace, there was someone against whom you could
direct your rage.

This is one of the things that comes through strongly in the testimonies
I assembled: the infuriating ambiguity. There is something terrible,
ridiculous, outrageous going on, but it’s not clear whether you are even
allowed to acknowledge it, and it’s usually even less clear who or what
can be blamed.

why having a bullshit job is not always necessarily that bad

Before exploring these themes, though, it’s important to acknowledge
that those who hold bullshit jobs are not uniformly miserable. As I
mentioned in the last chapter, there were a handful of largely positive
testimonials from workers who were quite satisfied with their bullshit
jobs. It’s hard to generalize about their common features because there
really weren’t all that many of them, but perhaps we can try to tease
out a few:

Warren: I work as a substitute teacher in a public school district in
Connecticut. My job just involves taking attendance and making sure the
students stay on task with whatever individual work they have. Teachers
rarely if ever actually leave instructions for teaching. I don’t mind
the job, however, since it allows me lots of free time for reading and
studying Chinese, and I occasionally have interesting conversations with
students. Perhaps my job could be eliminated in some way, but for now
I’m quite happy.

It’s not entirely clear this is even a bullshit job; as public education
is currently organized, someone does have to look after the children in
a given class period if a teacher calls in sick.¹ The bullshit element
seems to lie in pretending that instructors such as Warren are there to
teach, when everyone knows they’re not: presumably this is so the
students will be more likely to respect their authority when they tell
them to stop running around and do their assignments. The fact that the
role isn’t entirely useless must help somewhat. Crucially, too, it is
unsupervised, nonmonotonous, involves social interaction, and allows
Warren to spend a lot of time doing whatever he likes. Finally, it’s
clearly not something he envisions doing for the rest of his life.

This is about as good as a bullshit job is likely to get.

Some traditional bureaucratic jobs can also be quite pleasant, even if
they serve little purpose. This is especially true if by taking the job
one becomes part of a great and proud tradition, such as the French
civil service. Take Pauline, a tax official in Grenoble:

Pauline: I’m a technical bankruptcy advisor in a government ministry
equivalent to Britain’s Inland Revenue Service. About 5 percent of my
job is giving technical advice. The rest of the day, I explain
incomprehensible procedures to my colleagues, help them locate
directives that serve no purpose, cheer up the troops, and reassign
files that “the system” has misdirected.

Oddly enough, I enjoy going to work. It’s as if I were being paid sixty
thousand dollars a year to do the equivalent of Sudoku or crossword
puzzles.²

This sort of carefree, happy-go-lucky government office environment is
not as common as it used to be. It appears to have been extremely common
in the mid-twentieth century, before internal market reforms
(“reinventing government,” as the Clinton administration put it)
massively increased the degree of box-ticking pressure on public
officials; but it still exists in certain quarters.³ What makes
Pauline’s job so pleasant, it seems, is that she clearly gets along with
her coworkers and is running her own show. Combine that with the respect
and security of government employment and then the fact that she’s aware
it’s ultimately a rather silly show becomes not nearly so much of a
problem.

Both of these examples share another factor in common: everyone knows
that jobs like substitute teacher (in America) or tax official (in
France) are mostly bullshit—so there’s little room for disillusionment
or confusion. Those who apply for such jobs are well aware of what
they’re getting into, and there are already clear cultural models in
their heads for how a substitute teacher or tax official is supposed to
behave.

There does seem to be a happy minority, then, who enjoy their bullshit
jobs. It is difficult to estimate their total numbers. The YouGov poll
found that while 37 percent of all British workers felt their work
served no purpose, only 33 percent of workers found it unfulfilling.
Logically, then, at least 4 percent of the working population feel their
jobs are pointless but enjoy them anyway. Probably the real number is
somewhat higher.⁴ The Dutch poll reported roughly 6 percent—that is, 18
percent of the 40 percent of workers who considered their jobs pointless
also said they were at least somewhat happy doing them.

No doubt there are many reasons why this might be true in any individual
case. Some people hate their families or find domestic life so stressful
they treasure any excuse to get away from it. Others simply like their
coworkers and enjoy the gossip and camaraderie. A common problem in
large cities, especially in the North Atlantic world, is that most
middle-class people now spend so much time at work that they have few
social ties outside it; as a result, much of the day-to-day drama of
gossip and personal intrigue that makes life entertaining for
inhabitants of a village or small town or close-knit urban neighborhood,
insofar as it exists at all, comes to be confined largely to offices or
experienced vicariously through social media (which many mostly access
in the office while pretending to work). But if that’s true, and
people’s social life really is often rooted in the office, then it’s all
the more striking that the overwhelming majority of those in bullshit
occupations claim to be so miserable.

on the misery of ambiguity and forced pretense

Let us return to the subject of make-believe. Obviously, a lot of jobs
require make-believe. Almost all service jobs do to a certain extent. In
a classic study of Delta Airlines flight attendants, The Managed Heart:
Commercialization of Human Feeling, sociologist Arlie Russell Hochschild
introduced the notion of “emotional labor.” Hoschschild found air
hostesses typically had to spend so much effort creating and maintaining
a perky, empathetic, good-natured persona as part of their conditions of
employment that they often became haunted by feelings of emptiness,
depression, or confusion, unsure of who or what they really were.
Emotional labor of this sort is not limited to service workers, of
course: many firms expect such work even in inward-facing office
workers—especially women.

In the last chapter, we observed Patrick’s indignation at first
encountering the demand to pretend to enjoy being a cashier. Now, flight
attendant is not a bullshit job—as I’ve observed, few service workers
feel that the services they provide are entirely pointless. The kind of
emotional labor required by those in most bullshit jobs, however, is
usually rather different. Bullshit jobs, too, require maintaining a
false front and playing a game of make-believe—but in their case, the
game has to be played in a context where one is rarely quite sure what
the rules are, why it is being played, who’s on your team, and who
isn’t. At least flight attendants know exactly what’s expected of them.
What is expected of bullshit jobholders is usually far less onerous, but
it is complicated by the fact that they are never sure exactly what it
is. One question I asked regularly was “Does your supervisor know that
you’re not doing anything?” The overwhelming majority said they didn’t
know. Most added that they found it hard to imagine their supervisors
could be totally oblivious, but they couldn’t be sure because discussing
such matters too openly appeared to be taboo. But tellingly, they
weren’t even entirely sure about exactly how far that taboo extended.

To every rule there must be exceptions. Some did report supervisors who
were relatively open about the fact that there was nothing to do and who
would tell their underlings that it was acceptable to “pursue their own
projects.” But even then, such tolerance was only within reasonable
parameters and what sort of parameters were considered reasonable was
rarely self-evident; such matters had to be worked out by trial and
error. I never heard a single case of a supervisor just sitting down
with an employee and spelling out the rules, simply and honestly,
regarding when she had to work, when she didn’t, and how she could and
could not behave when she wasn’t working.

Some managers communicate indirectly, by their own behavior. In the
local British government office in which Beatrice worked, for example,
supervisors indicated the appropriate level of pretense (just a little)
during the week by livestreaming important sports events and similar
acts of self-indulgence. On weekend shifts, in contrast, no pretense was
required:

Beatrice: On other occasions, my role models known as “senior
management” would stream World Cup football matches live into the office
onto their desktops. I understood this gesture to be a form of
multitasking, so I started to research my own projects whenever I had
nothing to do at work.

On the other hand, my weekend role was a breeze. It was quite a
sought-after position in the authority because of the high rate of
overtime pay. In that office, we did nothing. We made Sunday dinners,
and I even heard stories of someone bringing a sunbed-recliner into work
so they could relax on it whilst we put the TV on. We surfed the
internet, watched DVDs—but more often, we just went to sleep, as there
was nothing to do. We would get some rest in before Monday morning
started.

In other cases, the rules are set out explicitly, but in such a way that
they are clearly made to be broken.⁵ Robin, hired as a temp in North
Carolina but not assigned any duties, managed to turn technical
competence into a way to mitigate the experience—to a degree:

Robin: I was told that it was very important that I stay busy, but I
wasn’t to play games or surf the Web. My primary function seemed to be
occupying a chair and contributing to the decorum of the office.

At first, this seemed pretty easy, but I quickly discovered that looking
busy when you aren’t is one of the least pleasant office activities
imaginable. In fact, after two days, it was clear that this was going to
be the worst job I had ever had.

I installed Lynx, a text-only Web browser that basically looks like a
DOS [disk operating system] window. No images, no Flash, no
JavaScript—just monospaced text on an endless black background. My
absentminded browsing of the internet now appeared to be the work of a
skilled technician, the Web browser a terminal into which diligently
typed commands signaled my endless productivity.

This allowed Robin to spend most of his time editing Wikipedia pages.

As far as temporary jobs are concerned, the worker is often effectively
being tested for his or her ability to just sit there and pretend to
work. In most cases, one is not, like Robin, told explicitly whether
they are allowed to play computer games; but if there are a lot of
temporary hires, it’s usually possible to make discreet inquiries of
one’s fellows and get some sense of what the ground rules are and just
how flagrantly one has to violate them to actually get fired.

Sometimes in longer-term positions, there is enough camaraderie among
employees that they can discuss the situation openly and find common
strategies to use against supervisors. Solidarity in such circumstances
can bring a sense of common purpose. Robert speaks of the legal aides at
a crooked law firm:

Robert: The weirdest thing about this job is how, in a twisted way, it
was kind of enjoyable. The legal assistants were all smart and
interesting people, and working a job that was so clearly meaningless
led to a great deal of bonding and gallows humor among the team. I
managed to maneuver my way into a desk with its back to the wall, so I
could spend as much time as possible surfing the internet or teaching
myself computer programming. Much of what we did was obviously
inefficient, like manually relabeling thousands of files, so I’d
automate it and then use the time it would have taken me to complete it
manually to do whatever I wanted. I also always made sure to have at
least two projects run by different bosses, so that I could tell both of
them that I was spending a lot of time on the other project.

At the very least, there can be a conspiracy of silence on such shirking
strategies; sometimes, active cooperation. In other cases, one can be
lucky enough to find a supervisor who is both willing to be fairly
honest and agreeable enough to set almost explicit parameters for
loafing. The emphasis here is on “almost.” One can never simply ask.
Here’s someone who has an on-call job at a travel insurance company.
He’s basically a duct taper, there to straighten out things once every
month or two when something goes predictably awry in their relation to
their partner company. Otherwise:

Calvin: Any given week, there will be a few situations where [our
partner company] is supposed to reach out to my team for advisory. So
for up to twenty minutes a week, we have actual work to do. Ordinarily,
though, I send five or eight fifteen-word emails a day, and every few
days, there’s a ten-minute team meeting. The rest of the workweek is
functionally mine, though not in any way I can flaunt. So I flit through
social media, RSS aggregation, and coursework in a wide but short
browser window I keep discreetly on the second of my two monitors. And
every few hours, I’ll remember I’m at a workplace and respond to my one
waiting email with something like: “We agree with the thing you said.
Please proceed with the thing.” Then I only have to pretend to be
visibly overworked for seven more hours each day.

David: So if you didn’t look busy, who would notice? Does that person
know there’s nothing really to do and just wants you to look busy, do
you think, or do they actually believe it’s a real full-time job?

Calvin: Our team manager seems to know what’s up, but she’s never let on
to having problems with it. Occasionally, I will have days with zero
work at all, so I’ll let her know that and volunteer to help out another
department if they’re bogged down in some way. That help is never
needed, it seems, so my letting her know is my way of declaring, “I’m
going to be on Twitter a full eight hours, but I told you in advance, so
it’s actually extremely noble of me.” She schedules hourlong weekly
meetings that haven’t once had ten minutes of content—we spend the rest
of them chatting casually. And since her bosses, up however high, are
aware of the genuine problems the other company can cause, I think it’s
presumed we’re wrangling their nonsense, or at least might have to at
any given second.

Not all supervisors, then, subscribe to the ideology of “You’re on my
time.” Particularly in large organizations where managers don’t have
much of a proprietary feeling anyway and don’t have reason to believe
they’ll get in much trouble with their own superiors if they notice one
of their subordinates slacking off, they might well let matters take
their own course.⁶ This kind of polite, coded, mutual consideration is
perhaps about as close to honesty in such situations as one is likely to
get. But even in such maximally benevolent circumstances, there is a
taboo on being too explicit. The one thing that could never, apparently,
happen, is for anyone to actually say, “Basically, you’re just here in
case of emergencies. Otherwise, do what you like and try not to get in
anybody’s way.” And even Calvin feels obliged to pretend to be
overworked, just as a reciprocal gesture of appreciation and respect.

More typically supervisors simply find subtle ways to say “Just shut up
and play along.”

Maria: My first meeting on arriving to start this job was with my line
manager, who was very quick to explain that she had absolutely no idea
what the person who used to do my job actually did. But luckily for me,
that predecessor was still around. She had just moved up inside the team
and would be able to show me everything that she had done in her former
role. She did. It took about an hour and a half.

“Everything she had done” also turned out to be virtually nothing. Maria
couldn’t handle the idleness. She begged her coworkers to let her do a
share of their work; something to make herself feel she had some reason
to be around. Driven to distraction, she finally made the mistake of
openly complaining to her manager:

Maria: I spoke to my manager, who very clearly told me not to “advertise
the fact” that I wasn’t mega busy. I asked her to at least send any
unclaimed work my way, and she told me she would show me a few of the
things she does, but never did.

This is as close to being told directly to pretend to work as one is
likely to get. Even more dramatic, but in no way unusual, is the
experience of Lilian, hired as Digital Product Project Manager in the IT
department of a major publishing house. Despite the somewhat
pretentious-sounding title, Lilian insists that such positions are not
necessarily bullshit—she’d had a similar gig before, and while it was
relatively undemanding, she did get to work with a small, friendly team
solving genuine problems. “This new place, however . . .”

As best she could reconstruct what happened (much of it had occurred
just before she arrived), her immediate supervisor, an arrogant blowhard
obsessed with the latest business fads and buzzwords, had sent out a
series of bizarre and contradictory directives that had the unintended
consequence of leaving Lilian with no responsibilities at all. When she
gently pointed out there was a problem, her concerns were brushed aside
with eye rolls and similar gestures of impatient dismissal.

Lilian: One would think that, as a Project Manager, I would somehow be
“running” the process. Except there is no room in the process for that
to happen. No one is running this process. Everyone is confused.

Other people expect me to help them and organize things and give them
the confidence that people usually look to a Project Manager for because
I’ve been given that title. But I have no authority and no control over
anything.

So I read a lot. I watch TV. I have no idea what my boss thinks I do all
day.

As a result of her situation, Lilian has to come up with two quite
difficult false fronts: one for her superior and another for her
underlings. In the first case, because she can only speculate what, if
anything, her supervisor actually wants her to do; in the second, in the
fact that about the only positive contribution she is allowed to make is
to adopt an air of cheerful confidence that might inspire her
subordinates to do a better job. (“Cheer up the troops,” as Pauline
might put it.) Or at least not infect them with her own desperation and
confusion. Underneath, Lilian was riddled with anxiety. It’s worth
quoting her comments at length because they give a sense of the
spiritual toll such a situation can take:

Lilian: What’s it like to have a job like this? Demoralizing.
Depressing. I get most of the meaning in my life from my job, and now my
job has no meaning or purpose.

It gives me anxiety because I think that at any moment someone is
actually going to realize that nothing would change if I were not here
and they could save themselves the money.

It also trashes my confidence. If I’m not constantly being met by
challenges that I am overcoming, how do I know that I’m capable? Maybe
all my ability to do good work has atrophied. Maybe I don’t know
anything useful. I wanted to be able to handle bigger and more complex
projects, but now I handle nothing. If I don’t exercise those skills,
I’ll lose them.

It also makes me afraid that other people in the office think the
problem is me; that I’m choosing to slack off or I’m choosing to be
useless, when nothing about this is my choice, and all my attempts to
make myself more useful or give myself more work are met with rejection
and not a small amount of derision for attempting to rock the boat and
challenge my boss’s authority.

I have never been paid so much to do so little, and I know I’m not
earning it. I know my coworkers with other job titles do significantly
more work. I might even get paid more than them! How bullshit would that
be? I’d be lucky if they didn’t hate me on that basis alone.

Lilian testifies eloquently to the misery that can ensue when the only
challenge you can overcome in your own work is the challenge of coming
to terms with the fact that you are not, in fact, presented with any
challenges; when the only way you can exercise your powers is in coming
up with creative ways to cover up the fact that you cannot exercise your
powers; of managing the fact that you have, completely against your
choosing, been turned into a parasite and fraud. An employee would have
to be confident indeed not to begin to doubt herself in such a
situation. (And such confidence can be pernicious in itself: it was her
boss’s idiotic cocksureness, after all, that created the situation to
begin with.)

Psychologists sometimes refer to the kind of dilemmas described in this
section as “scriptlessness.” Psychological studies, for instance, find
that men or women who had experienced unrequited love during adolescence
were in most cases eventually able to come to terms with the experience
and showed few permanent emotional scars. But for those who had been the
objects of unrequited love, it was quite another matter. Many still
struggled with guilt and confusion. One major reason, researchers
concluded, was precisely the lack of cultural models. Anyone who falls
in love with someone who does not return their affections has thousands
of years’ worth of romantic literature to tell them exactly how they are
supposed to feel; however, while this literature provides detailed
insight on the experience of being Cyrano, it generally tells you very
little about how you are supposed to feel—let alone what you’re supposed
to do—if you’re Roxane.⁷

Many, probably most, bullshit jobs involve a similar agonizing
scriptlessness. Not only are the codes of behavior ambiguous, no one is
even sure what they are supposed to say or how they are supposed to feel
about their situation.

on the misery of not being a cause

Whatever the ambiguities, almost all sources concur that the worst thing
about a bullshit job is simply the knowledge that it’s bullshit. As
noted in chapter 3, much of our sense of being a self, a being discrete
from its surrounding environment, comes from the joyful realization that
we can have predictable effects on that environment. This is true for
infants and remains true throughout life. To take away that joy entirely
is to squash a human like a bug. Obviously, the ability to affect one’s
environment cannot be taken away completely—rearranging objects in one’s
backpack or playing Fruit Mahjong is still acting on the world in some
way—but most people in the world today, certainly in wealthy countries,
are now taught to see their work as their principal way of having an
impact on the world, and the fact that they are paid to do it as proof
that their efforts do indeed have some kind of meaningful effect. Ask
someone “What do you do?” and he or she will assume you mean “for a
living.”

Many speak of the intense frustration of learning gradually that they
are instead paid to do nothing. Charles, for instance, started out of
college working in the video game industry. In his first job, at Sega,
he began as a tester but was soon promoted to “localization,” only to
discover it was a typical on-call job where he was expected to sit
around pretending to work in between dealing with problems that came up
only once a week, on average. Like Lilian, the situation made him doubt
his own value: “Working for a company that essentially was paying me to
sit around doing nothing made me feel completely worthless.” He quit
after superiors bawled him out for being late to work and threw himself
instead into a whirlwind romance. A month later, he tried again.

At first, he thought the new job, also for a gaming company, was going
to be different:

Charles: In 2002 I was hired by [BigGameCo], in LA, as an associate
producer. I was excited about this job because I was told I would be in
charge of writing the design document that bridged the desires of the
artists with the realities of what the programmers could do. For the
first few months, though, there was nothing to do. My big duty every day
was ordering dinner from a delivery place for the rest of the staff.

Again, just sitting around, doing emails. Most days, I would go home
early, because, why the fuck not?

With so much time on my hands, I started dreaming of having my own
business and began using all the free time to start making the website
for it. Eventually the producer above me threatened to report me to the
owner for doing this though. So I had to stop.

Finally, I was allowed to start work on the sound design document. I
threw myself into this work. I was so happy to be doing it. When it was
done, the producer told me to upload it to the shared server for
everyone working on the game.

Immediately there was uproar. The producer who hired me hadn’t realized
there was a sound design department a floor below us that makes these
documents for each game. I had done someone else’s job. This producer
had already made some other big mistake, so he asked me to take the
blame for this so he wouldn’t get fired. Every ounce of my soul rebelled
against doing this. My friends in programming, though, who were actually
enjoying having an incompetent producer because it meant they had the
freedom to do whatever they wanted, asked me to take the bullet for
them. They didn’t want the producer replaced by someone that would rein
them in. So I accepted responsibility, quit the next day, and haven’t
worked for someone else since then.

Thus did Charles say farewell to the world of formal paid employment and
began playing guitar for a living and sleeping in his van.

Things are rarely quite as obvious as this: cases where the worker is
basically doing nothing at all (though as we’ve seen, this certainly can
happen). It’s more common for there to be at least a modicum of work,
and for the worker to either immediately, or gradually, come to
understand that work is pointless. Most employees do think about the
social value of what they do, and whatever tacit yardstick they apply,
once they judge their work to be pointless, this judgment cannot fail
but affect the experience of doing that work—whatever the nature of the
work or conditions of employment. Of course, when those conditions are
also bad, matters often become intolerable.

Let’s look at a worst-case scenario: unpleasant work, bad conditions,
obvious uselessness. Nigel was a temp worker hired by a company that had
won a contract to scan the application forms for hundreds of thousands
of company loyalty cards. Since the scanning equipment the company used
was imperfect, and since its contract stated that each form would be
checked for errors no fewer than three times before being approved, the
company was obliged to bus in a small army of temps every day to act as
“Data Perfecters.” This is how he describes his work:

Nigel: It is hard to explain what this level of entranced boredom was
like. I found myself conversing with God, pleading for the next record
to contain an error, or the next one, or the next. But the time seemed
to pass quickly, like some kind of near-death experience.

There was something about the sheer purity of the social uselessness of
this job, combined with the crippling austerity of the process, that
united the Data Perfecters. We all knew that this was bullshit. I really
think that if we had been processing applications for something that had
a more obvious social value—organ transplant registration, say, or
tickets to [the] Glastonbury [rock festival]—then it would have felt
different. I don’t mean that the process would have been any less
tedious—an application form is an application form—but the knowledge
that no one cared about this work, that there was really nothing of any
value riding on how we did the job, made it feel like some sort of
personal test of stamina, like Olympic endurance boredom for its own
sake.

It was really weird.

Finally, there came a point where a few of us decided we just couldn’t
take it anymore. We complained one day about one of the supervisors
being rude, and the very next morning, we got a call from the agency
saying we were no longer needed.

Fortunately for Nigel, his fellow workers were all temps with no loyalty
to the organization and no reason to keep quiet about what was going
on—at least with one another. Often in more long-term assignments, it’s
hard to know exactly who one can and can’t confide in.

Where for some, pointlessness exacerbates boredom, for others it
exacerbates anxiety. Greg spent two years working as a designer of
digital display advertising for a marketing agency, “creating those
annoying banner ads you see on most websites.” The entire enterprise of
making and selling banner ads, he was convinced, is basically a scam.
The agencies that sell the ads are in possession of studies that made
clear that Web surfers largely didn’t even notice and almost never
clicked on them. This didn’t stop them, however, from basically cooking
the books and holding junkets with their clients where they presented
them with elaborate “proof” of the ads’ effectiveness.

Since the ads didn’t really work, client satisfaction was everything.
Designers were told to indulge their clients’ every whim, no matter how
technically difficult, self-indulgent, or absurd.

Greg: High-paying clients generally want to reproduce their TV
commercials within the banner ads and demand complex storyboards with
multiple “scenes” and mandatory elements. Automotive clients would come
in and demand that we use Photoshop to switch the steering wheel
position or fuel tank cap on an image the size of a thumbnail.

Such exacting demands were made, and had to be accommodated, as
designers stewed in the knowledge that no Web surfer would possibly be
able to make out such tiny details in a rapidly moving image from the
corner of her eye. All this was barely tolerable, but once Greg actually
saw the abovementioned studies, which also revealed that even if the
surfer did see them, she wouldn’t click on the banner anyway, he began
to experience symptoms of clinical anxiety.

Greg: That job taught me that pointlessness compounds stress. When I
started working on those banners, I had patience for the process. Once I
realized that the task was more or less meaningless, all that patience
evaporated. It takes effort to overcome cognitive dissonance—to actually
care about the process while pretending to care about the result.

Eventually the stress became too much for him, and he quit to take
another job.

•  •  •

Stress was another theme that popped up regularly. When, as with Greg,
one’s bullshit job involves not just sitting around pretending to work
but actually working on something everyone knows—but can’t say—is
pointless, the level of ambient tension increases and often causes
people to lash out in arbitrary ways. We’ve already met Hannibal, who
makes extraordinary amounts of money writing reports designed to be
waved around in pharmaceutical marketing meetings and later thrown away.
In fact, he confines the bullshit aspects of his employment to a day or
two a week—just enough to pay the bills—and spends the rest of his time
engaged in medical research aimed at eradicating tuberculosis in the
Global South—which no one seems to want to pay for. This gives him the
opportunity to compare behavior in both his workplaces:

Hannibal: That’s the other thing I’ve noticed: the amount of workplace
aggression and stress I see in people is inversely correlated with the
importance of the work they’re doing: “The client’s going fucking
apeshit because they’re under pressure from their boss to get this
presentation ready for the Q3 planning meeting on Monday! They’re
threatening to cancel the entire fucking contract unless we get it
delivered by tomorrow morning! We’re all going to need to stay late to
finish it! (Don’t worry, we’ll order some shitty junk food pizzas and
pissy lager in so we can work through the night . . .).” This is typical
for the bullshit reports. Whereas working on meaningful stuff always has
more of a collaborative atmosphere, everyone working together toward a
greater goal.

Similarly, while few offices are entirely free of cruelty and
psychological warfare, many respondents seemed to feel they were
particularly prevalent in offices where everyone knew, but did not wish
to admit, that they weren’t really doing much of anything.⁸

Annie: I worked for a medical care cost management firm. I was hired to
be part of a special tasks team that performed multiple functions within
the company.

They never provided me with this training, and instead my job was to:

• pull forms from the pool into the working software;

• highlight specific fields on those forms;

• return the forms to the pool for someone else to do something with
them.

This job also had a very rigid culture (no talking to others), and it
was one of the most abusive environments I ever worked in.

In particular, I made one highlighting error consistently during my
first two weeks of employment. I learned this was wrong and immediately
corrected it. However, for the entire remainder of my time at this
company, every time someone found one of these mis-highlighted forms, I
would be pulled aside to talk about it. Every time, like it was a new
issue. Every time, like the manager didn’t know these were all done
during the same period, and it wasn’t happening anymore—even though I
told her every time.

Such minor acts of sadism should be familiar to most of us who have
worked in office environments. You have to ask yourself: What was the
supervisor who called in Annie time and time again to “talk to her”
about a mistake that she knew perfectly well had long since been
corrected, actually thinking? Did she somehow forget, each time, that
the problem had been resolved? That seems unlikely. Her behavior appears
to be a pure exercise of power for its own sake. The pointlessness of
the exercise—both Annie and her boss knew nothing would really be
achieved by telling someone to fix a problem that’s already been
fixed—made it nothing more than a way for the boss to rub that fact—that
this was a relation of pure arbitrary power—in Annie’s face. It was a
ritual of humiliation that allows the supervisor to show who’s boss in
the most literal sense, and it puts the underling in her place,
justified no doubt by the sense that underlings are generically guilty
at the very least of spiritual insubordination, of resenting the boss’s
tyranny, in the same way that police who beat suspects they know to be
innocent will tell themselves the victim is undoubtedly guilty of
something else.

Annie: I did this for six months before deciding I’d rather die than
continue. This was also, however, the first time I made a living wage
doing anything. Before that, I was a preschool teacher, and while what I
was doing was very important, I made $8.25 an hour (in the Boston area).

This leads us to another issue: the effects of such situations on
employees’ physical health. While I lack statistical evidence, if the
testimonials are anything to go by, stress-related ailments seem a
frequent consequence of bullshit jobs. I’ve read multiple reports of
depression, anxiety overlapping with physical symptoms of every sort,
from carpal tunnel syndrome that mysteriously vanishes when the job
ends, to what appears, while it’s happening, like autoimmune breakdown.
Annie, too, became increasingly ill. Part of the reason, she felt in
retrospect, was the extreme contrast between the work environments of
her previous job and this one:

David: I’m trying to imagine what it must have been like to move from a
real job, teaching and taking care of children, to something so entirely
pointless and humiliating, just to pay the rent. Do you think there are
a lot of people in that situation?

Annie: I imagine it has to be pretty common! Low-paying childcare jobs
have really high turnover. Some people get additional training and can
move on to something more sustaining, but a lot of the ones I’ve watched
leave (mostly women) end up in some office or retail management.

One part of the experience I think about a lot is that I went from an
environment where I was touched and touching all day long—picking kids
up, getting hugs, giving piggybacks, rocking to sleep—into an
environment where nobody talked to each other, let alone touched each
other. I didn’t recognize the effect this had on my body while it was
happening, but now in retrospect I see what a huge impact it had on my
physical and mental health.

I suspect that not only is Annie right, but she is describing an
unusually dramatic example of what is, in fact, a very common dynamic.
Annie was convinced that not only was her particular job pointless but
also that the entire enterprise shouldn’t really exist: at best, it was
a giant exercise in duct taping, making up for some bits of the damage
caused by the notoriously dysfunctional American health care system, of
which it was an intrinsic part. But of course, no one was allowed to
discuss such matters in the office. No one was allowed to discuss
anything in the office. The physical isolation was continuous with the
social isolation. Everyone there was forced to become a little bubble
unto himself or herself.

In such minimal, but clearly unequal, social environments, strange
things can start to happen. Back in the 1960s, the radical psychoanalyst
Erich Fromm first suggested that “nonsexual” forms of sadism and
necrophilia tend to pervade everyday affairs in highly puritanical and
hierarchical environments.⁹ In the 1990s, the sociologist Lynn Chancer
synthesized some of these ideas with those of feminist psychoanalyst
Jessica Benjamin to devise a theory of Sado-Masochism in Everyday
Life.¹⁰ What Chancer found was that unlike members of actual BDSM
subcultures, who are entirely aware of the fact that they are playing
games of make-believe, purportedly “normal” people in hierarchical
environments typically ended up locked in a kind of pathological
variation of the same sadomasochistic dynamic: the (person on the)
bottom struggles desperately for approval that can never, by definition,
be forthcoming; the (person on the) top going to greater and greater
lengths to assert a dominance that both know is ultimately a lie—for if
the top were really the all-powerful, confident, masterly being he
pretends to be, he wouldn’t need to go to such outrageous lengths to
ensure the bottom’s recognition of his power. And, of course, there is
also the most important difference between make-believe S&M play—and
those engaged in it actually do refer to it as “play”—and its real-life,
nonsexual enactments. In the play version, all the parameters are
carefully worked out in advance by mutual consent, with both parties
knowing the game can be called off at any moment simply by invoking an
agreed-on safe-word. For example, just say the word “orange,” and your
partner will immediately stop dripping hot wax on you and transform from
the wicked marquis to a caring human being who wants to make sure you
aren’t really hurt. (Indeed, one might argue that much of the bottom’s
pleasure comes from knowing she has the power to affect this
transformation at will.¹¹) This is precisely what’s lacking in real-life
sadomasochistic situations. You can’t say “orange” to your boss.
Supervisors never work out in advance in what ways employees can and
cannot be chewed out for different sorts of infractions, and if an
employee is, like Annie, being reprimanded or otherwise humiliated, she
knows there is nothing she can say to make it stop; no safe-word,
except, perhaps, “I quit.” To pronounce these words, however, does more
than simply break off the scenario of humiliation; it breaks off the
work relationship entirely—and might well lead to one’s ending up
playing a very different game, one where you’re desperately scrounging
around to find something to eat or how to prevent one’s heat from being
shut off.

on the misery of not feeling entitled to one’s misery

I am suggesting, then, that the very meaninglessness of bullshit
employment tends to exacerbate the sadomasochistic dynamic already
potentially present in any top-down hierarchical relationship. It’s not
inevitable; some supervisors are generous and kind. But the lack of any
feeling of common purpose, any reason to believe one’s collective
actions in any way make life better for those outside the office or
really have any significant effect on anyone outside the office, will
tend to magnify all the minor indignities, distempers, resentments, and
cruelties of office life, since, ultimately, office politics is all
that’s really going on.

Many, like, Annie, were terrified by the health effects. Just as a
prisoner in solitary confinement inevitably begins to experience brain
damage, the worker deprived of any sense of purpose often experiences
mental and physical atrophy. Nouri, whom we met in chapter 2, repairing
code for an incompetent Viennese psychologist, kept something of a diary
of each of his successive bullshit jobs and their effects upon his mind
and body:

Nouri:

Job 1: Programmer, (pointless) start-up.

Effect on me: I first learned self-loathing. Got a cold every month.
Imposter syndrome killed my immune system.

Job 2: Programmer, (vanity project) start-up.

Effect on me: I pushed myself so hard that I damaged my eye, forcing me
to relax.

Job 3: Software Developer, (scam) small business.

Effect on me: usual depression, unable to find energy.

Job 4: Software developer, (doomed, dysfunctional) ex-start-up.

Effect on me: relentless mediocrity and fear due to my inability to
focus crippled my mind; I got a cold every month; warping my
consciousness to motivate myself killed my immune system. PTSD. My
thoughts were thoroughly mediocre . . .

Nouri had the misfortune to stumble through a series of relentlessly
absurd and/or abusive corporate environments. He managed to keep himself
sane—at least to the degree of fending off complete mental and physical
breakdown—by finding a different sense of purpose: he began to carry out
a detailed analysis of the social and institutional dynamics that lie
behind failed corporate projects. Effectively, he became an
anthropologist. (This has been very useful to me. Thanks, Nouri!) Then
he discovered politics, and began diverting time and resources toward
plotting to destroy the very system that created such ridiculous jobs.
At this point, he reports, his health began to markedly improve.

Even in relatively benign office environments, the lack of a sense of
purpose eats away at people. It may not cause actual physical and mental
degeneration, but at the very least, it leaves workers struggling with
feelings of emptiness or worthlessness. These feelings are typically in
no sense mitigated, but actually compounded by the prestige, respect,
and generous compensation that such positions often confer. Like Lilian,
bullshit jobholders can be secretly tortured by the suspicion that they
are being paid more than their actually productive underlings (“How
bullshit would that be?”), or that others have legitimate reason to hate
them. This left many genuinely confused about how they should feel. No
moral compass was available. One might consider this a kind of moral
scriptlessness.

Here is a relatively mild case. Finn works for a company that licenses
software on a subscription basis:

Finn: From the moment I first read the “Bullshit Jobs” essay a couple of
years back, it resonated with me. I continue to pull it out occasionally
to read and refer friends to.

I’m a manager of technical support for a software-as-a-service company.
My job seems to mostly consist of sitting in meetings, emailing,
communicating coming changes to my team, serving as an escalation point
for client issues, and doing performance reviews.

Performance reviews, Finn admits, are bullshit, explaining, “Everyone
already knows who the slackers are.” Actually, he acknowledges readily
that most of his responsibilities are bullshit. The useful work he
performs consists mainly of duct taping: solving problems caused by
various unnecessarily convoluted bureaucratic processes within the
company. Plus, the company itself is fairly pointless.

Finn: Still, sitting down to write this, there’s part of my brain that
wants to defend my bullshit job. Mostly because the job provides for me
and my family. I think that’s where the cognitive dissonance comes in.
From an emotional standpoint, it’s not like I’m invested in my job or
the company in any way. If I showed up on Monday and the building had
disappeared, not only would society not care, I wouldn’t, either. If
there’s any satisfaction that comes from my job, it’s being an expert in
navigating the waters of our disorganized organization and being able to
get things done. But being an expert in something that is unnecessary
is, as you can imagine, not all that fulfilling.

My preference would be to write novels and opinion essays, which I do in
my spare time, but I fear the leap from my bullshit job will mean being
incapable of making ends meet.

This is, of course, a commonplace dilemma. The job itself may be
unnecessary, but it’s hard to see it as a bad thing if it allows you to
feed your children. You might ask what kind of economic system creates a
world where the only way to feed one’s children is to spend most of
one’s waking hours engaged in useless box-ticking exercises or solving
problems that shouldn’t exist. But, then, you can equally well turn this
question on its head and ask whether all this can really be as useless
as it seems if the economic system that created these jobs also enables
you to feed your children. Do we really want to second-guess capitalism?
Perhaps every aspect of the system, no matter how apparently pointless,
is just the way it has to be.

Yet at the same time, one cannot also dismiss one’s own experience that
something is terribly amiss.

Many others spoke, like Lilian, of the agonizing disparity between the
outward respect they received from society and the knowledge of what
they actually did. Dan, an administrative contractor for a British
corporation’s offices in Toronto, was convinced he did only about an
hour or two of real work a week—work he could have easily done from
home. The rest was entirely pointless. Putting on the suit and coming to
the office was, he felt, just an elaborate sacrificial ritual; a series
of meaningless gestures he had to perform in order to prove himself
worthy of a respect he did not deserve. At work, he wondered constantly
if his coworkers felt the same way:

Dan: It felt like some Kafkaesque dream sequence that only I had the
misfortune of realizing how stupid so much of what we were doing was,
but deep down inside, I felt as if this experience had to be a silently
shared one. We must have all known! We were an office of six people, and
we were all “managers” . . . There were easily more managers in the
building than actual employees. The situation was completely absurd.

In Dan’s case, everyone played along with the charade. The environment
was in no way abusive. The six managers and their supervising
managers-of-managers were polite, friendly, mutually supportive. They
all told one another what a terrific job they were doing and what a
disaster it would be for everyone else if they weren’t there as part of
the team—but only, Dan felt, as a way of consoling one another in the
secret knowledge they were hardly doing anything, that their work was of
no social value, and that if they weren’t there, it would make no
difference. It was even worse outside the office, where he began to be
treated as the member of his family who had really made something of his
life. “It’s honestly hard to describe how mad and useless I felt. I was
being taken seriously as a ‘young professional’—but did any of them know
what it was I really did?”

Eventually Dan quit to become a science teacher in a Cree Indian
community in northern Quebec.

•  •  •

It doesn’t help that higher-ups in such situations will regularly insist
that perceptions of futility are self-evidently absurd. It doesn’t
always happen. Some managers, as we’ve seen, will basically wink and
smile; a precious few might honestly discuss at least part of what’s
going on. But since middle managers generally see their role as one of
maintaining morale and work discipline, they will often feel they have
little choice but to rationalize the situation. (In effect, doing so is
the only part of their jobs that isn’t bullshit.) Plus, the higher you
climb in the hierarchy, the more oblivious the managers are likely to
be—but at the same time, the more formal authority they tend to have.

Vasily works as a research analyst for a European foreign affairs
office: his office, he reports, has just as many supervisors as
researchers, and every sentence of any document produced by a researcher
invariably ends up being passed up two levels of hierarchy to be read,
edited, and passed down again, repeatedly, until it makes no sense.
Granted, this would be more of a problem if there were a chance that
anyone outside the office would ever read them, or, for that matter, be
aware they existed. Vasily does occasionally try to point all this out
to his superiors:

Vasily: If I question the utility or sense of our work, my bosses look
at me as if I’m from another planet. Of course they do: for them, it is
crucial that the work we’re doing is not seen as total nonsense. If that
would be the case, the positions would be canceled, and the result would
be having no job.

In this case, it’s not the capitalist economic system but the modern
international state system that between the various consular services,
United Nations, and Bretton Woods instututions, creates untold thousands
of (usually high-paid, respectable, comfortable) jobs across the planet.
One can argue, as in all things, about which of these positions are
truly useful and for what. Presumably some do important work—preventing
wars, for instance. Others arrange and rearrange furniture. What’s more,
there are pockets inside the apparatus that appear, to their low-ranking
denizens, at least, as entirely superfluous. This perception, says
Vasily, creates feelings of guilt and shame:

Vasily: When I am in public and people ask me about my job, I don’t want
to. There is nothing to say, nothing to be proud of. Working for the
foreign ministry has a high reputation, so when I am saying, “ I am
working for the foreign ministry,” people usually react with a mix of
respect and not really knowing what I am doing. I think the respect
makes it even worse.

There are a million ways to make a human feel unworthy. The United
States, so often a pioneer in such areas, has, among other things,
perfected a quintessentially American mode of political discourse that
consists in lecturing others about what jerks they are to think they
have a right to something. Call it “rights-scolding.” Rights-scolding
has many forms and manifestations. There is a right-wing version, which
centers on excoriating others for thinking the world owes them a living,
or owes them medical treatment when they are gravely ill, or maternity
leave, or workplace safety, or equal protection under the law. But there
is also a left-wing version, which consists of telling people to “check
their privilege” when they feel they are entitled to pretty much
anything that some poorer or more oppressed person does not have.

According to these standards, even if one is beaten over the head by a
truncheon and dragged off to jail for no reason, one can only complain
about the injustice if one first specifies all the categories of people
to which this is more likely to occur. Rights-scolding may have seen its
most baroque development in North America, but it has spread all over
the world with the rise of neoliberal market ideologies. Under such
conditions, it’s understandable that demanding an entirely new,
unfamiliar, right—such as the right to meaningful employment¹²—might
seem a hopeless project. It’s hard enough nowadays being taken seriously
when asking for things you’re already supposed to have.

The burden of rights-scolding falls above all on the younger
generations. In most wealthy countries, the current crop of people in
their twenties represents the first generation in more than a century
that can, on the whole, expect opportunities and living standards
substantially worse than those enjoyed by their parents. Yet at the same
time, they are lectured relentlessly from both left and right on their
sense of entitlement for feeling they might deserve anything else. This
makes it especially difficult for younger people to complain about
meaningless employment.

Let us end, then, with Rachel, to express the horror of a generation.

Rachel was a math whiz with an undergrad degree in physics, but from a
poor family. She aspired to pursue a graduate degree, but with British
university tuition fees having tripled, and financial assistance cut to
the bone, she was forced to take a job as Catastrophe Risk Analyst for a
big insurance company to raise the requisite funds. A year out of her
life, she told herself, but hardly the end of the world:

Rachel: “It’s not the worst thing in the world: learn some new skills,
earn some money, and do a bit of networking while you’re at it.” Such
was my thinking. “Realistically, how bad is it going to be?” And
obviously, in the back of your head, the resounding, “Loads of people
spend their whole lives doing boring, backbreaking work for barely any
money. What on earth makes you too special for one year in a boring
office job?”

That last one is an overarching fear for self-aware millennials. I can
barely scroll through Facebook without hitting some preachy think piece
about my generation’s entitlement and reluctance to just do a bloody
day’s work, for Christ’s sake! It is sort of hard to gauge whether my
standards for an “acceptable” job are reasonable or just the result of
ridiculous, Generation Snowflakey “entitled bollocks” (as my grandma
likes to say).

This is, incidentally, a particularly British variation of
rights-scolding (though it increasingly infects the rest of Europe):
older people who grew up with cradle-to-grave welfare state protections
mocking young people for thinking they might be entitled to the same
thing. There was also another factor, much though Rachel was slightly
embarrassed to admit it: the position paid extremely well; more than
either of her parents was making. For someone who’d spent her entire
adult existence as a penniless student supporting herself through
temping, call center, and catering jobs, it would be refreshing to
finally get a taste of bourgeois life.

Rachel: I’d done the “office thing” and the “crap job thing,” so how bad
could a crap office job be, really? I had no concept of the
bottom-of-the-ocean black depths of boredom I would sink to under a bulk
of bureaucracy, terrible management, and myriad bullshit tasks.

Rachel’s job was necessitated by various capital holding requirement
regulations which, like all corporations in a similar situation, her
employer had no intention of respecting. Thus, a typical day consisted
of taking in emails each morning with data on how much money different
branches of the firm would expect to lose in some hypothetical
catastrophe scenario, “cleaning” the data, copying the data into a
spreadsheet (whereupon the spreadsheet program invariably crashed and
had to be rebooted), and coming up with a figure for overall losses.
Then, if there was a potential legal problem, Rachel was expected to
massage the numbers until the problem went away. That’s when things were
going well. On a bad day, or bad month, when there was nothing else to
do, her supervisors would make up elaborate and obviously pointless
exercises to keep her busy, such as constructing “mind maps”¹³. Or just
leave her with nothing—but always with the proviso that while doing
nothing, she had to actively pretend not to be:

Rachel: The weirdest and (apart from the title) maybe most bullshitty
thing about my job was that while it was generally acknowledged that
there wasn’t really enough work to do, you weren’t allowed to
conspicuously not work. In a hark back to the days of the early
internet, even Twitter and Facebook were banned.

My academic degree was pretty interesting and involved a lot of work,
so, again, I had no concept of the horrible dread I would feel getting
up in the morning to spend all day sitting in an office trying to
inconspicuously waste time.

The final straw came after months of complaining, when I met my friend
Mindy for a drink after a week of peak bullshit. I had just been asked
to color coordinate a mind map to show “the nice-to-haves, must-haves,
and would-like-to-have-in-futures.” (No, I have no idea what that means,
either.) Mindy was working on a similarly bullshit project, writing
branded content for the pages of a company newspaper nobody reads.

She ranted at me, and I ranted at her. I made a long, impassioned speech
that ended with me shouting, “I cannot wait for the sea levels to rise
and the apocalypse to come because I would rather be out hunting fish
and cannibals with a spear I’d fashioned out of a fucking pole than
doing this fucking bollocks!” We both laughed for a long time, and then
I started crying. I quit the next day. That is one massive benefit of
having done all manner of weird menial jobs through university: you can
almost always find work quickly.

So, yes, I am the queen crystal of Generation Snowflake, melting in the
heat of a pleasantly air-conditioned office, but, good Lord, the working
world is crap.

From thinking a “crap office job” was hardly the end of the world,
Rachel was finally forced to the conclusion that the end of the world
would, in fact, be preferable.¹⁴

on the misery of knowing that one is doing harm

There is one other, slightly different form of social suffering that
ought to be acknowledged: the misery of having to pretend you’re
providing some kind of benefit to humanity, when you know the exact
opposite is in fact the case. For obvious reasons, this is most common
among social service providers who work for government or
nongovernmental organizations (NGOs). Most are engaged in box-ticking
rituals, at least to a certain degree, but many are aware that what
they’re doing is worse than useless: they are harming the people they
are supposedly there to help. Shihi is now an artist, but she was once a
community therapist in New York City:

ShÍhi: I used to work as a therapist in a community mental health center
in the Bronx in the 1990s and 2000s. I have a social work degree.

My clients ended up either being mandated to “treatment” after being
incarcerated for minor stuff (Clinton’s crime bill), lost their jobs and
apartments after being jailed, or just needed to prove to
welfare-to-work or Social Security offices that they need SSI
[Supplemental Security Income] or other food/rent subsidies because they
were mentally ill.

Some were indeed severely mentally ill, but many others were just
extremely poor people who were constantly being harassed by the police.
Their living conditions would make anyone “mentally ill.”

My job was to do therapy to essentially tell them it was their own fault
and their responsibility to make their lives better. And if they
attended the program daily, so the company could bill their Medicaid,
staff would copy their medical records to send to the Social Security
office so they could be reviewed for disability payments. The more
paperwork in their charts, the better their chances.

I had groups to run like “anger management,” “coping skills” . . . They
were so insulting and irrelevant! How do you cope with lack of decent
food or control your rage toward the police when they abuse you?

My job was useless and harmful. So many NGOs profit from the misery
created by inequality. I made a very poor living doing what I did, but
it still pains me deeply that I was a poverty pimp.

It is interesting and important to note that many of the petty officials
who do absurd and terrible things in the name of paperwork are keenly
aware of what they are doing and of the human damage that is likely to
result—even if they usually feel they must remain stone-faced when
dealing with the public. Some rationalize it. A few take sadistic
pleasure. But any victim of the system who has ever asked herself, “How
can such people live with themselves?” might take some comfort in the
fact that, in many cases, they can’t. Meena’s job for a local government
council in an English town sometimes referred to as “Little
Skidrow-by-the-Sea” was represented to her, when she took it, as working
with the homeless. She found this was true in a sense:

Meena: My job was not to place, to advise, or help homeless people in
any way. Instead, I had to try to collect their paperwork (proof of ID,
National Insurance number, proof of income, etc.) so that the temporary
homeless unit could claim back housing benefit. They had three days to
provide it. If they couldn’t or wouldn’t provide the necessary
paperwork, I had to ask their caseworkers to kick them out of their
temporary accommodations. Obviously, homeless people with drug
addictions tend to have difficulties providing two proofs of income,
among many other things. But so do fifteen-year-olds whose parents have
abandoned them, and veterans with PTSD, and women fleeing domestic
violence.

So ultimately, Meena explains, her role was to threaten to make formerly
homeless people homeless again, “all so that one department could claim
a cash transfer from another.” What was it like? “Soul destroying.”
After six months, she couldn’t take it and gave up on government service
entirely.

Meena quit. Beatrice, who worked for a different local authority, also
couldn’t take it after witnessing colleagues laughing over letters sent
to pensioners that contained intentional errors designed to confuse the
recipients so as to allow the council to falsely bill them for late
payment. Only a handful of her coworkers, she said, took an active
pleasure in defrauding the public they were hired to serve, but it cast
a terrible pall upon an otherwise easygoing and friendly office
environment. She tried to complain to higher-ups (“Surely this isn’t
right!”), but they looked at her as if she were crazy. So Beatrice took
her first opportunity to find another job.

George, who worked for Atos, a French firm hired by the British
government to knock as many citizens as possible from the disability
rolls (in the years following, more than two thousand were discovered to
have died not long after having been found “fit to work”),¹⁵ soldiers
on. He reports that everyone who works for the company does understand
what’s going on and “hates Atos with a quiet desperation.” In other
cases, government workers are convinced that they are the only ones in
their office who’ve figured out how useless or destructive the work
they’re doing is—though when asked if they have ever presented their
views to colleagues directly, most invariably say they haven’t, leaving
open the possibility that their coworkers are equally convinced they are
the only ones who know what’s really going on.¹⁶

In all this, we are moving into somewhat different territory. Much of
what happens in such offices is simply pointless, but there is an added
dimension of guilt and terror when it comes to knowing you are involved
in actively hurting others. Guilt, for obvious reasons. Terror, because
in such environments, dark rumors will always tend to circulate about
what is likely to happen to whistle-blowers. But on a day-to-day basis,
all this simply deepens the texture and quality of the misery attendant
on such jobs.

coda: on the effects of bullshit jobs on human creativity, and on why attempts to assert oneself creatively or politically against pointless employment might be considered a form of spiritual warfare

Let me conclude by returning to the theme of spiritual violence.

It’s hard to imagine anything more soul destroying than, as Meena put
it, being forced to commit acts of arbitrary bureaucratic cruelty
against one’s will. To become the face of the machine that one despises.
To become a monster. It has not escaped my notice, for example, that the
most frightening monsters in popular fiction do not simply threaten to
rend or torture or kill you but to turn you into a monster yourself:
think here of vampires, zombies, werewolves. They terrify because they
menace not just your body but also your soul. This is presumably why
adolescents in particular are drawn to them: adolescence is precisely
when most of us are first confronted with the challenge of how not to
become the monsters we despise.

Useless or insidious jobs that involve pretenses to public service are
perhaps the worst, but almost all of the jobs mentioned in this chapter
can be considered soul destroying in different ways. Bullshit jobs
regularly induce feelings of hopelessness, depression, and
self-loathing. They are forms of spiritual violence directed at the
essence of what it means to be a human being.

If what I have argued in the last chapter—that the integrity of the
human psyche, even human physical integrity (insofar as these two can
ever be entirely distinguished), is caught up in relations with others,
and the sense of one’s capacity to affect the world—then such jobs could
hardly be anything other than spiritual violence.

This is not to say, however, that the soul has no means for resistance.
It might be well to conclude this chapter by taking note of the
resulting spiritual warfare, and document some of the ways workers keep
themselves sane by involving themselves in other projects. Call it, if
you like, guerrilla purpose. Robin, the temp who fixed his screen to
look like he was programming when, in fact, he was surfing the Web, used
that time to perform free editorial work for a number of Wikipedia pages
he monitored (including, apparently, mine), and to help maintain an
alternative-currency initiative. Others start businesses, write film
scripts and novels, or secretly run sexy maid services.

Yet others escape into Walter Mitty–style reverie, a traditional coping
mechanism for those condemned to spend their lives in sterile office
environments. It’s probably no coincidence that nowadays many of these
involve fantasies not of being a World War I flying ace, marrying a
prince, or becoming a teenage heartthrob, but of having a better—just
utterly, ridiculously better—job. Boris, for instance, works for “a
major international institution” writing bullshit reports. Here is his
(obviously somewhat self-mocking) report:

Boris: It is clearly a bullshit job because I have tried everything,
self-help books, sneaky onanistic breaks, calling my mother and crying,
realizing all my life choices have been pure shite—but I keep carrying
on because I have a rent to pay.

What’s more, this situation, which causes me a mild to severe
depression, also obliges me to postpone my true life’s calling: being J.
Lo’s or Beyoncé’s Personal Assistant (either separately or
concomitantly). I am a hardworking, results-driven person so I believe I
could handle it well. I would be willing to work for one of the
Kardashians, too, particularly Kim.

Still, most testimonies focus on creativity as a form of defiance—the
dogged fortitude with which many attempt to pursue art, or music, or
writing, or poetry, serves as an antidote to the pointlessness of their
“real” paid work. Obviously, sample bias may be a factor here. The
testimonies sent to me were largely drawn from my followers on Twitter,
a population likely to be both more artsy and more politically engaged
than the public at large. So I will not speculate on how common this is.
But certain interesting patterns emerge.

For instance, workers hired for a certain skill, but who are then not
really allowed to exercise it, rarely end up exercising that skill in a
covert way when they discover they have free time on their hands. They
almost invariably end up doing something else. We’ve already observed in
chapter 3 how Ramadan, the engineer who dreamed of working at the
cutting edge of science and technology, simply gave up when he
discovered he was really expected to sit around doing paperwork all day.
Rather than pursuing scientific projects on the sly, he threw himself
into film, novels, and the history of Egyptian social movements. This is
typical. Faye, who has been contemplating writing a pamphlet on “how to
keep your soul intact in corporate environments,” falls back on music:

Faye: The frustrated musician in me has come up with ways of silently
learning music while stuck at my corporate desk. I studied Indian
classical music for a while and have internalized two of their rhythmic
systems. Indian approaches are abstract, numerical, and nonwritten, and
so open up ways for me to silently and invisibly practice in my head.

This means I can improvise music while stuck in the office, and even
incorporate inputs from the world around me. You can groove off the
ticking clock as dull meetings drag on or turn a phone number into a
rhythmic poem. You can translate the syllables of corporate jargon into
quasi hip-hop, or interpret the proportions of the filing cabinet as a
polyrhythm. Doing this has been a shield to more aggregate boredom in
the workplace than I can possibly explain. I even gave a talk to friends
a few months ago about using rhythm games to alleviate workplace
boredom, demonstrating how you can turn aspects of a dull meeting into a
funk composition.

Lewis, who describes himself as a “fake investment banker” for a
financial consulting firm in Boston, is working on a play. When he
realized his role in the company was basically pointless, he began to
lose motivation and with it the ability to concentrate on the one or two
hours per day he actually did need to work. His supervisor, a stickler
for time and “optics” who seemed remarkably indifferent to productivity,
didn’t seem to mind what Lewis did so long as he didn’t leave the office
before she did, but what he describes as his Midwestern American guilt
complex drove him to come up with a means to carry on:

Lewis: Happily, I have an automatic standing desk and lots of mildly
guilt-ridden BS-free time. So, over the last three months, I’ve used
that time to write my first play. Strangely, the creative output began
out of necessity rather than desire. I found that I’m way more
productive and efficient once I’ve chewed on a scene or dialogue. In
order to do the seventy minutes or so of actual work I need to get done
in a given day, I’ll need another three to four hours of creative
writing.

Faye and Lewis are unusual. The most common complaint among those
trapped in offices doing nothing all day is just how difficult it is to
repurpose the time for anything worthwhile. One might imagine that
leaving millions of well-educated young men and women without any real
work responsibilities but with access to the internet—which is,
potentially, at least, a repository of almost all human knowledge and
cultural achievement—might spark some sort of Renaissance. Nothing
remotely along these lines has taken place. Instead, the situation has
sparked an efflorescence of social media (Facebook, YouTube, Instagram,
Twitter): basically, of forms of electronic media that lend themselves
to being produced and consumed while pretending to do something else. I
am convinced this is the primary reason for the rise of social media,
especially when one considers it in the light not just of the rise of
bullshit jobs but also of the increasing bullshitization of real jobs.
As we’ve seen, the specific conditions vary considerably from one
bullshit job to another. Some workers are supervised relentlessly;
others are expected to do some token task but are otherwise left more or
less alone. Most are somewhere in between. Yet even in the best of
cases, the need to be on call, to spend at least a certain amount of
energy looking over one’s shoulder, maintaining a false front, never
looking too obviously engrossed, the inability to fully collaborate with
others—all this lends itself much more to a culture of computer games,
YouTube rants, memes, and Twitter controversies than to, say, the rock
’n’ roll bands, drug poetry, and experimental theater created under the
midcentury welfare state. What we are witnessing is the rise of those
forms of popular culture that office workers can produce and consume
during the scattered, furtive shards of time they have at their disposal
in workplaces where even when there’s nothing for them to do, they still
can’t admit it openly.

Some testimonies similarly bemoaned the fact that traditional forms of
artistic expression simply cannot be pursued under bullshit conditions.
Padraigh, an Irish art school graduate shepherded into a pointless job
at a foreign tech multinational owing to the complexities of the Irish
welfare and tax system—which, he says, makes it almost impossible to be
self-employed unless you’re already rich—has been forced to abandon his
life’s calling:

Padraigh: But what kills me most is the fact that outside of work, I
have been unable to paint, to follow my creative impulses to draw or
scrape out ideas on canvas. I was quite focused on it whilst I was
unemployed. But that didn’t pay. So now I have the money and not the
time, energy, or headspace to be creative.¹⁷

He still manages to keep up a political life as an anarchist determined
to destroy the economic system that does not allow him to pursue his
life’s true calling. Meanwhile, a New York legal aide, James, is reduced
to acts of subtle protest: “Spending all day in a sterile office
environment, I’m too mentally numb to do anything but consume
meaningless media,” he says. “And on occasion, yeah, I do feel quite
depressed about it all: the isolation, the futility, the tiredness. My
one small act of rebellion is wearing a black-and-red-star pin into work
every day—they have no fucking idea!”

Finally, a British psychologist who, owing to Prime Minister Tony
Blair’s higher education reforms of the 1990s, was laid off as a teacher
and rehired as a “Project Assessor” to determine the effects of laying
off teachers:

Harry: What surprises me is that it’s astonishingly difficult to
repurpose time for which one is being paid. I’d have felt guilty if I’d
dodged the BS work and, say, used the time to have a go at writing a
novel. I felt obliged to do my best to carry out the activities I was
contracted to carry out—even if I knew those activities were entirely
futile.

David: You know, that’s one theme that keeps cropping up in the
testimonies I’ve been reading: jobs that should be wonderful, since they
pay you lots of money to do little or nothing and often don’t even
insist you pretend to work, somehow drive people crazy anyway because
they can’t figure out a way to channel the time and energy into anything
else.

Harry: Well here’s one thing that bears out your assertion. These days,
I work as Training Manager in a bus depot. Not all that glamorous, of
course, but much more purposeful work. And I actually do more freelance
work for pleasure now (short stories, articles) than I did in that
completely unchallenging BS job.

David: Maybe we’re onto something here!

Harry: Yes, it’s really interesting.

So utilizing a bullshit job to pursue other projects isn’t easy. It
requires ingenuity and determination to take time that’s been first
flattened and homogenized—as all work time tends to be in what James
calls “sterile office environment[s]”—then broken randomly into often
unpredictably large fragments, and use that time for projects requiring
thought and creativity. Those who manage to do so have already sunk a
great deal of their—presumably finite—creative energies just into
putting themselves in a position where they can use their time for
anything more ambitious than cat memes. Not that there’s anything wrong
with cat memes. I’ve seen some very good ones. But one would like to
think our youth are meant for greater things.

About the only accounts I received from workers who felt they had
largely overcome the mental destruction caused by bullshit jobs were
from those that had found a way to keep those jobs down to one or two
days a week. Needless to say, this is logistically extremely difficult,
and usually impossible, for either financial or career reasons. Hannibal
might serve as a success story in this regard. The reader may recall him
as the man who writes bullshit reports for marketing agencies for as
much as £12,000 a go and tries to limit this work if possible to one day
a week. During the rest of the week, he pursues projects that he
considers utterly worthwhile but knows that he couldn’t possibly
self-finance:

Hannibal: One of the projects I’m working on is to create an
image-processing algorithm to read low-cost diagnostic strips for TB
patients in the developing world. Tuberculosis is one of the world’s
biggest killers, causing one and a half million deaths a year with up to
eight million infected at any one time. Diagnosis is still a significant
problem, so if you can improve the treatment of just one percent of
those eight million infected patients, then you can count lives improved
in the tens of thousands per year. We’re already making a difference.
This work is rewarding for all those involved. It’s technically
challenging, involves problem solving and working collaboratively to
achieve a greater goal that we all believe in. It is the antithesis of a
bullshit job. However, it is proving virtually impossible to raise more
than a very small amount of money to do this.

Even after spending much time and energy trying to convince various
health executives there might be potentially lucrative spin-offs of one
sort or another, he only raised enough to pay the expenses of the
project itself, certainly not enough to provide any sort of compensation
for those working on it, including himself. So Hannibal ends up writing
meaningless word spaghetti for marketing forums in order to fund a
project that will actually save lives.

Hannibal: If I get the opportunity, I ask people who work in PR or for
global pharmaceutical companies what they think of this state of
affairs, and their reactions are interesting. If I ask people more
junior than me, they tend to think I am setting them some kind of test
or trying to catch them out. Perhaps I’m just trying to get them to
admit that what they do is worthless so I can persuade their boss to
make them redundant? If I ask people more senior than me what they think
about this, they will usually start by saying something along the lines
of “Welcome to the real world,” like I’m some teenage dropout yet to
“get it,” and accept that I can’t stay at home playing video games and
smoking weed all day. I must admit that I spent quite a lot of time
doing that as a teenager, but I’m no longer a teenager. In fact, I’m
usually charging them a huge amount of money to write bullshit reports,
so I often then detect that there’s a moment of reflection as they
internally question who it is that really doesn’t “get it.”

Hannibal is at the top of his game: an accomplished researcher who can
walk with confidence in the corridors of corporate power. He’s aware,
too, that in the professional world, playing the part is everything:
form is always valued over content, and from all indications, he can
perform the role with consummate skill.¹⁸ Thus, he can see his bullshit
activities as basically a kind of scam; something he’s putting over on
the corporate world. He can even see himself as a kind of modern-day
Robin Hood in a world where, as he put it, merely “doing something
worthwhile is subversive.”

Hannibal’s is a best-case scenario. Others turn to political activism.
This can be extremely beneficial to a worker’s emotional and physical
health,¹⁹ and is usually easier to integrate with the fragmented nature
of office time—this is true of digital activism, at least—than more
conventional creative pursuits. Still, the psychological and emotional
labor required to balance meaningful interests and bullshit work is
often daunting. I’ve already mentioned Nouri’s work-related health
problems, which began to improve markedly when he began working to
unionize his workplace. It required definite mental discipline, yes, but
not nearly so great as the mental discipline required to operate
effectively in a high-pressure corporate environment where one knew
one’s work had no effect at all:

Nouri: I used to have to go literally “insane” to get into work. Scrub
away “me” and become the thing that can do this work. Afterward, I’d
often need a day to recover; to remember who I am. (If I didn’t, I’d
become an acerbic, nitpicky person to people in my private life, enraged
over tiny things.)

So I’d have to find all sorts of mental technologies to make my work
bearable. The most effective motivations were deadlines and rage. (For
example, pretending I was slighted, so I’d “show them” with my excellent
productivity.) But as a result, it was hard to organize the different
parts of me, the ancient things which cohere into “me”; they quickly
went off-kilter.

In contrast, I could stay up late for hours working on workplace
organizer stuff, like teaching coworkers how to negotiate, programming,
project management . . . I was most fully myself then. My imagination
and logic worked in concert. Until I saw dreams and had to sleep.

Nouri, too, experienced working on something meaningful as entirely
different. True, unlike Hannibal, he wasn’t working with a collaborative
team. But even working toward a larger meaningful purpose, he felt,
allowed him to reintegrate a shattered self. And eventually he did begin
to find the seeds of a community, at least in the minimal form of a
fellow isolated workplace organizer:

Nouri: I began to introduce myself to people by saying that programming
is my day job, and workplace organizer is my real job. My workplace
subsidizes my activism.

Recently I found someone very much like me online; we’ve become deep,
deep friends, and as of last week, I find it so much easier to get into
“the zone” for work. I think it’s because someone understands me. For
all my other “close” friends, I’m an active listener, a sounding
board—because they simply don’t understand the things I care about.
Their eyes glaze over when I even mention my activism.

But even now, I still must empty my mind for work. I listen to Sigur
Rós—“Varðeldur,” which my new friend sent me. Then I go into a sort of
meditative trance. When the song’s done, my mind’s empty, and I can run
fairly nimbly through work.

It’s always a good idea to end a bleak chapter on a note of redemption,
and these stories demonstrate that it is possible to find purpose and
meaning despite even the worst of bullshit jobs. It also makes clear
that this takes a great deal of doing. The “art of skiving,” as it’s
sometimes called in England, may be highly developed and even honored in
certain working-class traditions, but proper shirking does seem to
require something real to shirk. In a truly bullshit job, it’s often
entirely unclear what one is really supposed to be doing, what one can
say about what one is and isn’t doing, who one can ask and what one can
ask them, how much and within what parameters one is expected to pretend
to be working, and what sorts of things it is or is not permissible to
do instead. This is a miserable situation. The effects on health and
self-esteem are often devastating. Creativity and imagination crumble.

Sadomasochistic power dynamics frequently emerge. (In fact, I would
argue they will almost invariably emerge within top-down situations
devoid of purpose unless explicit efforts are made to ensure that they
do not—and sometimes even despite such efforts.) It is not for nothing
that I’ve referred to the results as spiritual violence. This violence
has affected our culture. Our sensibilities. Above all, it has affected
our youth. Young people in Europe and North America in particular, but
increasingly throughout the world, are being psychologically prepared
for useless jobs, trained in how to pretend to work, and then by various
means shepherded into jobs that almost nobody really believes serve any
meaningful purpose.²⁰

How this has come to happen, and how the current situation has become
normalized or even encouraged, is a topic we will explore in chapter 5.
It needs to be addressed, because this is a genuine scar across our
collective soul.


Chapter 5


Why Are Bullshit Jobs Proliferating?

In the Scilly Islands . . . the natives of that group are popularly said
to have eked out a precarious livelihood by taking in each other’s
washing.

—obscure nineteenth-century joke

A bourgeois paradise will supervene, in which everyone will be free to
exploit—but there will be no one to exploit. On the whole, one must
suppose that the type of it would be that town that I have heard of,
whose inhabitants lived by taking in each other’s washing.

—William Morris, 1887

If the preceding chapters merely described forms of pointless employment
that have always been with us in one way or another—or even that have
always been with us since the dawn of capitalism—then matters would be
distressing enough. But the situation is more dire still. There is every
reason to believe that the overall number of bullshit jobs, and, even
more, the overall percentage of jobs considered bullshit by those who
hold them, has been increasing rapidly in recent years—alongside the
ever-increasing bullshitization of useful forms of employment. In other
words, this is not just a book about a hitherto neglected aspect of the
world of work. It’s a book about a real social problem. Economies around
the world have, increasingly, become vast engines for producing
nonsense.

Figure 2 Distribution of the labor force by sector, 1840–2010

[Image]

How did this happen? And why has it received so little public attention?
One reason it has been so little acknowledged, I think, is that under
our current economic system, this is precisely what is not supposed to
happen: in the same way as the fact that so many people feel so unhappy
being paid to do nothing defies our common assumptions about human
nature, the fact that so many people are being paid to do nothing in the
first place defies all our assumptions about how market economies are
supposed to work. For much of the twentieth century, state Socialist
regimes dedicated to full employment created bogus jobs as a matter of
public policy, and their social democratic rivals in Europe and
elsewhere at least colluded in featherbedding and overstaffing in the
public sector or with government contractors, when they weren’t
establishing self-conscious make-work programs like the Works Progress
Administration (WPA), as the United States did at the height of the
Great Depression. All of this was supposed to have ended with the
collapse of the Soviet bloc and worldwide market reforms in the
nineties. If the joke under the Soviet Union was “We pretend to work;
they pretend to pay us,” the new neoliberal age was supposed to be all
about efficiency. But if patterns of employment are anything to go by,
this seems to be exactly the opposite of what actually happened after
the Berlin Wall came down in 1989.

So part of the reason no one has noticed is that people simply refused
to believe that capitalism could produce such results—even if that meant
writing off their own experiences or those of their friends and family
as somehow anomalous.

Another reason the phenomenon has been able to sail past people’s heads
is that we have developed a way of talking about changes in the nature
of employment that seems to explain a lot of what we see and hear
happening around us in this regard, but is, in fact, profoundly
deceptive. I’m referring to the rise of what’s called the “service
economy.” Since the 1980s, all conversations on changes in the structure
of employment have had to begin with an acknowledgment that the overall
global trend, especially in rich countries, has been for a steady
decline in farming and manufacturing, and a steady increase in something
called “services.” Here, for instance, is a typical long-term analysis
of the US labor force by sector (see figure 2).¹

Often it’s assumed that the decline of manufacturing—which,
incidentally, hasn’t declined that much in terms of employment in the
United States, by 2010 only returning to about what it was at the
outbreak of the Civil War—simply meant that factories were relocated to
poorer countries. This is obviously true to an extent, but it’s
interesting to observe that the same overall trends in the composition
of employment can be observed even in the countries to which the factory
jobs were exported. Here, for instance, is India (see figure 3, below).

Figure 3 Sector contribution to GDP (%), India

[Image]

The number of industrial jobs has remained constant or increased
slightly, but otherwise the picture is not so very different.

The real problem here is with the concept of a “service economy” itself.
There is a reason I just put the term in quotation marks. Describing a
country’s economy as dominated by the service sector leaves one with the
impression that people in that country are supporting themselves
principally by serving each other iced lattes or pressing one another’s
shorts. Obviously, this isn’t really true. So what else might they be
doing? When economists speak of a fourth, or quaternary, sector (coming
after farming, manufacturing, and service provision), they usually
define it as the FIRE sector (finance, insurance, real estate). But back
in 1992, Robert Taylor, a library scientist, suggested it would be more
useful to define it as information work. The results were telling (see
figure 4).

Figure 4 Information as a Component of the Economy

[Image]

As we can see, even in 1990, the proportion of the workforce made up of
actual waiters, barbers, salesclerks, and the like was really quite
small. It also remained remarkably steady over time, holding for more
than a century at roughly 20 percent. The vast majority of those others
included in the service sector were really administrators, consultants,
clerical and accounting staff, IT professionals, and the like. This was
also the part of the service sector that was actually increasing—and
increasing quite dramatically from the 1950s onward. And while no one,
to my knowledge, has pursued this particular breakdown through to the
present, the percentage of information jobs was already rapidly on the
increase even in the latter half of the twentieth century. It seems
reasonable to conclude this trend continued, and that the bulk of the
new service jobs added to the economy were really of this same sort.

This, of course, is precisely the zone where bullshit jobs proliferate.
Obviously, not all information workers feel they are engaged in bullshit
(Taylor’s category includes scientists, teachers, and librarians), and
by no means all those who felt they are engaged in bullshit are
information workers; but if our surveys are to be trusted, it seems
evident that a majority of those classed as information workers do feel
that if their jobs were to vanish, it would make very little difference
to the world.

I think this is important to emphasize because despite the lack of
statistics, there has been a great deal of discussion since the 1990s
about the rise of information-oriented jobs and their larger effect on
society. Some, like former US Labor Secretary Robert Reich, spoke of the
rise of a new tech-savvy middle class of “symbolic analysts” who
threatened to gain all the benefits of growth and leave the
old-fashioned laboring classes languishing in poverty; others spoke of
“knowledge workers” and “information society”; some Marxists even became
convinced that new forms of what they called “immaterial labor”—founded
in marketing, entertainment, and the digital economy but spilling
outside as well into our increasingly brand-saturated, iPhone-happy
daily lives—had become the new locus of value creation—leading to
prophecies of the eventual rebellion of the digital proletariat.² Almost
everyone assumed that the rise of such jobs had something to do with the
rise of finance capital—even if there was no consensus as to how. It
just seemed to make sense that, just as Wall Street profits were derived
less and less from firms involved in commerce or manufacturing, and more
and more from debt, speculation, and the creation of complex financial
instruments, so did an ever-increasing proportion of workers come to
make their living from manipulating similar abstractions.

These days, it’s hard to recall the almost mystical aura with which the
financial sector had surrounded itself in the years leading up to 2008.
Financiers had managed to convince the public—and not just the public,
but social theorists, too (I well remember this)—that with instruments
such as collateralized debt obligations and high-speed trading
algorithms so complex they could be understood only by astrophysicists,
they had, like modern alchemists, learned ways to whisk value out of
nothing by means that others dared not even try to understand. Then, of
course, came the crash, and it turned out that most of the instruments
were scams. Many weren’t even particularly sophisticated scams.

In a way, one could argue that the whole financial sector is a scam of
sorts, since it represents itself as largely about directing investments
toward profitable opportunities in commerce and industry, when, in fact,
it does very little of that. The overwhelming bulk of its profits comes
from colluding with government to create, and then to trade and
manipulate, various forms of debt. All I am really arguing in this book
is that just as much of what the financial sector does is basically
smoke and mirrors, so are most of the information-sector jobs that
accompanied its rise as well.

But here we return to the question already raised in the last chapter:
If these are scams, who, exactly, is scamming whom?

a brief excursus on causality and the nature of sociological explanation

In this chapter, then, I want to address the rise of bullshit jobs and
to suggest some reasons this may be happening.

Of course, in earlier chapters, particularly chapter 2, we looked at
some of the more immediate causes for the creation of useless
employment: managers whose prestige is caught up in the total number of
their administrative assistants or underlings; weird corporate
bureaucratic dynamics; bad management; poor information flow. These are
important in understanding the overall phenomenon, but they don’t really
explain it. We still have to ask, Why were such bad organizational
dynamics more likely to occur in 2015 than they were in, say, 1915, or
1955? Has there been a change in organization culture, or is it
something deeper: a change, perhaps, in our very conceptions of work?

We are faced here with a classic problem in social theory: the problem
of levels of causality. In the case of any given real-world event, there
are any number of different reasons why one can say it happened. These,
in turn, can be sorted into different kinds of reason. If I fall into an
open manhole, one might attribute this to absentmindedness. But if we
discover there has been a sudden statistical increase in the number of
people falling into manholes in a given city, one must seek a different
sort of explanation—either one must understand why overall rates of
absentmindedness are going up there, or, more likely, why more manholes
are being left open. This is an intentionally whimsical example. Let’s
consider a more serious one.

At the end of the last chapter, Meena noted that while many people who
end up homeless have a history of addiction to alcohol or other drugs,
or other personal foibles, many others are teenagers abandoned by their
parents, veterans with PTSD, and women fleeing domestic violence. No
doubt if you were to pick a random person sleeping on the streets or in
a shelter and examine his or her life history, you would find a
confluence of several such factors, usually combined with a great deal
of just plain bad luck.

No one individual, then, could be said to be sleeping on the streets
simply because he or she was morally reprobate; but even if everyone
sleeping on the streets really was morally reprobate in some way, it
would be unlikely to do much to explain the rise and fall of levels of
homelessness in different decades, or why rates of homelessness vary
from country to country at any given time. This is a crucial point.
After all, consider the matter in reverse. There have been moralists
throughout the ages who have argued that the poor are poor because of
their moral turpitude: after all, we are often reminded, it’s easy to
find examples of people born poor who became wealthy owing to sheer
grit, determination, and entrepreneurial spirit. Clearly, then, the poor
remain poor because they didn’t make an effort they could have made.
This sounds convincing if you look just at individuals; it becomes much
less so when one examines comparative statistics and realizes that rates
of upward class mobility fluctuate dramatically over time. Did poor
Americans just have less get-up-and-go during the 1930s than during
previous decades? Or might it have had something to do with the Great
Depression? It becomes harder still to hold to a purely moral approach
when one also considers the fact that rates of mobility also vary
sharply from country to country. A child born to parents of modest means
in Sweden is much more likely to become wealthy than a similar child is
in the United States. Must one conclude that Swedes overall have more
grit and entrepreneurial spirit than Americans?

I doubt most contemporary conservative moralists would wish to argue
this.

One must, then, seek a different sort of explanation: access to
education, for example, or the fact that the poorest Swedish children
aren’t nearly as poor as the poorest American ones.³ This doesn’t mean
that personal qualities do not help explain why some poor Swedish
children succeed and others do not. But these are different kinds of
questions and different levels of analysis. The question of why one
player won a game rather than another is different from the question of
how hard the game is to play.

•  •  •

Or why people are playing the game to begin with. That’s a third
question. Similarly, in cases like these, where one is looking at a
broad pattern of social change, such as the rise of bullshit jobs, I
would propose we really need to look not at two but at three different
levels of explanation: (1) the particular reasons any given individual
ends up homeless; (2) the larger social and economic forces that lead to
increased levels of homelessness (say, a rise in rents, or changes in
the family structure); and, finally (3), the reasons why no one
intervened. We might refer to this last as the political and cultural
level. It’s also the easiest to overlook, since it often deals
specifically with things people are not doing. I well remember the first
time I discussed the phenomenon of homelessness in America with friends
in Madagascar. They were flabbergasted to discover that in the
wealthiest and most powerful country in the world, there were people
sleeping on the streets. “But aren’t Americans ashamed?” one friend
asked me. “They’re so rich! Doesn’t it bother them to know everyone else
in the world will see it as a national embarrassment?”

I had to concede it was a good question. Why didn’t Americans see people
sleeping on the streets as a national embarrassment? In certain periods
of US history, they certainly would have. If large numbers of people
were living on the streets in major cities in the 1820s, or even the
1940s, there would have been an outcry and some kind of action would
have been taken. It might not have been very nice action. At some
points, it would probably have meant rounding up vagrants and placing
them in workhouses; at other times, it might have involved building
public housing; but whatever it might have been, they would not have
been left to languish in cardboard boxes on public thoroughfares. Since
the 1980s, the same American was more likely to react not with outrage
at how social conditions could have come to this pass, but by appeal to
explanations of the first level—and conclude that homelessness was
nothing more than the inevitable result of human weakness. Humans are
fickle beings. They always have been. There’s nothing anyone can do to
change this fact.⁴

This is why I emphasize that the third level is simultaneously political
and cultural—it bears on basic assumptions about what people are, what
can be expected of them, and what they can justifiably demand of one
another. Those assumptions, in turn, have an enormous influence in
determining what is considered to be a political issue and what is not.
I don’t want to suggest that popular attitudes are the only factor here.
Political authorities often ignore the popular will. Polls regularly
find roughly two-thirds of Americans favor a national health care system
but no major political party there has ever supported this. Polls also
show most Britons favor reinstating the death penalty, but no major
political party has taken this up either.⁵ Still, the larger cultural
climate is clearly a factor.

•  •  •

In the case of bullshit jobs, this means we can ask three questions:

1. On the individual level, why do people agree to do and put up with
their own bullshit jobs?

2. On social and economic levels, what are the larger forces that have
led to the proliferation of bullshit jobs?

3. On the cultural and political levels, why is the bullshitization of
the economy not seen as a social problem, and why has no one done
anything about it?⁶

Much of the confusion that surrounds debate about social issues in
general can be traced back to the fact that people will regularly take
these different explanations as alternatives rather than seeing them as
factors that all operate at the same time. For example, people sometimes
tell me that any attempt to explain bullshit jobs in political terms is
wrongheaded; such jobs, they insist, exist because people need the
money—as if this consideration had somehow never occurred to me before.
Looking at the subjective motives of those who take such jobs is then
treated as an alternative to asking why so many people find themselves
in a position where the only way they can get money is by taking such
jobs to begin with.

It’s even worse on the cultural-political level. There has come to be a
tacit understanding in polite circles that you can ascribe motives to
people only when speaking about the individual level. Therefore, any
suggestion that powerful people ever do anything they don’t say they’re
doing, or even do what they can be publicly observed to be doing for
reasons other than what they say, is immediately denounced as a
“paranoid conspiracy theory” to be rejected instantly. Thus, to suggest
that some “law and order” politicians or social service providers might
not feel it’s in their best interest to do much about the underlying
causes of homelessness, is treated as equivalent to saying homelessness
itself exists only because of the machinations of a secret cabal. Or
that the banking system is run by lizards.

sundry notes on the role of government in creating and maintaining bullshit jobs

This is relevant because when, in the original 2013 essay about bullshit
jobs, I suggested that while our current work regime was never designed
consciously, one reason it might have been allowed to remain in place
was because the effects are actually quite convenient politically to
those in power; this was widely denounced as crazy talk. So another
thing this chapter can do is clarify a few things in that regard.

Social engineering does happen. The regime of make-work jobs that
existed in the Soviet Union or Communist China, for example, was created
from above by a self-conscious government policy of full employment. To
say this is in no sense controversial. Pretty much everyone accepts that
it is the case. Still, it’s hardly as if anyone sitting in the Kremlin
or the Great Hall of the People actually sent out a directive saying “I
hereby order all officials to invent unnecessary jobs until unemployment
is eliminated.”

The reason no such orders were sent out was because they didn’t have to
be. The policy spoke for itself. As long as you don’t say “Aim for full
employment, but do not create jobs unless they conform to the following
standards”—and make it clear you will be very punctilious about ensuring
those standards are met—then one can be sure of the results. Local
officials will do what they have to do.

While no central directives of this kind were ever sent out under
capitalist regimes, at least to my knowledge, it is nonetheless true
that at least since World War II, all economic policy has been premised
on an ideal of full employment. Now, there is every reason to believe
that most policy makers don’t actually want to fully achieve this ideal,
as genuine full employment would put too much “upward pressure on
wages.” Marx appears to have been right when he argued that a “reserve
army of the unemployed” has to exist in order for capitalism to work the
way it’s supposed to.⁷ But it remains true that “More Jobs” is the one
political slogan that both Left and Right can always agree on.⁸ They
differ only about the most expedient means to produce the jobs. Banners
held aloft at a union march calling for jobs never also specify that
those jobs should serve some useful purpose. It’s just assumed that they
will—which, of course, means that often they won’t. Similarly, when
right-wing politicians call for tax cuts to put more money in the hands
of “job creators,” they never specify whether those jobs will be good
for anything; it’s simply assumed that if the market produced them, they
will be. In this climate, one might say that political pressure is being
placed on those managing the economy similar to the directives once
coming out of the Kremlin; it’s just that the source is more diffuse,
and much of it falls on the private sector.

Finally, as I’ve emphasized, there is the level of conscious public
policy. A Soviet official issuing a planning document, or an American
politician calling for job creation, might not be entirely aware of the
likely effects of their action. Still, once a situation is created, even
as an unintended side effect, politicians can be expected to size up the
larger political implications of that situation when they make up their
minds what—if anything—to do about it.

Does this mean that members of the political class might actually
collude in the maintenance of useless employment? If that seems a daring
claim, even conspiracy talk, consider the following quote, from an
interview with then US president Barack Obama about some of the reasons
why he bucked the preferences of the electorate and insisted on
maintaining a private, for-profit health insurance system in America:

“I don’t think in ideological terms. I never have,” Obama said,
continuing on the health care theme. “Everybody who supports
single-payer health care says, ‘Look at all this money we would be
saving from insurance and paperwork.’ That represents one million, two
million, three million jobs [filled by] people who are working at Blue
Cross Blue Shield or Kaiser or other places. What are we doing with
them? Where are we employing them?”⁹

I would encourage the reader to reflect on this passage because it might
be considered a smoking gun. What is the president saying here? He
acknowledges that millions of jobs in medical insurance companies like
Kaiser or Blue Cross are unnecessary. He even acknowledges that a
socialized health system would be more efficient than the current
market-based system, since it would reduce unnecessary paperwork and
reduplication of effort by dozens of competing private firms. But he’s
also saying it would be undesirable for that very reason. One motive, he
insists, for maintaining the existing market-based system is precisely
its inefficiency, since it is better to maintain those millions of
basically useless office jobs than to cast about trying to find
something else for the paper pushers to do.¹⁰

So here is the most powerful man in the world at the time publicly
reflecting on his signature legislative achievement—and he is insisting
that a major factor in the form that legislature took is the
preservation of bullshit jobs.¹¹

That a political culture where “job creation” is everything might
produce such results should not be shocking (though for some reason, it
is, in fact, treated as shocking); but it does not in itself explain the
economic and social dynamics by which those jobs first come into being.
In the remainder of this chapter, we will consider these dynamics and
then return briefly to the role of government.

concerning some false explanations for the rise of bullshit jobs

Before mapping out what actually happened, it will first be necessary to
dispose of certain very common, if ill-conceived, explanations for the
rise of apparently pointless employment frequently proposed by market
enthusiasts. Since libertarians, “anarcho-capitalists,” enthusiasts for
Ayn Rand or Friedrich Hayek and the like are extremely common in pop
economic forums, and since such market enthusiasts are committed to the
assumption that a market economy could not, by definition, create jobs
that serve no purpose,¹² one tends to hear these arguments quite a lot.
So we might as well address them.¹³

Basically such arguments fall into two broad types. Proponents of each
are happy to admit that at least some of those who believe they hold
pointless jobs in the public sector are correct. However, the first
group argues that those who harbor similar suspicions in the private
sector are not correct. Since competing firms would never pay workers to
do nothing, their jobs must be useful in some way that they simply do
not understand.

The second group admits useless paper-pushing jobs do exist in the
private sector, and even that they have proliferated. However, this
group insists that private sector bullshit jobs must necessarily be a
product of government interference.

A perfect example of the first kind of argument can be found in a piece
in the Economist, published about a day and a half after the appearance
of my original “bullshit jobs” essay in 2013.¹⁴ It had all the trappings
of a rush job,¹⁵ but the very fact that this bastion of free market
orthodoxy felt the need to respond almost instantly shows that the
editors knew how to identify an ideological threat. They summed up their
argument as follows:

Over the past century, the world economy has grown increasingly complex.
The goods being provided are more complex; the supply chains used to
build them are more complex; the systems to market, sell, and distribute
them are more complex; the means to finance it all is more complex; and
so on. This complexity is what makes us rich. But it is an enormous pain
to manage. I’d say that one way to manage it all would be through teams
of generalists—craftsman managers who mind the system from the design
stage right through to the customer service calls—but there is no way
such complexity would be economically workable in that world (just as
cheap, ubiquitous automobiles would have been impossible in a world
where teams of generalist mechanics produced cars one at a time).

No, the efficient way to do things is to break businesses up into many
different kinds of tasks, allowing for a very high level of
specialization. And so you end up with the clerical equivalent of
repeatedly affixing Tab A to Frame B: shuffling papers, management of
the minutiae of supply chains, and so on. Disaggregation may make it
look meaningless, since many workers end up doing things incredibly far
removed from the end points of the process; the days when the iron ore
goes in one door and the car rolls out the other are over. But the idea
is the same.

In other words, the author claims that when we speak of “bullshit
jobs,”¹⁶ we’re really just talking about the postindustrial equivalent
of factory-line workers, those with the unenviable fate of having to
carry out the repetitive, mind-numbingly boring but still very necessary
tasks required to manage increasingly complicated processes of
production. As robots replace the factory workers, these are
increasingly the only jobs left. (This position is sometimes combined
with a rather condescending argument about self-importance: if so many
people feel their jobs are useless, it’s really because today’s educated
workforce is full of philosophy or Renaissance literature majors who
believe they are cut out for better things. They consider being a mere
cog in administrative machinery beneath their dignity.)

I don’t think I really need to dwell too much on the second argument,
since the reader is likely to have encountered variations of it a
thousand times before. Anyone who truly believes in the magic of the
marketplace will always insist that any problem, any injustice, any
absurdity that might seem to be produced by the market is really caused
by government interference with same. This must be true because the
market is freedom, and freedom is always good. Putting it this way might
sound like a caricature, but I have met libertarians willing to say
exactly that, in almost exactly those words.¹⁷ Of course, the problem
with any such argument is that it’s circular; it can’t be disproved.
Since all actually existing market systems are to some degree state
regulated, it’s easy enough to insist that any results one likes (say,
high levels of overall wealth) are the result of the workings of the
market, and that any features one doesn’t like (say, high levels of
overall poverty) are really due to government interference in the
workings of the market—and then insist that the burden of proof is on
anyone who would argue otherwise. No real evidence in favor of the
position is required because it is basically a profession of faith.¹⁸

Now, this being said, I should hasten to point out I am not saying
government regulation plays no role in the creation of bullshit jobs
(particularly of the box-ticker variety). Clearly, it does. As we’ve
already seen, whole industries, such as corporate compliance, would not
exist at all were it not for government regulations. But the argument
here is not that such regulations are one reason for the rise of
bullshit jobs, it’s that they are the primary or, even, the only reason.

To sum up, then, we have two arguments: first, that globalization has
rendered the process of production so complicated that we need ever more
office workers to administer it, so these are not bullshit jobs; second,
that while many of them are indeed bullshit jobs, they only exist
because increases in government regulation have not only created an
ever-burgeoning number of useless bureaucrats but also forced
corporations to employ armies of box tickers to keep them at bay.

Both these arguments are wrong, and I think a single example can refute
both of them. Let us consider the case of private universities in the
United States. Here are two tables, both drawn from Benjamin Ginsberg’s
book The Fall of the Faculty, about the administrative take-over of
American universities, which give us pretty much all we need to know.
The first shows the growth in the proportion of administrators and their
staff in American universities overall. During the thirty years in
question, a time during which tuition skyrocketed, the overall number of
teachers per student remained largely constant (in fact, the period
ended with slightly fewer teachers per student than before). At the same
time, the number of administrators and, above all, administrative staff
ballooned to an unprecedented degree (see figure 5).

Figure 5 Changes in the Supply of and Demand for Administrative
Services, 1985–2005

Staff

+240%

Administrators

+85%

Student Enrollments

+56%

Faculty

+50%

No. of Degree-Granting Institutions

+50%

No. of BA Degrees Granted

+47%

Source: Calculated from NCES, “Digest,” 2006

Is this because the process of “production”—in this case, this would
presumably mean teaching, reading, writing, and research—had become two
or three times more complicated between 1985 and 2005, so that it now
requires a small army of office staff to administer it?¹⁹ Obviously not.
Here I can speak from personal experience. Certainly, things have
changed a bit since I was in college in the 1980s—lecturers are now
expected to provide PowerPoint displays instead of writing on
blackboards; there’s greater use of class blogs, Moodle pages, and the
like. But all this is pretty minor stuff. It’s nothing even remotely
comparable to, say, the containerization of shipping, Japanese-style
“just in time” production regimes, or the globalization of supply
chains. For the most part, teachers continue to do what they have always
done: give lectures, lead seminars, meet students during office hours,
and grade papers and exams.²⁰

What about the heavy hand of government, then? Ginsberg provides us with
a refutation to that claim, too, again in one easy table (see figure 6).

Figure 6 Administrative Growth at Public and Private Institutions,
1975–2005

 

1975

1995

2005

change

Administrators and Managers at Public Colleges

60,733

82,396

101,011

+66%

Administrators and Managers at Public Colleges

40,530

65,049

65,049

+135%

Source: Calculated from NCES, “Digest,” 2006

In reality, the number of administrators and managers at private
institutions increased at more than twice the rate as it did at public
ones. It seems extremely unlikely that government regulation caused
private sector administrative jobs to be created at twice the rate as it
did within the government bureaucracy itself. In fact, the only
reasonable interpretation of these numbers is precisely the opposite:
public universities are ultimately answerable to the public, and hence,
under constant political pressure to cut costs and not engage in
wasteful expenditures. This may lead to some peculiar priorities (in
most US states, the highest-paid public servant is a football or
basketball coach at a state university), but it does tend to limit the
degree to which a newly appointed dean can simply decide that, since he
is obviously a very important person, it is only natural that he should
have five or six additional administrative staff working under him—and
only then begin trying to figure out what said staff are actually going
to do. Administrators at private universities are answerable only to
their board of trustees. Trustees are usually extremely rich. If they
are not themselves creatures of the corporate world, they are at the
very least used to moving in environments shaped by its mores and
sensibilities—and as a result, they tend to view such a dean’s behavior
as entirely normal and unobjectionable.

Ginsberg himself sees the increase in the numbers and power of
university administrators as a simple power grab—one which, he says, has
resulted in a profound shift in assumptions about the very nature of
universities and the reasons for their existence. Back in the 1950s or
1960s, one could still say that universities were one of the few
European institutions that had survived more or less intact from the
Middle Ages. Crucially, they were still run on the old medieval
principle that only those involved in a certain form of
production—whether this be the production of stonework or leather gloves
or mathematical equations—had the right to organize their own affairs;
indeed that they were also the only people qualified to do so.
Universities were basically craft guilds run for and by scholars, and
their most important business was considered to be producing
scholarship, their second-most, training new generations of scholars.
True, since the nineteenth century, universities had maintained a kind
of gentleman’s pact with government, that they would also train civil
servants (and later, corporate bureaucrats) in exchange for otherwise
being largely left alone. But since the eighties, Ginsberg argues,
university administrators have effectively staged a coup. They wrested
control of the university from the faculty and oriented the institution
itself toward entirely different purposes. It is now commonplace for
major universities to put out “strategic vision documents” that barely
mention scholarship or teaching but go on at length about “the student
experience,” “research excellence” (getting grants), collaboration with
business or government, and so forth.

All this rings very true for anyone familiar with the university scene,
but the question remains: If this was a coup, how did the administrators
manage to get away with it? One has to assume that even in the 1880s,
there were university administrators who would have been delighted to
seize power in this way and each hire themselves a retinue of minions.
What happened in the intervening century that put them in a position to
actually do so? And whatever it was, how is it connected to the rise of
the total proportion of managers, administrators, and meaningless paper
pushers outside the academy that occurred during the same period of
time?

Since this is the period that also saw the rise of finance capitalism,
it might be best to return to the FIRE sector (finance, insurance, real
estate) to seek insight into what overall dynamic in the economy sparked
such changes. If those whom the Economist believes to be administering
complex global supply chains are not, in fact, administering complex
global supply chains, then what exactly are they doing? And does what is
happening in those offices provide any sort of window on what is
happening elsewhere?

why the financial industry might be considered a paradigm for bullshit job creation

• expedited frictionless convergences

• coordinated interactive market institutions

• contracted virtual clearinghouses

• directed margin adjustments ²¹

On a superficial level, of course, the immediate mechanisms that create
bullshit jobs in the FIRE sector are the same ones that produce them
anywhere else. I listed some of these in chapter 2, when I described the
five basic types of bullshit jobs and how they came about. Flunky
positions are created because those in powerful positions in an
organization see underlings as badges of prestige; goons are hired due
to a dynamic of one-upmanship (if our rivals employ a top law firm, then
so, too, must we); duct-taper positions are created because sometimes
organizations find it more difficult to fix a problem than to deal with
its consequences; box-ticker positions exist because, within large
organizations, paperwork attesting to the fact that certain actions have
been taken often comes to be seen as more important than the actions
themselves; taskmasters exist largely as side effects of various forms
of impersonal authority. If large organizations are conceived as a
complex play of gravitational forces, pulling in many contradictory
directions, one could say there will always be a certain pull in any of
these five. Even so, one must ask: Why is there not a greater pressure
pulling in the opposite direction? Why is this not seen as more of a
problem? Firms like to represent themselves as lean and mean.

It seems to me that those creating, playing around with, and destroying
large amounts of money in the FIRE sector provide the perfect place to
begin to ask this question—in part because many who work in this sector
are convinced that almost everything done in it is basically a scam.²²

Elliot: So I did a job for a little while working for one of the “big
four” accountancy firms. They had been contracted by a bank to provide
compensation to customers that had been involved in the PPI scandal. The
accountancy firm was paid by the case, and we were paid by the hour. As
a result, they purposefully mis-trained and disorganized staff so that
the jobs were repeatedly and consistently done wrong. The systems and
practices were changed and modified all the time, to ensure no one could
get used to the new practice and actually do the work correctly. This
meant that cases had to be redone and contracts extended.

In case the reader is unaware, the PPI (payment protection insurance)
scandal broke in the United Kingdom in 2006, when a large number of
banks were found to have been unloading unwanted and often wildly
disadvantageous account insurance policies on their clients. Courts
ordered much of the money returned, and the result was an entire new
industry organized around resolving PPI claims. As Elliot reported it,
at least some of those hired to process these claims were intentionally
dragging their feet to milk the contract for all they could.

Elliot: The senior management had to be aware of this, but it was never
explicitly stated. In looser moments, some of the management said things
like “We make money from dealing with a leaky pipe—do you fix the pipe,
or do you let the pipe keep leaking?” (or words to that effect). There
had been vast sums set aside by the bank to pay compensation for the
PPI.

This is actually a fairly common story in the testimonies I received: I
heard about similar things going on in law firms involved with asbestos
compensation payments as well. Whenever a very large sum of money, in
the hundreds of millions, is set aside to compensate an entire class of
people, a bureaucracy must be set up to locate claimants, process
claims, and portion out the money. This bureaucracy may often involve
hundreds or even thousands of people. Since the money that pays their
salaries is ultimately coming from the same pot, they have no particular
incentive to distribute the spoils efficiently. That would be killing
the goose that laid the golden egg! According to Elliot, this often led
to “crazy, surreal stuff” like intentionally placing offices in
different cities and forcing people to commute between them, or printing
and destroying the same documents a half dozen times—all the while
threatening legal action against anyone who revealed such practices to
outsiders.²³ Clearly, the point was to siphon off as much of the money
as possible before it got to the claimants; the longer the lower-level
people took, the more the company would earn; but owing to the peculiar
dynamic discussed in the last chapter, the very pointlessness of the
exercise seemed to exacerbate levels of stress and abusive behavior.

Elliot: The cynicism involved was remarkable. I guess it works out to a
form of parasitism. As it happens, the job was also extremely difficult
and stressful: it appeared that part of their business model was placing
impossible targets which would increase all the time so that turnover
was high and more staff would regularly have to be brought in and
mis-trained, so that, I imagine, the firm could plausibly ask their
client that the contract be extended further.

This was demoralizing, of course. I’m now working as a cleaner, which is
the least bullshit/alienated job I have ever had.

David: So this sounds like a whole new category: jobs intentionally done
wrong! How common do you think that is?

Elliot: From what I’ve heard among other people in different companies,
the PPI industry is basically built around this principle, on the basis
that apparently it’s only large accountancy firms that really have the
capacity to take on contracts like that.

David: Well, I see how one could make the argument that in any system
where you are basically dealing with the distribution of spoils, it
makes sense to create as many layers of parasites in between as
possible. But who were they ultimately milking? Their clients? Or who?

Elliot: I’m not sure who was ultimately paying for this. The bank? An
insurance company that insured the bank against losses on fraud
activities in the first place? Of course, ultimately it would be the
consumer and taxpayer who pay; all these companies need to know is how
to milk it.

As long ago as 1852, Charles Dickens, in Bleak House, was already making
fun of the legal profession with the case of Jarndyce and Jarndyce—in
which two teams of barristers keep the battle over a huge estate alive
for more than a lifetime, until they’ve devoured the whole thing,
whereupon they simply declare the matter moot and move on. The moral of
the story is that when a profit-seeking enterprise is in the business of
distributing a very large sum of money, the most profitable thing for it
to do is to be as inefficient as possible.

Of course, this is basically what the entire FIRE sector does: it
creates money (by making loans) and then moves it around in often
extremely complicated ways, extracting another small cut with every
transaction. The results often leave bank employees feeling that the
entire enterprise is just as pointless as the accountancy company’s
intentionally mis-training employees to milk a cash cow. Surprising
numbers of bank employees can’t even figure out what the real
justification for their particular species of bank is supposed to be.

Bruce: I work as a fund accountant at a custodian bank. I’ve never
really figured out what custodian banks do. I understand the concepts
associated with custodian banks, but I always thought of them as just an
unnecessary added layer of accounting. Custodian banks safeguard
concepts such as stocks and bonds. How do they actually do that? Can
Russian hackers steal these concepts? As far as I can see, the entire
custodian bank industry is bullshit.

One reason for the confusion, perhaps, is that the level of general
fear, stress, and paranoia appears to be much greater in banks than in
most of the other enterprises we’ve been considering so far. Employees
are under enormous pressure not to ask too many questions. One rebel
banker, who described to me in detail the machinations by which the
biggest banks would lobby the government to introduce regulations to
their advantage and then expect everyone to play along with the pretense
that the regulations had simply been imposed, told me he thought it’s
almost as bad as coming out as gay would have been in the 1950s: “There
are many people who have read ‘on the phenomenon of bullsh*t jobs’ and
know of the reality of our industry, yet they (including myself) are
consumed by fear of losing our jobs, so we don’t talk about or discuss
these issues openly. We lie to ourselves, our colleagues, and our
families.”

Such sentiments were commonplace. Almost all bank workers I corresponded
with insisted on elaborate secrecy, effacing any detail that might
possibly connect them to their employer. At the same time, many
emphasized how cathartic it was to be able to finally express things
that had been percolating through their minds for so many years. Here,
for instance, is the testimony of Rupert, an economic refugee from
Australia now working in the City of London, on bullshitization within
the financial institution where he presently works:

Rupert: So in banking, obviously the entire sector adds no value and is
therefore bullshit. But let’s leave that to the side for a minute and
look at those within banking who literally do nothing. There actually
are not all that many of these because banking is a weird mix. Overall
we do nothing, yet within that nothing it’s efficient, meritocratic, and
in general lean.

Still, the most obvious is the cheerleader Human Resources Department.
At some point, banking realized that everyone hates them, and that their
staff knows this, too, so they set about trying to make the staff feel
better about it all. We have an intranet that HR was told to make into a
kind of internal “community,” like Facebook. They set it up; nobody used
it. So they then started to try and bully everyone into using it, which
made us hate it even more. Then they tried to entice people in by having
HR post a load of touchy-feely crap or people writing “internal blogs”
that nobody cared about. Still nobody comes.

Three years they’ve been at this, the internal intranet Facebook page is
just full of HR people saying something cheesy about the company and
then other HR people saying “Great post! I really agree with this.” How
they can stand this, I have no idea. It’s a monument to the total lack
of cohesiveness in banking.

Another one is they have some big drive to do charity for a week. I
refuse to participate as though I give to charity, I will not give
through my bank, as for them it’s just a big advertising drive in an
attempt to shore up morale internally and make it look like banking
isn’t appropriating labor through usury. They put out a “target” of,
say, ninety percent participation—all “voluntary”—and then for two
months, they try to get people to sign up. If you don’t sign up, they
note your name, and then people come and ask you why you haven’t signed
up. In the last two weeks before the end of it, we get automated mails
that look like they come from the CEO “encouraging” you to sign up. The
last time, I was actually worried about losing my job over holding out.
For me, this would have been bad, as I’m in a foreign country on a work
visa with no right to remain. But hold on I did.

The number of man-hours spent chasing this “voluntary” charity work is
amazing. “Voluntold” is, I believe the technical term.

The charity work itself is totally empty. Things like two hours of
litter picking. Giving bad sandwiches to the homeless where someone else
organizes all the sandwich packages, etc., and bank employees just turn
up and hand them out then go home again in their nice cars. A lot of the
charity work is driven by “best company to work for in X” awards that
stipulate criteria like “charitable work.” The bank then has to hit that
criteria to be considered, which will then help them with recruiting.
They spend god knows how many hours every year trying to do this.

Okay, next: the time sheet guy . . .

After listing a few positions that could easily be automated away and
seem to exist only to provide employment, Rupert ends with the most
apparently useless position of all:

Rupert: Finally, middle management. The other day, I had to get an
approval from someone at middle-management level. I clicked on a system
to email out approval requests. Twenty-five middle managers were listed
(only one needed to approve). I had only ever heard of one of them. What
are these people doing all day long? Are they not worried about being
found out and having to work at McDonald’s?

According to those middle managers who’ve contacted me, the answer to
“What are these people doing all day long” would be, in many cases, at
least, “Not much.” So in Rupert’s estimation, at least, in the lower
echelons, competence and efficiency actually do seem to be the reigning
values; the higher one goes up the ladder, the less true this appears to
be.

Rupert’s account is fascinating from any number of perspectives. Take
the theme of how artificial contests operate as a mechanism of
bullshitization, one that cropped up in numerous other contexts as well.
Many of the follies of local government in the UK, for instance, are
driven by a similar desire to be named “best council” in a given region,
or in the country as a whole. In every case, such contests set off a
frenzy of box-ticking rituals, climaxing, in this case, in the
ridiculous simulations of charity demanded of present employees so as to
be able to tell potential future employees that their company has been
voted one of the best places to work. Most of the other elements in
Rupert’s testimony appear in other accounts from inside major financial
institutions as well: the confused mix of frenetic, stressful, but
almost magic efficiency in some sectors, the obvious bloat in others;
all in a context where no one was quite sure what the bank really did or
if it was even a legitimate enterprise; the fact that such questions
could never be discussed.

Another common theme was the way many of those laboring in financial
institutions—to a much larger degree than those in most large
corporations—had little or no idea how their work contributed to the
bank as a whole. Irene, for example, worked for several major investment
banks in “Onboarding”—that is, monitoring whether the bank’s clients (in
this case, various hedge funds and private equity funds) were in
compliance with government regulations. In theory, every transaction the
bank engaged in had to be assessed. The process was self-evidently
corrupt, since the real work was outsourced to shady outfits in Bermuda,
Mauritius, and or the Cayman Islands (“where bribes are cheap”), and
they invariably found everything to be in order. Nonetheless, since a
100% percent approval rate would hardly do, an elaborate edifice had to
be erected so as to make it look as if sometimes, they did indeed find
problems sometimes. So Irene would report that the outsider reviewers
had okayed the transaction, and a Quality Control board would review
Irene’s paperwork and duly locate typos and other minor errors. Then the
total number of “fails” in each department would be turned over to be
tabulated by a metrics division, this allowing everyone involved to
spend hours every week in meetings arguing over whether any particular
“fail” was real.

Irene: There was an even higher caste of bullshit, propped atop the
metrics bullshit, which were the data scientists. Their job was to
collect the fail metrics and apply complex software to make pretty
pictures out of the data. The bosses would then take these pretty
pictures to their bosses, which helped ease the awkwardness inherent in
the fact that they had no idea what they were talking about or what any
of their teams actually did. At [Big Bank A], I had five bosses in two
years. At [Big Bank B], I had three. The vast majority were installed,
cherry-picked by higher-ups, and “gifted” these castles of shit. In many
cases, sadly, it was how the companies met their
minorities-in-management quota.

So once again, we have the same combination of fraud, pretense (no one
was allowed to talk about the shady companies in the Cayman Islands), a
system designed not to be understood, which was then pushed off on
managers who had no idea what was going on below them, largely because
it made no sense. It was all just a meaningless ritual. What’s entirely
unclear is whether anyone on top of the food chain—the data crunchers,
the just-passing-through executives, even the higher-ups who chose
them—actually knew how pointless it all was.

Finally, on top of the usual artificially induced stress and tension and
barking about deadlines, the usual sadomasochistic interpersonal
relations, and the usual fearful silences (that is, all the things that
typically happen when pointless projects are organized on top-down
lines), there was the intense pressure on employees to take part in a
different set of rituals designed to prove the institution really cared.
In Irene’s case, these were not staged charity events, but New Agey
seminars that often drove her to the point of tears:

Irene: On top of the metrics, there were the cruel, patronizing
“flexibility” and “mindfulness” seminars. No, you can’t work fewer
hours. No you can’t get paid more. No, you can’t choose which bullshit
projects to decline. But you can sit through this seminar, where the
bank tells you how much it values flexibility.

The mindfulness seminars were even worse. They attempted to reduce the
unfathomable beauty and stupefying sadness of the human experience into
the raw physicality of breathing, eating, and shitting. Breathe
mindfully. Eat mindfully. Shit mindfully, and you can be successful in
business.

All of this, presumably, to remind the employee that if one reduced life
to pure physicality, the fact that some abstractions were more “real”
than others, and that some office tasks seemed to serve a legal and
moral or even economic purpose and others did not, was not really all
that important. It’s as if they first forbid you to acknowledge you are
engaging in empty ritual, then force you to attend seminars where hired
gurus tell you, “In the final analysis, isn’t everything we do just
empty ritual?”

What we’ve seen so far from Elliot, Rupert, and Irene are all partial,
situated perspectives on very large and complicated organizations. None
of them has an overall, panoptic view. But it’s not entirely clear if
anyone else does, either. One has to assume the higher-ups in Irene’s
story, who intentionally assign executives from minority backgrounds to
the onboarding sector, are aware that most of what goes on in that part
of the company is bullshit. Even they might not know precisely how and
why. Nor would it be possible to create some kind of secret survey to
determine what percentage of bank workers secretly believe their jobs to
be bullshit and the divisions in which they tend to be concentrated. The
closest I was able to find to general insight came from a certain Simon,
who had been employed by a series of large international banks in risk
management, which basically, he says, means to analyze and “find
problems in their internal processes.”

Simon: I spent two years analyzing the critical payment and operations
processes at one bank, with the sole aim to work out how a staff member
might use the computer systems to commit fraud and theft, and thereby
recommend solutions to prevent this. What I discovered by chance was
that most people at the bank didn’t know why they were doing what they
were doing. They would say that they are only supposed to log into this
one system and select one menu option and type certain things in. They
didn’t know why.

So Simon’s job was basically to be the all-seeing eye that determined
how different parts of a bank’s many moving parts fit together and iron
out any incoherences, vulnerabilities, or redundancies he might find. In
other words, he’s about as qualified to answer the question as anyone
could be. His conclusions?

Simon: In my conservative estimation, eighty percent of the bank’s sixty
thousand staff were not needed. Their jobs could either completely be
performed by a program or were not needed at all because the programs
were designed to enable or replicate some bullshit process to begin
with.

In other words, forty-eight thousand of the bank’s sixty thousand
employees did nothing useful—or nothing that couldn’t easily be done by
a machine. These were, Simon believed, de facto bullshit jobs, even if
the bank workers themselves were deprived of the means to assess or
collectively analyze the situation, and expected to keep any suspicions
to themselves. But why didn’t the bank’s higher-ups figure this out and
do something about it? Well, the easiest way to answer that question is
to observe what happened when Simon did suggest reforms:

Simon: In one instance, I created a program that solved a critical
security problem. I went to present it to an executive, who included all
his consultants in the meeting. There were twenty-five of them in the
boardroom. The hostility I faced during and after the meeting was
severe, as I slowly realized that my program automated everything they
were currently being paid to do by hand. It’s not as if they enjoyed it;
it was tedious work, monotonous and boring. The cost of my program was
five percent of what they were paying those twenty-five people. But they
were adamant.

I found many similar problems and came up with solutions. But in all my
time, not one of my recommendations was ever actioned. Because in every
case, fixing these problems would have resulted in people losing their
jobs, as those jobs served no purpose other than giving the executive
they reported to a sense of power.

So even if these jobs didn’t originate as flunky jobs, which presumably
most didn’t, they ended up being maintained as such. The threat of
automation, of course, is an ongoing concern in any large
enterprise—I’ve heard of companies where programmers will show up to
work wearing T-shirts that say “Go Away or I Will Replace You with a
Very Small Shell Script”—but in this case, and many like it, the concern
went to the very top: to the very executives who (if, for instance, they
are involved in private equity in any way) pride themselves on the
ruthlessness with which they acquired other corporations and saddled
them with enormous debts in the name of downsizing and efficiency. These
very same executives prided themselves on their own bloated staffs. In
fact, if Simon is also correct, they did so because that’s what a large
bank really was: it was made up of a series of feudal retinues, each
answerable to some lordly executive.²⁴

on some ways in which the current form of managerial feudalism resembles classical feudalism, and other ways in which it does not

The upper quintile is growing in size and income because all the value
created by actual productive workers in the lower quintiles gets
extracted by those at the top. When the top classes rob everybody else,
they need a lot more guard labor to keep their stolen loot secure.

—Kevin Carson

If we return to the example of the feudal overlord in chapter 2, this
actually makes perfect sense. I was using feudal overlords and retainers
as a metaphor at that point. But in the case of banks, at least, it’s
not clear how much is metaphor and how much is literal truth. As I
pointed out, feudalism is essentially a redistributive system. Peasants
and craftsmen produce things, to a large extent autonomously; lords
siphon off a share of what they produce, usually by dint of some complex
set of legal rights and traditions (“direct juro-political extraction”
is the technical phrase I learned in college),²⁵ and then go about
portioning out shares of the loot to their own staff, flunkies,
warriors, retainers—and to a lesser extent, by sponsoring feasts and
festivals and by occasional gifts and favors, giving some of it back to
the craftsmen and peasants once again. In such an arrangement, it makes
little sense to speak of separate spheres of “politics” and “the
economy” because the goods are extracted through political means and
distributed for political purposes. In fact, it was only with the first
stirrings of industrial capitalism that anyone started talking about
“the economy” as an autonomous sphere of human activity in the first
place.

Under capitalism, in the classic sense of the term, profits derive from
the management of production: capitalists hire people to make or build
or fix or maintain things, and they cannot take home a profit unless
their total overhead—including the money they pay their workers and
contractors—comes out less than the value of the income they receive
from their clients or customers. Under classic capitalist conditions of
this sort it does indeed make no sense to hire unnecessary workers.
Maximizing profits means paying the least number of workers the least
amount of money possible; in a very competitive market, those who hire
unnecessary workers are not likely to survive. Of course, this is why
doctrinaire libertarians, or, for that matter, orthodox Marxists, will
always insist that our economy can’t really be riddled with bullshit
jobs; that all this must be some sort of illusion. But by a feudal
logic, where economic and political considerations overlap, the same
behavior makes perfect sense. As with the PPI distributors, the whole
point is to grab a pot of loot, either by stealing it from one’s enemies
or extracting it from commoners by means of fees, tolls, rents, and
levies, and then redistributing it. In the process, one creates an
entourage of followers that is both the visible measure of one’s pomp
and magnificence, and at the same time, a means of distributing
political favor: for instance, by buying off potential malcontents,
rewarding faithful allies (goons), or creating an elaborate hierarchy of
honors and titles for lower-ranking nobles to squabble over.

If all of this very much resembles the inner workings of a large
corporation, I would suggest that this is no coincidence: such
corporations are less and less about making, building, fixing, or
maintaining things and more and more about political processes of
appropriating, distributing, and allocating money and resources. This
means that, once again, it’s increasingly difficult to distinguish
politics and economics, as we have seen with the advent of
“too-big-to-fail” banks, whose lobbyists typically write the very laws
by which government supposedly regulates them, but even more, by the
fact that financial profits themselves are gathered largely through
direct juro-political means. JPMorgan Chase & Co., for example, the
largest bank in America, reported in 2006 that roughly two-thirds of its
profits were derived from “fees and penalties,” and “finance” in general
really refers to trading in other people’s debts—debts which, of course,
are enforceable in courts of law.²⁶

It’s almost impossible to get accurate figures about exactly what
proportion of a typical family’s income in, say, America, or Denmark, or
Japan, is extracted each month by the FIRE sector, but there is every
reason to believe it is not only a very substantial chunk but also is
now a distinctly greater chunk of total profits than those the corporate
sector derives directly from making or selling goods and services in
those same countries. Even those firms we see as the very heart of the
old industrial order—General Motors and General Electric in America, for
example—now derive all, or almost all, of their profits from their own
financial divisions. GM, for example, makes its money not from selling
cars but rather from interest collected on auto loans.

Still, there is one crucial difference between medieval feudalism and
the current, financialized version. We’ve already mentioned it earlier
in the chapter. Medieval feudalism was based on a principle of
self-governance in the domain of production. Anyone whose work was based
on some kind of specialized knowledge, whether lace makers,
wheelwrights, merchants, legal scholars, was expected to collectively
regulate their own affairs, or including who would be allowed to enter
the profession and how they would be trained, with minimal supervision
from anybody else. Guilds and similar organizations typically had
elaborate hierarchies within (though not always so much as they do
today: in many medieval universities, for instance, students elected
their professors), but at the very least, a medieval sword smith or soap
maker could go about his work in the confidence that he would never have
anyone who was not himself a sword smith or a soap maker telling him he
was not going about it correctly. Industrial capitalism obviously
changed all that, and the rise of managerialism in the twentieth century
drove the process even further; but rather than this in any sense
reversing under financialized capitalism, the situation has actually
worsened. “Efficiency” has come to mean vesting more and more power to
managers, supervisors, and other presumed “efficiency experts,” so that
actual producers have almost zero autonomy.²⁷ At the same time, the
ranks and orders of managers seem to reproduce themselves endlessly.

•  •  •

If one wants a parable for what seems to have happened to capitalism
over the last forty-odd years, perhaps the best example I know is the
Elephant Tea factory outside Marseille, France, currently occupied by
its employees. I visited the plant a few years ago, and one of the
occupiers—who took me and some friends on a tour of the grounds—told us
the story of what happened. Originally, it was a local enterprise, but
during the age of mergers and acquisitions, the company was bought up by
Unilever, owner of Lipton, the world’s largest tea producer. At first,
the company left the organization of the plant more or less alone. The
workers, however, were in the habit of tinkering with the machinery, and
by the nineties, they had introduced a series of improvements that sped
up production by more than 50 percent, thus markedly increasing profits.

Now, in the fifties, sixties, and seventies, there was a tacit
understanding in much of the industrialized world that if productivity
in a certain enterprise improved, a certain share of the increased
profits would be redistributed to the workers in the form of improved
wages and benefits. Since the eighties, this is no longer the case. So
here.

“Did they give any of that money to us?” our guide asked. “No. Did they
use it to hire more workers, or new machinery, to expand operations? No.
They didn’t do that, either. So what did they do? They started hiring
more and more white-collar workers. Originally, when I started working
here, there were just two of them: the boss and the HR guy. It had been
like that for years. Now suddenly there were three, four, five, seven
guys in suits wandering around. The company made up different fancy
titles for them, but basically all of them spent their time trying to
think of something to do. They’d be walking up and down the catwalks
every day, staring at us, scribbling notes while we worked. Then they’d
have meetings and discuss it and write reports. But they still couldn’t
figure out any real excuse for their existence. Then finally, one of
them hit on a solution: ‘Why don’t we just shut down the whole plant,
fire the workers, and move operations to Poland?’ ”

Generally speaking, extra managers are hired with the ostensible purpose
of improving efficiency. But in this case, there was little to be
improved; the workers themselves had boosted efficiency about as much as
it was possible to do. But the managers were hired anyway. What this
suggests is that what we are really dealing with here has nothing to do
with efficiency but everything to do with changing understandings of the
moral responsibilities of corporations. From roughly 1945 to 1975, there
was what is sometimes referred to as a “Keynesian bargain” between
workers, employers, and government—and part of the tacit understanding
was that increases in worker productivity would indeed be matched by
increases in worker compensation. A glance at the diagram on the next
page confirms that this was exactly what happened. In the 1970s, the two
began to part ways, with compensation remaining largely flat, and
productivity taking off like a rocket (see figure 7).

These figures are for the United States, but similar trends can be
observed in virtually all industrialized countries.

Where did the profits from this increased productivity go? Well, much of
it, as we are often reminded, ended up swelling the fortunes of the
wealthiest 1 percent: investors, executives, and the upper echelons of
the professional-managerial classes. But if we take the Elephant Tea
factory as a microcosm for the corporate world as a whole, it becomes
obvious that wasn’t all that happened. Another considerable chunk of the
benefits of increased productivity went to creating entirely new and
basically pointless professional-managerial positions, usually—as we’ve
seen in the case of universities—accompanied by small armies of equally
pointless administrative staff. As we have seen so often, first the
staff is allocated and then someone has to figure out what, if anything,
they will actually do.

Figure 7

[Image]

In other words, the feudal analogy is not even really an analogy.
Managerialism has become the pretext for creating a new covert form of
feudalism, where wealth and position are allocated not on economic but
political grounds—or rather, where every day it’s more difficult to tell
the difference between what can be considered “economic” and what is
“political.”

Another classic feature of medieval feudalism is the creation of
hierarchies of ranked nobles or officials: a European king might grant
land to a baron in exchange for providing a certain number of knights to
his army; the baron, in turn, would grant most of that land to some
local vassal on the same basis, and so on. Such devolution would
proceed, through a process of “sub-infeudation,” down to local lords of
the manor. This was the process by which the elaborate ranks of dukes,
earls, viscounts, and so forth that still exist in places like England
originally came into being. In India and China, matters were typically
more indirect; the usual practice was to simply allocate the income from
a certain territory or province to officials who were likely to actually
live in the nearest city, but for our purposes here, the result is not
so very different.²⁸

As a general principle, I would propose the following: in any
political-economic system based on appropriation and distribution of
goods, rather than on actually making, moving, or maintaining them, and
therefore, where a substantial portion of the population is engaged in
funneling resources up and down the system, that portion of the
population will tend to organize itself into an elaborately ranked
hierarchy of multiple tiers (at least three, and sometimes ten, twelve,
or even more). As a corollary, I would add that within those
hierarchies, the line between retainers and subordinates will often
become blurred, since obeisance to superiors is often a key part of the
job description. Most of the important players are lords and vassals at
the same time.

how managerial feudalism manifests itself in the creative industries through an endless multiplication of intermediary executive ranks

Every dean needs his vice-dean and sub-dean, and each of them needs a
management team, secretaries, admin staff; all of them only there to
make it harder for us to teach, to research, to carry out the most basic
functions of our jobs.

—anonymous British academic²⁹

The rise of managerial feudalism has produced a similar infatuation with
hierarchy for its own sake. We have already seen the phenomenon of
managers whose job it is to manage other managers, or the elaborate
mechanisms Irene described whereby banks set up a hierarchy of offices
to endlessly rarify what’s ultimately an arbitrary and meaningless set
of data. Often, this kind of managerial sub-infeudation is a direct
result of the unleashing of “market forces.” Recall here Kurt, with whom
we began chapter 1, who was working for a subcontractor to a
subcontractor to a subcontractor to the German military. His position
was the direct outcome of market reforms supposedly designed to make
government more efficient.

The same phenomenon can be observed in a dozen different fields. For
instance, the multiplication of levels of managers whose basic job is to
sell things to one another has come to dominate almost all “creative
industries”—from books, where editors at academic presses in many cases
don’t even read half the books they are supposed to have edited, because
they are expected to spend most of their time marketing things to other
editors; to the visual arts, where recent decades have seen the rise of
a whole new stratum of managerial intermediaries called curators, whose
work assembling the work of artists is now often considered of equal
value and importance to the art itself; to even journalism, where the
relationship between editors and reporters has been complicated by an
additional level of “producers.”³⁰ Film and television have fared
particularly badly. At least, so it seems from testimonials within the
industry. Where once the Hollywood studio system relied on a relatively
simple relation between producers, directors, and writers, recent
decades have witnessed an apparently endless process of managerial
sub-infeudation, resulting in a daunting array of producers,
subproducers, executive producers, consultants, and the like, all in
constant search for something, anything, to actually do.³¹

I received several testimonies from workers in TV “development”—that is,
small companies in the business of coming up with programming ideas to
pitch to larger ones. Here’s an example that illustrates just how much
the introduction of market elements within the process has changed
things:

Owen: I work in development. This part of the television industry has
expanded exponentially in the last twenty years. TV used to be
commissioned by one channel controller who would ask producers he liked
to make whatever shows they wanted. There was no “development.” There
was just making the show.

Now every company in TV (and film, too) has its own development team,
staffed by three to ten people, and there are more and more
commissioners whose job it is to listen to their pitches. None of these
people make TV shows.

I have not gotten a show sold for four years. Not because we are
particularly bad but because of nepotism and politics. That’s four years
that have amounted to precisely nothing. I could have sat with my thumb
up my arse for four years, and nothing would be any different. Or I
could have been making films.

I would say the average development team gets one show commissioned
every three to four months. It’s bullshit through and through.

Such complaints are similar to what one regularly hears in academia:
it’s not just the senselessness of the process that rankles, but as with
all box-ticking rituals, the fact that one ends up spending so much more
time pitching, assessing, monitoring, and arguing about what one does
than one spends actually doing it. In film, television, and even radio,
the situation becomes even more distressing, because owing to internal
marketization of the industry, a substantial chunk of those who work in
it spend their time working on shows that do not and will never exist.
Apollonia, for instance, did a stint for a development team pitching
ideas for reality TV shows with titles such as Snipped (where men voted
too promiscuous by the audience underwent a vasectomy live on the air),
Transsexual Housewives, and—this was a real title—Too Fat to Fuck. All
were cast and promoted, even though not one was ever produced.

Apollonia: What would happen is we would come up with ideas together and
then sell them to networks. Which involves sourcing the talent, building
a sizzle video (a thirty-second promo for something that doesn’t exist
yet), and then shopping that sizzle around to try and sell it to a
network. While I was there, we didn’t sell any shows, presumably because
my boss was an idiot.

Apollonia did all the work, so that the Vice President and the Senior
Vice President—who were the only other members of her team—could
helicopter around the city meeting other vice presidents and senior vice
presidents for lunch, and generally acting like high-powered media
executives. During the time she worked there, the result of such efforts
was precisely zero.

How did this happen? And what happens when an idea is accepted? One
current Hollywood scriptwriter was kind enough to send me his insider’s
analysis of what went wrong and how things now play out:

Oscar: In the Golden Age of Hollywood, from the 1920s to the 1950s,
studios were vertical operations. They were also companies headed by one
man, who took all the decisions and who banked his own money. They were
not yet owned by conglomerates, and they had no board of directors.
These studio “heads” were far from intellectuals, or artists, but they
had gut instincts, took risks, and had an innate sense about what made a
movie work. Instead of armies of executives, they would actually hire
armies of writers for their story department. Those writers were on the
payroll, supervised by the producers, and everything was in-house:
actors, directors, set designers, actual film stages, etc.

Starting in the sixties, he continues, this system came under attack as
vulgar, tyrannical, and stifling of artistic talent. For a while, the
resulting ferment did allow some innovative visions to shine through,
but the ultimate result was a corporatization far more stifling than
anything that had come before.

Oscar: There were openings in the sixties and seventies (New Hollywood:
Beatty, Scorsese, Coppola, Stone), as the film industry was in complete
chaos at the time. Then, in the 1980s, corporate monopolies took over
studios. It was a big deal, and I think a sign of things to come, when
Coca-Cola purchased Columbia Pictures (for a short while). From then on,
movies wouldn’t be made by those that liked them or even watched them.
(Clearly, this ties in with the advent of neoliberalism and a larger
shift in society.)

The system that eventually emerged was suffused with bullshit on every
level. The process of “development” (“development hell,” as writers
prefer to call it) now ensures that each script has to pass through not
just one but usually a half dozen clone-like executives with titles such
as (Oscar lists some) “Managing Director of International Content and
Talent, Executive Managing Director, Executive Vice President for
Development, and, my favorite, Executive Creative Vice President for
Television.” Most are armed with MBAs in marketing and finance but know
almost nothing about the history or technicalities of film or TV. Their
professional lives, like that of Apollonia’s boss, seem to consist
almost entirely of writing emails and having ostensibly high-powered
lunches with other executives bearing equally elaborate titles. As a
result, what was once the fairly straightforward business of pitching
and selling a script idea descends into a labyrinthine game of
self-marketing that can go on for years before a project is finally
approved.

It’s important to emphasize that this happens not just when an
independent writer tries to sell a script idea to a studio on “spec,”
but even in-house, for writers already inside a studio or production
company. Oscar is obliged to work with an “incubator,” who plays a role
roughly equivalent to that of a literary agent, helping him prepare
script proposals that the incubator will then pass to his own network of
top executives, either within or outside the company. His example is of
another television show, though he emphasizes the process is exactly the
same for movies:

Oscar: So I “develop” a series project with this “incubator” . . .
writing a “bible”: a sixty-page document that details the project’s
concept, characters, episodes, plots, themes, etc. Once that’s done
comes the carnival of pitching. The incubator and I propose the project
to a slew of broadcasters, financing funds, and production companies.
These people are, purportedly, at the top of the food chain. You could
spend months in the vacuum of communications with them—emails unanswered
and so on. Phone calls are considered pushy, if not borderline
harassment. Their jobs are to read and seek out projects—yet they
couldn’t be more unreachable if they worked from a shack in the middle
of the Amazon Jungle.

Pitching is a strategic ballet. There is a ritual delay of at least a
week between each communication. After a month or two, however, one
executive might take enough of an interest to agree to a face-to-face
meeting:

Oscar: In the meetings, they ask you to pitch them the project all over
again (although they’re supposed to have already read it). Once that’s
done, they usually ask you prewritten one-size-fits-all questions filled
with buzzwords . . . It’s always very noncommittal, and without
exception, they tell you about all the other executives that would need
to approve the project in case it would be decided to move forward.

Then you go, and they forget about you . . . and you have to follow up,
and the loop begins anew. In fact, an executive will seldom tell you yes
or no. If he says yes, and then the project goes nowhere or else gets
made and bombs, it’s his responsibility. If he says no and then it
succeeds somewhere else, he will get blamed for the oversight. Above
all, the executive loathes taking responsibility.

The game, then, is to keep the ball in the air as long as possible. Just
to option an idea, which involves a mere token payment, typically
requires approval from three other branches of the company. Once the
option papers are signed, a new process of stalling begins:

Oscar: They will tell me the document they optioned is too long to send
around; they need a shorter pitch document. Or suddenly they also want
some changes to the concept. So we have a meeting, we talk it over,
brainstorm.

A lot of this process is just them justifying their jobs. Everybody in
the room will have a different opinion just for the sake of having a
reason to be there. It’s a cacophony of ideas, and they talk in the
loosest, most conceptual terms possible. They pride themselves on being
savvy marketers and incisive thinkers, but it’s all generalities.

The executive loves to talk in metaphors, and he loves to expose his
theories about how the audience thinks, what it wants, how it reacts to
storytelling. Most fancy themselves corporatized Joseph Campbells³²—with
no doubt, here again, an influence from the corporate “philosophies” of
Google, Facebook, and other such behemoths.

Or they’ll say “I’m not saying you should do X, but maybe you should do
X”; both tell you to do something and not to do it at the same time. The
more you press for details, the blurrier it gets. I try to decipher
their gibberish and tell them what I think they mean.

Alternately, the executive will totally, wholeheartedly agree with
everything the writer proposes; then as soon as the meeting is over,
he’ll send out an email instructing her to do the opposite. Or wait a
few weeks and inform her the entire project must be reconceived. After
all, if all he did was shake the writer’s hand and allow her to get to
work, there’d be little point of having an Executive Creative Vice
President to begin with—let alone five or six of them.

In other words, film and TV production is now not all that entirely
different from the accountancy companies mis-training employees to stall
the distribution of PPI payments, or Dickens’s case of Jarndyce and
Jarndyce. The longer the process takes, the greater the excuse for the
endless multiplication of intermediary positions, and the more money is
siphoned off before it has any chance to get to those doing the actual
work.

Oscar: And all this for a (now) fifteen-page document. Now, extrapolate
that to more people, a script, a director, producers, even more
executives, the shoot, the edit—and you have a picture of the insanity
of the industry.

At this point, we are entering into what might be termed the airy
reaches of the bullshit economy, and therefore, that part least
accessible to study. We cannot know what Executive Creative Vice
Presidents are really thinking. Even those who are secretly convinced
their jobs are pointless—and for all we know, that’s pretty much all of
them—are unlikely to admit this to an anthropologist. So one can only
guess.

But the effects of their actions can be observed every time we go to the
cinema. “There’s a reason,” says Oscar, “why movies and TV series—to put
it plainly—suck.”

•  •  •

The rule of finance has seen the insertion of competitive games of this
sort at every level of corporate life, or, for that matter, within
institutions such as universities or charities that had previously been
seen as the very antithesis of corporations. Perhaps in some it hasn’t
reached that zenith of bullshit which is Hollywood. But everywhere,
managerial feudalism ensures that thousands of hours of creative effort
will literally come to nothing. Take the domain of scientific research,
or higher education once again. If a grant agency funds only 10 percent
of all applications, that means that 90 percent of the work that went
into preparing applications was just as pointless as the work that went
into making the promo video for Apollonia’s doomed reality TV show Too
Fat to Fuck. (Even more so, really, since one can rarely make such an
amusing anecdote out of it afterward.) This is an extraordinary
squandering of human creative energy. Just to give a sense of the scale
of the problem: one recent study determined that European universities
spend roughly 1.4 billion euros a year on failed grant
applications³³—money that, obviously, might otherwise have been
available to fund research.

Elsewhere, I have suggested that one of the main reasons for
technological stagnation over the last several decades is that
scientists, too, have to spend so much of their time vying with one
another to convince potential donors they already know what they are
going to discover.³⁴ Finally, the endless internal meeting rituals where
Dynamic Brand Coordinators and East Coast Vision Managers³⁵ for private
corporations display their PowerPoint presentations, mind maps, and
graphics-rich glossy reports, are all essentially exercises in internal
marketing as well.

We’ve already seen how, internally, large numbers of ancillary bullshit
jobs tend to cluster around such internal marketing rituals: such as
those hired to prepare, edit, copy, or provide graphics for the
presentations or reports. It seems to me all this is an intrinsic
feature of managerial feudalism. Where once universities, corporations,
movie studios, and the like had been governed by a combination of
relatively simple chains of command and informal patronage networks, we
now have a world of funding proposals, strategic vision documents, and
development team pitches—allowing for the endless elaborations of new
and ever more pointless levels of managerial hierarchy, staffed by men
and women with elaborate titles, fluent in corporate jargon, but who
either have no firsthand experience of what it’s like to actually do the
work they are supposed to be managing, or who have done everything in
their power to forget it.

conclusion, with a brief return to the question of three levels of causation

At this point, we can return to President Obama’s remarks about health
care reform and allow the pieces to fall together. The “one million, two
million, three million jobs” that Obama was so concerned to preserve
were created, specifically, by the very sorts of processes we have just
been describing: the seemingly endless accrual of layer upon layer of
unnecessary administrative and managerial positions resulting from the
aggressive application of market principles, in this case, to the health
care industry. It’s a slightly different situation than most of those
we’ve been looking at, since the US health care system, almost uniquely
among those of wealthy countries, was always mainly private. Despite
this—even more so after Obama, actually—it shows the exact same
entanglement of public and private, economic and political, and the same
role of government in guaranteeing private profits, as one is beginning
to see in Canada or Europe with the partial privatization of national
health systems. In every case (and in this case of US health care reform
this was done quite self-consciously), ensuring that at least some of
those profits are redistributed to creating well-paid, prestigious, but
ultimately bullshit office jobs.

I began the chapter by speaking of different levels of causality. The
reasons why individuals create, or accept, bullshit jobs are by no means
the same as the reasons why such jobs will tend to proliferate in
certain times and places rather than others. The deeper structural
forces that drive such historical changes, in turn, are not the same as
the cultural and political factors that determine how the public, and
politicians, react to them. This chapter has been largely about
structural forces. No doubt bullshit jobs have long been with us; but
recent years have seen an enormous proliferation of such pointless forms
of employment, accompanied by an ever-increasing bullshitization of real
jobs—and despite a popular misconception that all this is somehow tied
to the rise of the service sector, this proliferation appears to have
everything to do with the growing importance of finance.

Corporate capitalism—that is, that form of capitalism in which
production is largely carried out within large bureaucratically
organized firms—first emerged in America and Germany in the late
nineteenth century. During most of the twentieth century, large
industrial corporations were very much independent of, and to some
degree even hostile to, the interests of what was called “high finance.”
Executives in firms dedicated to producing breakfast cereals, or
agricultural machinery, saw themselves as having far more in common with
production-line workers in their own firms than they did with
speculators and investors, and the internal organization of firms
reflected this. It was only in the 1970s that the financial sector and
the executive classes—that is, the upper echelons of the various
corporate bureaucracies—effectively fused. CEOs began paying themselves
in stock options, moving back and forth between utterly unrelated
companies, priding themselves on the number of employees they could lay
off. This set off a vicious cycle whereby workers, who no longer felt
any loyalty to corporations that felt none toward them, had to be
increasingly monitored, managed, and surveilled.

On a deeper level, this realignment set off a whole series of trends
that had enormous implications on virtually everything that was to
follow, from changes in political sensibilities to changes in directions
of technological research. To take just one particularly revealing
example: back in the 1970s, banks were still the only companies that
were enthusiastic about the use of computers. There seems to be an
intrinsic connection between the financialization of the economy, the
blossoming of information industries, and the proliferation of bullshit
jobs.³⁶

The results were not just some sort of recalibration or readjustment of
existing forms of capitalism. In many ways, it marked a profound break
with what had come before. If the existence of bullshit jobs seems to
defy the logic of capitalism, one possible reason for their
proliferation might be that the existing system isn’t capitalism—or at
least, isn’t any sort of capitalism that would be recognizable from the
works of Adam Smith, Karl Marx, or, for that matter, Ludwig von Mises or
Milton Friedman. It is increasingly a system of rent extraction where
the internal logic—the system’s “laws of motion,” as the Marxists like
to say—are profoundly different from capitalism, since economic and
political imperatives have come to largely merge. In many ways, it
resembles classic medieval feudalism, displaying the same tendency to
create endless hierarchies of lords, vassals, and retainers. In other
ways—notably in its managerialist ethos—it is profoundly different. And
the whole apparatus, rather than replacing old-fashioned industrial
capitalism, is instead superimposed on top of it, blending together in a
thousand points in a thousand different ways. Hardly surprising, then,
that the situation seems so confusing that even those directly in the
middle don’t really know quite what to make of it.

This was the structural level. In the next two chapters, I will turn to
the cultural and political level. Here, of course, it is impossible to
be neutral. Even to ask why it is that the existence of forms of
pointless employment is not seen as a great social problem is to at
least suggest that it really ought to be. Clearly, the original essay
acted as a kind of catalyst in this regard—it seized on a broadly
existing feeling that had not really found any other voice outside the
corridors, a sense that something was very wrong with the organization
of society, and it provided a series of frameworks for how one might
begin to think about those issues in political terms. In what follows, I
will expand on those suggestions, and think a little more systematically
about what the larger political implications of the current division of
labor actually are, and what might be done about the situation.


Chapter 6


Why Do We as a Society Not Object to the Growth of Pointless Employment?

How vain the opinion is of some certain people of the East Indies, who
think that apes and baboons, which are with them in great numbers, are
imbued with understanding, and that they can speak but will not, for
fear they should be imployed and set to work.

—Antoine Le Grand, c. 1675

We have already considered the economic and social forces that have led
to the proliferation of bullshit jobs, as well as the misery and
distress those jobs cause for those who have to do them. Yet despite
this evident and widespread distress, the fact that millions of people
show up to work every day convinced they are doing absolutely nothing
has not, until now, been considered a social problem. We have not seen
politicians denouncing bullshit jobs, academic conferences dedicated to
understanding the reasons for the rise of bullshit jobs, opinion pieces
debating the cultural consequences of bullshit jobs, or protest
movements campaigning to abolish them. To the contrary: if politicians,
academics, editorialists, or social movements do weigh in on the matter,
it’s usually by acting directly or indirectly to make the problem worse.

The situation seems all the more extraordinary when we consider the
larger social consequences of this proliferation. If it’s really true
that as much of half the work we do could be eliminated without any
significant effect on overall productivity, why not just redistribute
the remaining work in such a way that everyone is working four-hour
days? Or four-day weeks with four months’ yearly vacation time? Or some
similarly easygoing arrangement? Why not start shutting down the global
work machine? If nothing else, it would probably be the most effective
thing we could do to put a break on global warming. A hundred years ago,
many assumed that the steady advance of technology and labor-saving
devices would have made this possible by now, and the irony is that they
were probably right. We could easily all be putting in a twenty- or even
fifteen-hour workweek. Yet for some reason, we as a society have
collectively decided it’s better to have millions of human beings
spending years of their lives pretending to type into spreadsheets or
preparing mind maps for PR meetings than freeing them to knit sweaters,
play with their dogs, start a garage band, experiment with new recipes,
or sit in cafés arguing about politics, and gossiping about their
friends’ complex polyamorous love affairs.

I think the easiest way to understand how this happened is to consider
how difficult it is to imagine an opinion writer for a major newspaper
or magazine writing a piece saying that some class of people is working
too hard and might do well to cut it out. It’s easy enough to find
pieces complaining that certain classes of people (young people, poor
people, recipients of various forms of public assistance, those of
certain national or ethnic groups¹) are work shy, entitled, lacking in
drive or motivation, or unwilling to earn a living. The internet is
littered with them. As Rachel put it in chapter 4, “I can barely scroll
through Facebook without hitting some preachy think piece about my
generation’s entitlement and reluctance to just do a bloody day’s work.”
Whenever there’s a crisis, even an ecological crisis, there are calls
for collective sacrifice. These calls always seem to involve everyone
working more—despite the fact that, as noted, in ecological terms, a
mass reduction of working hours is probably the quickest and easiest
thing that could be done to save the planet.

Opinion writers are the moralists of our day. They are the secular
equivalent of preachers, and when they write about work, their arguments
reflect a very long theological tradition of valorizing work as a sacred
duty, at once curse and blessing, and seeing humans as inherently
sinful, lazy beings who can be expected to shirk that duty if they can.
The discipline of economics itself emerged out of moral philosophy (Adam
Smith was a professor of moral philosophy), and moral philosophy, in
turn, was originally a branch of theology. Many economic concepts trace
back directly to religious ideas. As a result, arguments about value
always have something of a theological tinge. Some originally
theological notions about work are so universally accepted that they
simply can’t be questioned. One cannot assert that hardworking people
are not, generally speaking, admirable (regardless of what they might be
working hard at), or that those who avoid work are not in any way
contemptible, and expect to be taken seriously in public debate. If
someone says a policy creates jobs, it is not considered acceptable to
reply that some jobs aren’t worth having. (I know this because I have
occasionally done so to policy wonks, partly just to observe the shocked
confusion that ensues.) Say any of these things, and anything else you
might say will be written off as well as the effusions of a provocateur,
a comedian, a lunatic—anyway, someone whose further arguments can now be
automatically dismissed.

Still, while the voice of the moralists may be sufficient to convince us
not to make a scandal of the proliferation of bullshit jobs (since in
public debate, all work must be treated as sacred duty, and therefore
any work is always preferable to none at all), when it comes to our own
jobs, we tend to apply very different criteria. We expect a job to serve
some purpose or have some meaning and are deeply demoralized if we find
it does not. But this leads to another question: If work is not simply a
value in itself, in what way is it a value to others? After all, when
people say their jobs are “worthless” or “no good to anyone,” they are
making arguments about value. Of what sort?

•  •  •

The field of value is always contested territory. It seems that whenever
there’s a word for something everyone agrees to be desirable—“truth,”
“beauty,” “love,” “democracy”—then there will be no consensus as to what
it really means. (Oddly enough, this is even true of money: economists
are divided over what it is.) But in our own society, arguments about
the value of work are particularly important to consider because they
have led to what any outside observer would have to describe as weird,
topsy-turvy effects. As we’ll see, people do have a notion of the social
value of their work; but our society has reached the point where not
only is the social value of work usually in inverse proportion to its
economic value (the more one’s work benefits others, the less one is
likely to be paid for it), but many people have come to accept this
situation is morally right—they genuinely believe this is how things
ought to be. That we should reward useless or even destructive behavior,
and, effectively, punish those whose daily labors make the world a
better place.

This is genuinely perverse. To understand how it happened, though, will
require a bit of work on our own part.

on the impossibility of developing an absolute measure of value

When someone describes his job as pointless or worthless, he is
necessarily operating within some sort of tacit theory of value: an idea
of what would be a worthwhile occupation, and therefore what is not. It
is notoriously difficult, however, to tease out exactly what that theory
is in any given instance, let alone to come up with any reliable system
of measurement that would make it possible to say that job X is more
valuable or useful to society than job Y.

Economists measure value in terms of what they call “utility”: the
degree to which a good or service is useful in satisfying a want or
need,² and many apply something like this to their own jobs. Do I
provide something useful to the public? Sometimes the answer to the
question is self-evident. If one is building a bridge, one considers it
a worthwhile task if one anticipates that other people who wish to get
across the river will find it useful. If workers are building a bridge
no one is ever likely to use, such as the famous “bridges to nowhere”
that local politicians in the United States will occasionally sponsor to
direct federal money to their districts, they are likely to conclude
they are engaged in a bullshit job.

Still, there’s an obvious problem with the concept of utility. Saying
that something is “useful” is just saying it’s effective as a way of
getting something else. If you buy a dress, the “utility” of that dress
is partly that it protects you from the elements or ensures you don’t
violate laws against walking down the street naked, but it’s largely the
degree to which it makes you look or feel nice. So why would one dress
achieve that and not another? Economists will usually say this is a
matter of taste and therefore not their department. But any utility
ultimately ends up in this kind of subjective problem if you push it
back far enough, even something so relatively uncomplicated as a bridge.
Yes, it can make it easier for people to get to the other side of a
river, but why do they want to do that? To visit an aging relative? To
go bowling? Even if it’s just to shop for groceries. One does not buy
groceries simply to maintain one’s physical health: one also expresses
one’s personal taste, maintains an ethnic or family tradition, acquires
the means to throw drinking parties with one’s friends or to celebrate
religious holidays. We can’t really discuss any of these things in terms
of a language of “needs.” For much of human history—and this is still
true in much of the world today—when poor people end up in crippling
debt to local moneylenders, it’s because they felt they had to borrow
money to throw proper funerals for their parents or weddings for their
children. Did they “need” to do this? Clearly, they felt strongly that
they did. And since there’s no scientific definition of what a “human
need” actually is, beyond the body’s minimal caloric and nutritional
requirements, and a few other physical factors, such questions must
always be subjective. To a large degree, needs are just other people’s
expectations. If you don’t throw a proper wedding for your daughter, it
would be a family disgrace.

Most economists conclude therefore that there’s no point in sitting in
judgment about what people should want; better to just accept that they
do want, and then sit in judgment about how effectively (“rationally”)
they set about pursuing their desires. Most workers seem to agree. As
I’ve noted, those who felt their jobs were pointless almost never said
things such as “I produce selfie sticks. Selfie sticks are stupid.
People shouldn’t buy stupid things like that,” or, “Who really needs a
two-hundred-dollar pair of socks?” Even the one or two exceptions were
revealing. Take Dietrich, who worked for a company that provided party
supplies, mostly to local churches:

Dietrich: I worked for years in the warehouse of a novelty store. I
don’t really know what to say other than it was complete and total BS.
One doesn’t know true degradation until one has spent a good portion of
one’s waking hours schlepping around boxes of clown noses, sneezing
powders, plastic champagne flutes, cardboard cutouts of basketball
players, and all other manner of other pointless knickknacks and
nonsense. Most of the time, we just sat in the back of the warehouse
with little to nothing to do, musing on the total irrelevance of what we
were doing, year after year, as the business proved more and more
unsustainable.

To add insult to injury, our paychecks were bright red and had clown
faces on them, much to the amusement of bank tellers everywhere—as if
their jobs were any more meaningful!

One might speculate at length about why Dietrich found this particular
collection of products so offensive. (What’s wrong with a little silly
fun?) My guess would be: because it wasn’t Dietrich who decided he was
working for purveyors of ephemeral junk; these products never claimed to
be anything other than ephemeral junk, anti-utilities destined only to
be thrown away, mockeries of “real” objects and “real” values. (Even the
money was a joke.) Even more, novelty items do not reject “real” values
in the name of anything in particular; they provide no actual challenge
to what they claim to be making fun of. So one could say they aren’t
even genuine mockery; they’re a mockery of a mockery, reduced to
something with so little real subversive content that they can be
embraced by even the most boring and stodgy members of society “for the
sake of the children.”

There’s little more depressing than enforced gaiety. Still, even
testimonies such as Dietrich’s were rare.

In most cases, when employees assessed the social value of their work,
they appealed to some variant of the position presented by Tom, the
special effects artist we met in chapter 2: “I consider a worthwhile job
to be one that fulfills a preexisting need, or even that creates a
product or service that people hadn’t thought of, that somehow enhances
and improves their lives”—as opposed to, in Tom’s case, his “beauty
work,” which involved manipulating images of celebrities so as to make
audiences feel unattractive and then selling them cures that didn’t
really work. Telemarketers sometimes expressed similar concerns, but,
again, much of what they were doing was simple fraud; you don’t really
need an elaborate theory of social value to tell you why cajoling
retirees into buying subscriptions they can’t afford to magazines
they’ll never read is problematic. Very few sat in judgment on their
customers’ tastes and preferences; it was more the aggressiveness and
dishonesty of their own interventions that they felt proved they
provided nothing of real value.

Other objections appealed to much older traditions of social critique.
Take Rupert, the bank employee, who asserted that “the entire [banking]
sector adds no value and is therefore bullshit,” since finance was
really just a matter of “appropriating labor through usury.” The labor
theory of value he’s referencing here, which traces back at least to the
European Middle Ages, starts from the assumption that the real value of
a commodity is the work that has been invested in making its existence
possible. So when we give money in exchange for a loaf of bread, what we
are really paying for is the human effort that went into growing the
wheat, baking the bread, and packing and transporting the loaves. If
some loaves of bread are more expensive than others, it’s either because
it took more work to produce and transport them, or, alternately,
because we consider some of that work to itself be of higher quality—to
involve more skill, more artistry, more effort—than others, and
therefore are willing to pay more for the resulting product. Similarly,
if you’re defrauding others of their wealth, as Rupert felt he was doing
working for an international investment bank, you’re really stealing the
real, productive work that went into creating that wealth.

Now, of course, there’s a long history of using arguments like this to
challenge arrangements where some are—or at least can be said to
be—living off the backs of others; but the very existence of bullshit
jobs raises certain problems for any labor theory of value. True, saying
all value comes from work³ is obviously not the same thing as saying
that all work produces value. Rupert felt that most bank employees were
in no sense idling about; actually, he felt most worked quite hard; only
all their labor was ultimately accomplishing, in his estimation, was to
come up with clever ways to appropriate the fruits of the real labor
done by others. But that still leaves us with the same problem of how to
distinguish “real” value-creating work from its opposite. If giving
someone a haircut is providing a valuable service, why is providing
advice on their investment portfolio not?

Yet Rupert’s feelings were not unusual. He might have been unusual in
framing them explicitly in terms of the labor theory of value, but he
was expressing an uneasiness that many of those working in finance and
related fields clearly do feel. Presumably, he had to turn to such
theories because mainstream economics just didn’t give him much to work
with. According to the prevailing view among contemporary economists,
since value is ultimately subjective, there’s simply no way to justify
such feelings. Everyone should therefore withhold judgment and operate
on the assumption that, if there’s a market for a given good or service
(and in this, they would include financial services), then it’s clearly
valuable to someone, and that’s all one needs to know. Up to a point, as
we’ve seen, most workers would really appear to agree with the
economists on principle, at least when it comes to the tastes and
proclivities of the general public; but when it comes to their own jobs,
their experience often glaringly contradicts the idea that the market
can always be trusted in such matters. After all, there’s a market in
labor as well. If the market were always right, then someone being paid
$40,000 to play computer games and gossip with old friends on WhatsApp
all day would have to accept that the service he provides for the
company by playing computer games and gossiping was actually worth
$40,000. It clearly is not. So markets can’t always be right. It follows
that, if the market can get things so wrong in the one area the worker
knows best, then surely she cannot just blandly assume the market can be
trusted to assess the true value of goods and services in those areas
where she lacks firsthand information.

Anyone who has a bullshit job, or knows someone who has a bullshit job,
is aware, then, that the market is not an infallible arbiter of value.
The problem is that nothing else is, either. Questions of value are
always at least a little murky. Most people would agree that some
companies might just as well not exist, but it’s more likely to be based
on some kind of gut instinct than anything they can articulate
precisely. If I had to tease out the prevailing, unstated common sense,
for a first pass, anyway, I would say that most people seem to operate
with a combination of Tom’s and Rupert’s positions: that when a good or
service answers a demand or otherwise improves people’s lives, then it
can be considered genuinely valuable, but when it merely serves to
create demand, either by making people feel they are fat and ugly, or
luring them into debt and then charging interest, it is not. This seems
reasonable enough. But it still doesn’t answer the question of what it
means to “improve people’s lives,” and on that, of course, rests
everything.

how most people in contemporary society do accept the notion of a social value that can be distinguished from economic value, even if it is very difficult to pin down what it is

So we are back, again, to theories of value. What can actually be said
to improve people’s lives?

In economics, theories of value have largely served as a way to explain
commodity prices: the price of a loaf of bread will fluctuate according
to the contingencies of supply and demand, but that price will always
gravitate around some kind of center that seems the natural price a loaf
of bread should have. In the Middle Ages, this was seen explicitly as a
moral question: How can one determine the “just price” of a commodity?
If a merchant raised prices during wartime, at what point was he paying
himself legitimate hazard pay, and at what point was he just gouging?
One popular example invoked by jurists at the time was a prisoner living
on bread and water who traded his fortune to another prisoner for a
boiled egg. Could this really be considered a free choice? Should such a
contract be considered enforceable once both prisoners were released?

So the idea that the market can undervalue or overvalue things has been
with us for a very long time. It’s still an inherent part of our common
sense, otherwise it would be impossible for anyone to ever say they were
ripped off or got an especially good deal—even if no one has ever
managed to come up with a reliable formula to calculate exactly what the
“real” value of any given commodity should be, and therefore, just how
badly one was ripped off or just how good a deal one really got. There
are too many factors to take into consideration, and many—sentimental
value, individual or subcultural taste—clearly can’t be quantified. If
anything is surprising, it’s the dogged insistence of so many
economists, amateur and otherwise, that it should be possible to do so.

Many hold that all those other forms of value are somehow illusory, or
irrelevant to market concerns. Economists, for instance, will often take
the position that, since value is ultimately just utility, commodity
prices will gravitate around their real market value over time—even if
this comes down to a purely circular proposition that whatever price a
commodity tends to gravitate around over time must be its real market
value. Marxists and other anticapitalists have often been known to take
an even more extreme position, insisting that since capitalism is a
total system, anyone who imagines she is operating outside it or
pursuing values other than those created by the system is fooling
herself. Often, when I present the concept of bullshit jobs in radical
forums, someone awash in Marxist theory will instantly stand up to
declare I have it wrong: maybe some workers think their work is useless,
but that work must be producing profits for capitalism, which is all
that matters under the present capitalist system.⁴ Others, even more
finely attuned to the niceties of such matters, will explain that
clearly I am really talking about the difference between what Marx terms
“productive” and “unproductive” labor—by which he meant labor that is
either productive or unproductive for capitalists. Productive labor
yields some kind of surplus value that capitalists can extract in
profits; other labor is at best “reproductive”—that is, like housework
or education (these are always put forward as the primary examples),
such tasks perform the necessary second-order work of keeping workers
alive and raising new generations of workers so that in the future they
can, in turn, do the “real” work of being exploited.⁵

It is certainly true that capitalists themselves will often see things
in this way. Business lobbies, for instance, are notorious for urging
governments to treat schools primarily as places for training future
employees. It might seem a little strange seeing the same logic coming
from anticapitalists, but, in a way, it makes sense; it’s a means of
saying that half measures will never work. For instance, a well-meaning
liberal who buys fair trade coffee and sponsors a float in the Gay Pride
Parade isn’t really challenging power structures of power and injustice
in the world in any significant way, but, ultimately, just reproducing
them on another level. This is an important point to make—sanctimonious
liberals are irritating and deserve to be reminded of this—but the
problem, at least for me, is the leap from saying that from the
perspective of capitalism, a mother’s love or a teacher’s labors have no
meaning except as a means of reproducing the labor force, and the
assumption that therefore any other perspective on the matter is
necessarily irrelevant, illusory, or incorrect. Capitalism is not a
single totalizing system that shapes and embraces every aspect of our
existence. It’s not even clear it makes sense to speak of “capitalism”
at all (Marx, for instance, never really did), implying as it does that
“capitalism” is a set of abstract ideas that have somehow come to take
material form in factories and offices. The world is more complicated
and messy than that. Historically, the factories and offices emerged
first, long before anyone knew quite what to call them, and to this day,
they operate on multiple contradictory logics and purposes. Similarly,
value itself is a constant political argument. No one is ever quite sure
what it is.

•  •  •

In English, as currently spoken, we tend to make a distinction between
“value” in the singular, as in the value of gold, pork bellies,
antiques, and financial derivatives, and “values” in the plural: that
is, family values, religious morality, political ideals, beauty, truth,
integrity, and so on. Basically, we speak of “value” when talking about
economic affairs, which usually comes down to all those human endeavors
in which people are paid for their work or their actions are otherwise
directed toward getting money. “Values” appear when that is not the
case. For instance, housework and child care are, surely, the single
most common forms of unpaid work. Hence, we constantly hear about the
importance of “family values.” But participating in church activities,
charitable works, political volunteering, and most artistic and
scientific pursuits are equally unremunerated. Even if a sculptor does
end up becoming fabulously wealthy and marries a porn star, or a guru
ends up in possession of a fleet of Rolls-Royces, most will consider his
wealth legitimate only insofar as it is a kind of side effect, because
originally, at least, he wasn’t in it just for the money.

What money brings into the picture is the ability to make precise
quantitative comparisons. Money makes it possible to say that this
amount of pig iron is equivalent in value to that number of fruit drinks
or pedicures or tickets to the Glastonbury music festival. This might
sound obvious, but the implications are profound. It means the market
value of a commodity is, precisely, the degree to which it can be
compared to (and, hence, exchanged for) something else. This is exactly
what is missing in the domain of “values”—it might sometimes be possible
to argue that one work of art is more beautiful, or one religious
devotee more pious than another, but it would be bizarre to ask how much
more, to say that this monk is five times more pious than that one, or
this Rembrandt is twice as lovely as that Monet.⁶ It would be if
anything even more absurd to try to come up with a mathematical formula
to calculate just how much it would be legitimate to neglect one’s
family in pursuit of art, or break the law in the name of social
justice. Obviously, people do make such decisions all the time, but by
definition, they cannot be quantified.

In fact, one could even further say that is precisely the key to their
value. Just as commodities have economic “value” because they can be
compared precisely with other commodities, “values” are valuable because
they cannot be compared with anything. They are each considered unique,
incommensurable—in a word, priceless.

It seems to me that the words “value” and “values” have become our
commonsense shorthand for how to think about such complicated questions.
It’s not a terrible one. Still, even this is more an ideal of how we
like to think things should work than an accurate representation of how
they actually do work. After all, it’s not as if life is really divided
between an “economy” where everyone thinks only about money and material
self-interest, and a series of other spheres (politics, religion,
family, and so on) where people behave entirely differently. Real
motives are always mixed. It’s always important to emphasize here that
for most of human history, it would never have occurred to anyone that
it would be possible to even make such distinctions; the very idea of
either pure self-interest, or pure selfless altruism, would have seemed
equally bizarre—just as bizarre, in fact, as the idea of “selling one’s
time.” Such concepts became possible only with the rise of impersonal
markets across Eurasia roughly around 600 BC. The invention of coinage
made it possible to create markets where strangers could interact with
one another only with an eye to material advantage; wherever these cash
markets appeared, whether in China, India, or the Mediterranean world,
they were quickly followed by the birth of universal religions that in
every case preached that material things were not important, and that
the pious should give their goods selflessly to charity. But no attempt
to create an absolute firewall between material selfishness and selfless
idealism (value and values) has ever been successful; each always ends
up leaking into the other. This leakage, it should be emphasized, is not
just in one direction. Yes, it often turns out that artists, idealists,
priests, and statesmen will turn out to be secretly pursuing some
personal material advantage, or sometimes something even worse; but it
is equally the case that businessmen will often take pride in their
honor or integrity, or workers will agonize over whether their work
actually does anyone any good.

This was certainly the primary consideration of those who wondered about
the larger meaning of their jobs. In most of the testimonies I
collected, “meaningful” was just a synonym for “helpful,” and
“valuable,” for “beneficial.” Let’s take a glance at some of the ways
people reflected on the value of their jobs:

Car Salesman: I work for a large used-car finance company in the United
States that caters to the subprime market. Oftentimes, I find myself
wondering if my job really has any value at all besides to the owners of
the company.

Aerospace Engineer: The senior management are happy to work fifty to
sixty hours a week (and encourage all their minions to do likewise) to
be seen to be busy but without ever producing anything of value . . .
True, if knowledge and new technology are created as by-products, then
one could argue that the job retains some value. In some instances of my
job, this did occur, but it tended to be the exception rather than the
rule.

Telemarketer: It’s a job with no social value whatsoever. At least if
you stack shelves at a supermarket, you are doing something that
benefits people. Everybody needs groceries and the things supermarkets
sell. In call center work, the calls are essentially time-wasting
nuisance calls.

Freelance Academic Translator: Over the years, I have translated papers
from just about every academic discipline—from ecology to corporate law,
social science to computer science. The vast majority of it is of no
discernible value to humanity whatsoever.

Pharmacist: I entered the medical profession under the assumption that
my job would be meaningful and my work would be helpful. In reality,
I’ve realized most of the medical field is a house of cards. I would
contest the idea that doctors have genuinely helpful jobs.

Civil Servant: Neither of these jobs helped anyone in any way.⁷

None of this is likely to be news to most readers; this is the way
pretty much anyone might talk about his job if he had to reflect on it
in the abstract. As Eric’s father remarked in chapter 3, after dutifully
chewing Eric out as a “nonsensical idiot” for quitting such a
high-paying job, “Well, what good could that job do for anyone anyway?”

The telemarketer cited above made an explicit appeal to the concept of
“social value”—value to society as a whole. This concept came up
periodically in other accounts as well:

Homeowner Association Manager: Managing homeowners associations is one
hundred percent bullshit. Wealthy people buy a condo building with a
bunch of other wealthy strangers, then hire someone else to manage and
maintain it. The only reason this job exists is that the owners don’t
like or trust each other. I did this job for three years and never saw
one hint of social value.

Or recall Nigel the Data Perfecter, already quoted in chapter 4, who
spent hundreds of hours staring at company loyalty card information
looking for nonexistent mistakes:

Data Perfecter: I really think that if we had been processing
applications for something that had a more obvious social value—organ
transplant registration, say, or tickets to Glastonbury—then it would
have felt different.

It’s interesting to juxtapose these two, because they show that for most
people, “social value” isn’t just about creating wealth or even leisure.
It is equally about creating sociability. Organ donation allows people
to save one another’s lives; the Glastonbury music festival allows them
to slog through the mud together smoking drugs and playing or listening
to their favorite music—that is, to give one another joy and happiness.
Such collective experiences can be considered of “obvious social value.”
In contrast, making it easier for rich people to avoid one another (it’s
a notorious thing that very wealthy people almost invariably dislike
their neighbors), shows “not one hint of social value.”

Now, “social value” of this sort clearly can’t be measured, and
undoubtedly if one were to sit down with any one of the workers whose
testimonies I’ve cited, one would find that each had a slightly
different idea of what was useful or valuable to society and what was
not. Still, I suspect they would all have agreed on at least two things:
first, that the most important things one gets out of a job are (1)
money to pay the bills, and (2) the opportunity to make a positive
contribution to the world. Second, that there is an inverse relation
between the two. The more your work helps and benefits others, and the
more social value you create, the less you are likely to be paid for it.

concerning the inverse relationship between the social value of work and the amount of money one is likely to be paid for it

Virtutum omnium pretium in ipsis est.

—Epictetus

I made this point in the original bullshit jobs article in 2013 because
it had struck me during my experience with Occupy Wall Street two years
earlier. One of the most frequently heard complaints from supporters of
the movement—particularly the ones working too much to spend much time
in the camps, but who could only show up for marches or to express
support on the Web—ran along the lines of: “I wanted to do something
useful with my life; work that had a positive effect on other people or,
at the very least, wasn’t hurting anyone. But the way this economy
works, if you spend your working life caring for others, you’ll end up
so underpaid and so deeply in debt you won’t be able to care for your
own family.” There was a deep and abiding sense of rage at the injustice
of such arrangements.⁸ I began to refer to it, mostly to myself, as the
“revolt of the caring classes.” At the same time, occupiers in
Manhattan’s Zuccotti Park regularly reported conversations with young
Wall Street traders who’d drop by and say things to the effect of:
“Look, I know you guys are right; I’m not contributing anything positive
to the world, the system is corrupt, and I’m probably part of the
problem. I’d quit tomorrow if you could show me how to live in New York
on a less-than-six-figure salary.”

Some of the testimonies we’ve already read echoed similar dilemmas:
think here of Annie, who noted how many women taking care of
preschoolers were ultimately forced to quit and find office jobs to pay
the rent, or Hannibal, the medical researcher, who summed up his
experience in the medical field with the formula “the amount of money I
can charge for doing the work I do is almost perfectly inversely
correlated with how useful it is.”

That there’s a real problem here can be demonstrated by a simple thought
experiment proposed in the original 2013 piece: imagine if a certain
class of people were to simply vanish. Let me expand on this for a
moment. If we all woke up one morning and discovered that not only
nurses, garbage collectors, and mechanics, but for that matter, bus
drivers, grocery store workers, firefighters, or short-order chefs had
been whisked away into another dimension, the results would be equally
catastrophic. If elementary school teachers were to vanish, most
schoolchildren would likely celebrate for a day or two, but the
long-term effects would be if anything even more devastating. And while
we can no doubt argue about the relative merits of death metal versus
klezmer music, or romance novels versus science fiction, there’s no
doubt that even if the sudden disappearance of certain categories of
authors, artists, or musicians left certain sectors of the population
indifferent or even happy, for others the world would become a far more
dismal and depressing place.⁹

The same cannot be said of hedge fund managers, political consultants,
marketing gurus, lobbyists, corporate lawyers, or people whose job it is
to apologize for the fact that the carpenter didn’t come. As Finn said
of his software licensing firm in chapter 4: “If I showed up on Monday
and the building had disappeared, not only would society not care, I
wouldn’t, either.” And there are certainly office buildings in the
world—I’m sure anyone reading this book can think, just off the top of
her head, of several—that, were they to simply vanish, would leave the
world much better off.

Yet in many of these are precisely the people who get paid the very
highest salaries.

In fact, it often happens that, at the very top of organizations,
apparently crucial positions can go unfilled for long periods of time
without there being any noticeable effect—even, on the organization
itself. In recent years, Belgium has gone through a series of
constitutional crises that have left it temporarily without a sitting
government: no prime minister and no one in charge of health,
transportation, or education. These crises have been known to continue
for considerable periods of time—the record so far is 541 days—without
there being any observable negative impact on health, transportation, or
education. One has to imagine that if the situation were to endure for
decades, it would make some sort of difference; but it’s not clear how
much of one or whether the positive effects would outweigh the negative
ones.¹⁰ Similarly, at time of writing, the Uber corporation, considered
one of the world’s most dynamic, has seen the resignation not only of
its founder, Travis Kalanick, but a host of other top executives, with
the result that it “is currently operating without a CEO, chief
operating officer, chief financial officer, or chief marketing
officer”—all without any apparent effect on day-to-day operations.¹¹

Similarly, there’s a reason why those who work in the financial sector,
and who have extremely well-paid occupations more generally, almost
never go on strike. As Rutger Bergman likes to point out, in 1970 there
was a six-month bank strike in Ireland; rather than the economy grinding
to a halt as the organizers had anticipated, most people simply
continued to write checks, which began to circulate as a form of
currency, but otherwise carried on much as they had before. Two years
before, when garbage collectors had gone on strike for a mere ten days
in New York, the city caved in to their demands because it had become
uninhabitable.¹²

•  •  •

Very few economists have actually attempted to measure the overall
social value of different professions; most would probably take the very
idea as something of a fool’s errand; but those who have tried tend to
confirm that there is indeed an inverse relation between usefulness and
pay. In a 2017 paper, US economists Benjamin B. Lockwood, Charles G.
Nathanson, and E. Glen Weyl combed through the existing literature on
the “externalities” (social costs) and “spillover effects” (social
benefits) associated with a variety of highly paid professions, to see
if it were possible to calculate how much each adds to or subtracts from
the economy overall. They concluded that while in some cases—notably
anything associated with creative industries—the values involved were
just too subjective to measure, in other cases, a rough approximation
was possible. Their conclusion: the most socially valuable workers whose
contributions could be calculated are medical researchers, who add $9 of
overall value to society for every $1 they are paid. The least valuable
were those who worked in the financial sector, who, on average, subtract
a net $1.80 in value from society for every $1 of compensation. (And, of
course, workers in the financial sector are often compensated extremely
well.)

Here was their overall breakdown:¹³

• researchers +9

• schoolteachers +1

• engineers +.2

• consultants and IT professionals 0

• lawyers –.2

• advertisers and marketing professionals –.3

• managers –.8

• financial sector –1.5

This would certainly seem to confirm a lot of people’s gut suspicions
about the overall value of such professions, so it’s nice to see it
spelled out, but the authors’ focus on the most highly paid
professionals makes it of limited use for present purposes.
Schoolteachers are probably the lowest-paid workers on the list, at
least on average, and many researchers get by on very little, so the
results certainly don’t contradict a negative relation between pay and
usefulness; but to get a real sense of the full gamut of employment, one
needs a broader sample.

The closest I know to such a study that does use such a broader sample
was one carried out by the New Economic Foundation in the United
Kingdom, whose authors applied a method called “Social Return on
Investment Analysis” to examine six representative occupations, three
high-income, three low. Here’s a summary of the results:

• city banker – yearly salary c. £5 million – estimated £7 of social
value destroyed for every £1 earned;

• advertising executive – yearly salary c. £500,000, estimated £11.50 of
social value destroyed per £1 paid;

• tax accountant – yearly salary c. £125,000, estimated £11.20 of social
value destroyed per £1 paid;

• hospital cleaner – yearly income c. £13,000 (£6.26 per hour),
estimated £10 of social value generated per £1 paid;

• recycling worker – yearly income c. £12,500 (£6.10 per hour) –
estimated £12 in social value generated per £1 paid;

• nursery worker – salary c. £11,500 – estimated £7 in social value
generated per £1 paid.¹⁴

The authors admit that many of their calculations are somewhat
subjective, as all such calculations must be, and the study focuses only
on the top and bottom of the income scale. As a result, it leaves out
the majority of jobs discussed in this book, which are mostly midrange
in pay, and in most cases, at least, the social benefit is neither
positive nor negative but seems to hover around zero. Still, as far as
it goes, it strongly confirms the general principle that the more one’s
work benefits others, the less one tends to be paid for it.

There are exceptions to this principle. Doctors are the most obvious.
Physicians’ salaries tend to the upper end of the scale, especially in
America, yet they do seem to play an indisputably beneficial role. Yet
even here, there are health professionals who would argue they’re not as
much exceptions as they might seem—such as the pharmacist cited a few
pages back, who was convinced most doctors contribute very little to
human health or happiness but are mainly just dispensers of placebos.
This may or may not be the case; frankly, I don’t have the competence to
say; but if nothing else, the oft-cited fact that the overwhelming
majority of improvement in longevity since 1900 is really due to
hygiene, nutrition, and other public health improvements and not to
improvements in medical treatment,¹⁵ suggests a case could be made that
the (very poorly paid) nurses and cleaners employed in a hospital are
actually more responsible for positive health outcomes than the
hospital’s (very highly paid) physicians.

There are a smattering of other exceptions. Many plumbers and
electricians, for instance, do quite well despite their usefulness; some
low-paid work is fairly pointless—but in large measure, the rule does
seem to hold true.¹⁶

The reasons for this inverse relation between social benefit and level
of compensation, however, are quite another matter. None of the obvious
answers seem to work. For instance: education levels are very important
in determining salary levels, but if this were simply a matter of
training and education, the American higher education system would
hardly be in the state that it is, with thousands of exquisitely trained
PhDs subsisting on adjunct teaching jobs that leave them well below the
poverty line—even dependent on food stamps.¹⁷ On the other hand, if we
were simply talking about supply and demand, it would be impossible to
understand why American nurses are paid so much less than corporate
lawyers, despite the fact that the United States is currently
experiencing an acute shortage of trained nurses and a glut of law
school graduates.¹⁸

Whatever the reasons—and myself, I believe that class power and class
loyalty have a great deal to do with it—what is perhaps most disturbing
about the situation is the fact that so many people not only acknowledge
the inverse relation but also feel this is how things ought to be. That
virtue, as the ancient Stoics used to argue, should be its own reward.

Arguments like this have long been made about teachers. It’s commonplace
to hear that grade school or middle school teachers shouldn’t be paid
well, or certainly not as well as lawyers or executives, because one
wouldn’t want people motivated primarily by greed to be teaching
children. The argument would make a certain amount of sense if it were
applied consistently—but it never is. (I have yet to hear anyone make
the same argument about doctors.)

One might even say that the notion that those who benefit society should
not be paid too well is a perversion of egalitarianism.

Let me explain what I mean by this. The moral philosopher G. A. Cohen
argued that a case could be made for equality of income for all members
of society, based on the following logic (or, at least, this is my own
bastardized summary): Why, he begins, might one pay certain people more
than others? Normally, the justification is that some produce more or
benefit society more than others. But then we must ask why they do so:

1. If some people are more talented than others (for example, have a
beautiful singing voice, are a comic genius or a math whiz), we say they
are “gifted.” If someone has already received a benefit (a “gift”), then
it makes no sense to give them an additional benefit (more money) for
that reason.

2. If some people work harder than others, it is usually impossible to
establish the degree to which this is because they have a greater
capacity for work (a gift again), and the degree to which it is because
they choose to work harder. In the former case, it would again make no
sense to reward them further for having an innate advantage over others.

3. Even if it could be proved that some work harder than others purely
out of choice, one would then have to establish whether they did so out
of altruistic motives—that is, they produced more because they wished to
benefit society—or out of selfish motives, because they sought a larger
proportion for themselves.

4. In the former case, if they produced more because they were striving
to increase social wealth, then giving them a disproportionate share of
that wealth would contradict their purpose. It would only make moral
sense to reward those driven by selfish motives.

5. Since human motives are generally shifting and confused, one cannot
simply divide the workforce into egoists and altruists. One is left with
the choice of either rewarding everyone who makes greater efforts, or
not doing so. Either option means that some people’s intentions will be
frustrated. Altruists will be frustrated in their attempts to benefit
society, while egoists will be frustrated in their attempts to benefit
themselves. If one is forced to choose one or the other, it makes better
moral sense to frustrate the egoists.

6. Therefore, people should not be paid more or otherwise rewarded for
greater effort or productivity at work.¹⁹

The logic is impeccable. Many of the underlying assumptions could no
doubt be challenged on a variety of grounds, but in this chapter, I’m
not so much interested in whether there is, in fact, a moral case for
equal distribution of income, as much as observing that in many ways,
our society seems to have embraced in points 3 and 4—just without 1, 2,
5, or 6. Critically, it rejects the premise that it is impossible to
sort workers by motives. One need only look at what sorts of careers a
worker has chosen. Is there any reason a person might be doing this job
other than the money? If so, then that person should be treated as if
point 4 applies.

As a result, there is a sense that those who choose to benefit society,
and especially those who have the gratification of knowing they benefit
society, really have no business also expecting middle-class salaries,
paid vacations, and generous retirement packages. By the same token,
there is also a feeling that those who have to suffer from the knowledge
they are doing pointless or even harmful work just for the sake of the
money ought to be rewarded with more money for exactly that reason.

One sees this on the political level all the time. In the UK, for
instance, eight years of “austerity” have seen effective pay cuts to
almost all government workers who provide immediate and obvious benefits
to the public: nurses, bus drivers, firefighters, railroad information
booth workers, emergency medical personnel. It has come to the point
where there are full-time nurses who are dependent on charity food
banks. Yet creating this situation became such a point of pride for the
party in power that Parliamentarians were known to give out collective
cheers on voting down bills proposing to give nurses or police a raise.
The same party took a notoriously indulgent view of the sharply rising
compensation of those City bankers who had very nearly crashed the world
economy a few years before. Yet that government remained highly popular.
There is a sense, it would seem, that an ethos of collective sacrifice
for the common good should fall disproportionately on those who are
already, by their choice of work, engaged in sacrifice for the common
good. Or who simply have the gratification of knowing their work is
productive and useful.

This can make sense only if one first assumes that work—more
specifically, paid work—is a value in itself; indeed, so much a value in
itself that either the motives of the person taking the job, or the
effects of the work, are at best secondary considerations. The flip side
of the left-wing protest marchers waving signs demanding “More Jobs” is
the right-wing onlooker muttering “Get a job!” as they pass by. There
seems a broad consensus not so much even that work is good but that not
working is very bad; that anyone who is not slaving away harder than
he’d like at something he doesn’t especially enjoy is a bad person, a
scrounger, a skiver, a contemptible parasite unworthy of sympathy or
public relief. This feeling is echoed as much in the liberal
politician’s protest against the sufferings of “hardworking people”
(what about those who work with only moderate intensity?) as it is in
conservative protests about skivers and “welfare queens.” Even more
strikingly, the same values are now applied at the top. No longer do we
hear much about the idle rich—this is not because they don’t exist, but
because their idleness is no longer celebrated. During the Great
Depression of the 1930s, impoverished audiences liked to watch high
society movies about the romantic escapades of playboy millionaires.
Nowadays they are more likely to be regaled with stories of heroic CEOs
and their dawn-to-midnight workaholic schedules.²⁰ In England,
newspapers and magazines even write similar things about the royal
family, who, we now learn, spend so many hours a week preparing for and
executing their ritual functions that they barely have time to have a
private life at all.

Many testimonies remarked on this work-as-an-end-in-itself morality.
Clement had what he described as “a BS job evaluating grants at a public
university in the Midwest.” During his off-hours, which was most of
them, he spent a lot of time on the Web familiarizing himself with
alternative political perspectives and eventually came to realize much
of the money flowing through his office was intimately tied to the US
war efforts in Iraq and Afghanistan. He quit, and, to the surprise and
consternation of his coworkers, took a significantly lower-paying job
with the local municipality. There, he said, the work is harder, but “at
least some of it is interesting and helpful to humans.”

One of the things that puzzled Clement was the way that everyone at his
old job felt they had to pretend to one another they were overwhelmed by
their responsibilities, despite the obvious fact that they had very
little to do:

Clement: My colleagues often discussed how busy things would get and how
hard they work, even though they would routinely be gone at two or three
in the afternoon. What is the name for this kind of public denial of the
crystal-clear reality?

My mind keeps going back to the pressure to value ourselves and others
on the basis of how hard we work at something we’d rather not be doing.
I believe this attitude exists in the air around us. We sniff it into
our noses and exhale it as a social reflex in small-talk; it is one of
the guiding principles of social relations here: if you’re not
destroying your mind and body via paid work, you’re not living right.
Are we to believe that we are sacrificing for our kids, or something,
who we don’t get to see because we’re at work all fucking day!?

Clement felt this kind of pressure was especially acute in what he
described as the German-Protestant-inflected culture of the American
Midwest. Others spoke of Puritanism, but the feeling does not appear to
be limited to Protestant or North Atlantic environments. It exists
everywhere; the differences are more a matter of varying degrees and
intensities. And if the value of work is in part the fact that it’s
“something we’d rather not be doing,” it stands to reason that anything
we would wish to be doing is less like work and more like play, or a
hobby, or something we might consider doing in our spare time, and
therefore less deserving of material reward. Probably we shouldn’t be
paid for it at all.

This certainly resonates with my own experience. Most academics are
first drawn to their careers because they love knowledge and are excited
by ideas. After all, pretty much anyone capable of spending seven years
earning a PhD knows that she could just as easily have spent three years
in law school and come out with a starting salary many times higher. Yet
despite that, when two academics in the same department hobnob over
coffee, a love of knowledge or excitement about ideas is likely to be
the last thing they express. Instead, they will almost invariably
complain about how overwhelmed they are with administrative
responsibilities. True, this is partly because academics actually are
expected to spend less and less of their time reading and writing, and
more and more time dealing with administrative problems,²¹ but even if
one is pursuing some exciting new intellectual discovery, it would be
seen as inconsiderate to act as if one was enjoying one’s work when
others clearly aren’t. Some academic environments are more
anti-intellectual than others. But everywhere, at the very least, there
is a sense that the pleasurable aspects of one’s calling, such as
thinking, were not really what one is being paid for; they were better
seen as occasional indulgences one is granted in recognition of one’s
real work, which is largely about filling out forms.

Academics aren’t paid for writing or reviewing research articles, but at
least the universities that do pay them acknowledge, however
reluctantly, that research is part of their job description. In the
business world, it’s worse. For instance, Geoff Shullenberger, a writing
professor at New York University, reacted to my original 2013 essay with
a blog pointing out that many businesses now feel that if there’s work
that’s gratifying in any way at all, they really shouldn’t have to pay
for it:

For Graeber, bullshit jobs carry with them a moral imperative: “If
you’re not busy all the time doing something, anything—doesn’t really
matter what it is—you’re a bad person.” But the flipside of that logic
seems to be: if you actually like doing X activity, if it is valuable,
meaningful, and carries intrinsic rewards for you, it is wrong for you
to expect to be paid (well) for it; you should give it freely, even
(especially) if by doing so you are allowing others to profit. In other
words, we’ll make a living from you doing what you love (for free), but
we’ll keep you in check by making sure you have to make a living doing
what you hate.

Shullenberger gave the example of translation work. Translating a
paragraph or document from one language to another—particularly from a
dry business document—is not a task that many people would do for fun;
still, one can imagine some reasons people might do it other than the
money. (They are trying to perfect their language abilities, for
example.) Therefore, most executives’ first instinct, upon hearing that
translation work is required, is to try to see if they can’t find some
way to make someone do it for free. Yet these very same executives are
willing to shell out handsome salaries for “Vice Presidents for Creative
Development” and the like, who do absolutely nothing. (In fact, such
executives might themselves be Vice Presidents for Creative Development,
and do nothing at all other than trying to figure out how to get others
to do work for free.)

Shullenberger speaks of an emerging “voluntariat,” with capitalist firms
increasingly harvesting the results not of paid labor but of unpaid
interns, internet enthusiasts, activists, volunteers, and hobbyists, and
“digitally sharecropping” the results of popular enthusiasm and
creativity to privatize and market the results.²² The free software
industry, perversely enough, has become a paradigm in this respect. The
reader may recall Pablo, who introduced the notion of duct taping in
chapter 2: software engineering work was divided between the interesting
and challenging work of developing core technologies, and the tedious
labor of “applying duct tape” to allow different core technologies to
work together, because the designers had never bothered to think about
their compatibility. His main point, though, was that, increasingly,
open source means that all the really engaging tasks are done for free:

Pablo: Where two decades ago, companies dismissed open source software
and developed core technologies in-house, nowadays companies rely
heavily on open source and employ software developers almost entirely to
apply duct tape on core technologies they get for free.

In the end, you can see people doing the nongratifying duct-taping work
during office hours and then doing gratifying work on core technologies
during the night.

This leads to an interesting vicious circle: given that people choose to
work on core technologies for free, no company is investing in those
technologies. The underinvestment means that the core technologies are
often unfinished, lacking quality, have a lot of rough edges, bugs, etc.
That, in turn, creates need for duct tape and thus proliferation of
duct-taping jobs.

Paradoxically, the more that software engineers collaborate online to do
free creative labor simply for the love of doing it, as a gift to
humanity, the less incentive they have to make them compatible with
other such software, and the more those same engineers will have to be
employed in their day jobs fixing the damage—doing the sort of
maintenance work that no one would be willing to do for free. He
concludes:

Pablo: My guess is that we are going to see the same dynamics in other
industries as well. E.g., if people are willing to write news articles
for free, nobody would pay professional journalists. Instead, the money
will be redirected to the PR and advertisement industries. Eventually
the quality of news will decrease because of lack of funding.

One could argue that this has already begun to happen, as fewer and
fewer newspapers and news services employ actual reporters. My purpose
here, though, is not to unravel the complex and often arcane labor
arrangements that grow out of this ethos, but simply to document the
existence of the ethos itself. Attitudes toward labor have changed. Why?
How have so many humans reached the point where they accept that even
miserable, unnecessary work is actually morally superior to no work at
all?

Here we must consider the history of changing ideas about work itself.

on the theological roots of our attitudes toward labor

Man is made to be in the visible universe an image and likeness of God
Himself, and he is placed in it in order to subdue the earth . . . Only
man is capable of work, and only man works, at the same time by work
occupying his existence on earth.

—Pope John Paul II, Laborem Exercens (On Human Labor), 1981

We may define labor as any exertion of mind or body undergone partly or
wholly with a view to some good other than the pleasure derived from the
work.

—Alfred Marshall, Principles of Economics, 1890

What is “work”? Normally we see it as the opposite of play. Play, in
turn, is defined most often as action that one does for its own sake,
for pleasure, or just for the sake of doing it. Work, therefore, is
activity—typically, onerous and repetitive—that one does not carry out
for its own sake, and that one probably would never carry out for its
own sake, or if one did certainly not for very long, but engages in only
to accomplish something else (to obtain food, for example, or build a
mausoleum).

Most languages have some word that translates at least roughly as
“work,” but the precise borders between what we’d designate “work,”
“play,” “teaching,” “learning,” “ritual,” or “nurturance” tend to vary a
great deal from one culture to another. The particular tradition that
has come to shape sensibilities about work in most parts of the world
today harkens back to the Eastern Mediterranean, where it is first
documented in the early chapters of the book of Genesis, and in the
works of the Greek epic poet Hesiod. In both the story of the Garden of
Eden and in the myth of Prometheus, the fact that humans have to work is
seen as their punishment for having defied a divine Creator, but at the
same time, in both, work itself, which gives humans the ability to
produce food, clothing, cities, and ultimately our own material
universe, is presented as a more modest instantiation of the divine
power of Creation itself. We are, as the existentialists liked to put
it, condemned to be free, forced to wield the divine power of creation
against our will, since most of us would really rather be naming the
animals in Eden, dining on nectar and ambrosia at feasts on Mount
Olympus, or watching cooked geese fly into our waiting gullets in the
Land of Cockaygne, than having to cover ourselves with cuts and calluses
to coax sustenance from the soil.

Now, one could argue that this is simply in each case a poetic
extrapolation of the two key aspects of what has become our common
definition of work: first, that it is something no one would ordinarily
wish to be doing for its own sake (hence, punishment); second, that we
do it anyway to accomplish something beyond the work itself (hence,
creation). But the fact that this “something beyond” should be conceived
as “creation” is not self-evident. In fact, it’s somewhat odd. After
all, most work can’t be said to “create” anything; most of it is a
matter of maintaining and rearranging things.²³ Consider a coffee cup.
We “produce” it once. We wash it a thousand times. Even work we think of
as “productive”—growing potatoes, forging a shovel, assembling a
computer—could just as easily be seen as tending, transforming,
reshaping, and rearranging materials and elements that already exist.

This is why I would insist our concept of “production,” and our
assumption that work is defined by its “productivity,” is essentially
theological. The Judeo-Christian God created the universe out of
nothing. (This in itself is slightly unusual: most Gods work with
existing materials.) His latter-day worshippers, and their descendants,
have come to think of themselves as cursed to imitate God in this
regard. The sleight of hand involved, the way that most human labor,
which cannot in any sense be considered “production,” is thus made to
disappear, is largely effected through gender. In the familiar lines
from the story of the Fall, from the book of Genesis, God condemns men
to till the soil (“By the sweat of your brow you will eat your food”)
and women to bear children in similarly unhappy circumstances (“I will
make your pains in childbearing very severe; with painful labor you will
give birth to children”.)²⁴ Male “productive” labor is thus being framed
here as the equivalent of childbirth, which, from a male point of view
(not so much from a female one, but it is very much a male point of view
being presented here), can seem about as close to pure creation ex
nihilio—the infant appearing fully formed apparently out of nowhere—that
human beings can perform.

Yet it is also painful “labor.”

This conception is still with us, for instance, in the way social
scientists speak of “production” and “reproduction.” Etymologically, the
English verb “produce” derives from the Latin producere, “to bring
forth,” or “put out,” as one might still say “She produced a wallet from
her handbag.” Both the words “production” and “reproduction” are based
on the same core metaphor: in the one case, objects seem to jump, fully
formed, out of factories; in the other, babies seem to jump, fully
formed, out of women’s bodies. In neither case, of course, is this
actually true. But as in so many patriarchal social orders, men like to
conceive of themselves as doing socially, or culturally, what they like
to think of women as doing naturally. “Production” is thus
simultaneously a variation on a male fantasy of childbirth, and of the
action of a male Creator God who similarly created the entire universe
through the sheer power of his mind and words, just as men see
themselves as creating the world from their minds and brawn, and see
that as the essence of “work,” leaving to women most of the actual labor
of tidying and maintaining things to make this illusion possible.

on the origins of the northern european notion of paid labor as necessary to the full formation of an adult human being

It’s essential to emphasize the theological origins of this sort of
thought. Most of the core assumptions of modern economics originally
trace back to theological arguments: for instance, Saint Augustine’s
argument that we are cursed with infinite desires in a finite world and
thus naturally in a situation of competition with one another—which
reappears in secular form in the seventeenth century in Thomas
Hobbes—has become the basis for the assumption that rational human
action is largely a matter of “economizing,” the optimal allocation of
scarce resources by rational actors in a competitive world.

Of course, in the European Middle Ages, when economic matters fell under
the jurisdiction of church law, no one really pretended these questions
were not theological. Still, that period introduced a further element,
not explicitly theological, the importance of which for later
conceptions of labor can hardly be overstated. This is the notion of
“service.”²⁵ It is very much a Northern European idea.

In theory, feudal society was a vast system of service: not only serfs
but also lower-ranking feudal lords “served” higher ones, just as higher
ones provided feudal service to the king. However, the form of service
that had the most important and pervasive influence on most people’s
lives was not feudal service but what historical sociologists have
called “life-cycle” service. Essentially, almost everyone was expected
to spend roughly the first seven to fifteen years of his or her working
life as a servant in someone else’s household. Most of us are familiar
with how this worked itself out within craft guilds, where teenagers
would first be assigned to master craftsmen as apprentices, and then
become journeymen, but only when they achieved the status of master
craftsmen would they have the means to marry and set up their own
households and shops, and take apprentices of their own. In fact, the
system was in no sense limited to artisans. Even peasants normally
expected to spend their teenage years onward as “servants in husbandry”
in another farm household, typically, that of someone just slightly
better off. Service was expected equally of girls and boys (that’s what
milkmaids were: daughters of peasants during their years of service),
and was usually expected even of the elite. The most familiar example
here would be pages, who were apprentice knights, but even noblewomen,
unless they were at the very top of the hierarchy, were expected to
spend their adolescence as ladies-in-waiting—that is, servants who would
“wait upon” a married noblewoman of slightly higher rank, attending to
her privy chamber, toilette, meals, and so forth, even as they were also
“waiting” for such time as they, too, were in a position to marry and
become the lady of an aristocratic household themselves. Royal courts
similarly had “gentleman waiters,” who attended to the privy chamber of
the king.²⁶

In the case of young nobles, “waiting” largely meant waiting for an
inheritance—or for one’s parents to decide one was old and sufficiently
well groomed to merit a transfer of title and property. This might be
the case for servants in husbandry as well, but generally speaking,
among commoners, servants were paid and expected to save a good share of
their wages. So they were acquiring both the knowledge and experience
needed to manage a household, shop, or farm, and also the wealth needed
to acquire one—or, in the case of women, to be able to offer a dowry to
a suitor able to do the same. As a result, medieval people married late,
usually around thirty, which meant that “youth”—adolescence, a time when
one was expected to be at least a little wild, lustful, and
rebellious—would often last a good fifteen to twenty years.

The fact that servants were paid is crucial because it meant that while
wage labor did exist in Northern Europe, centuries before the dawn of
capitalism, almost everyone in the Middle Ages assumed that it was
something respectable people engaged in only in the first phase of their
working life. Service and wage labor were largely identified; even in
Oliver Cromwell’s time, day laborers could still be referred to as
“servants.” Service, in turn, was seen above all as the process whereby
young people learned not only their trade, but the “manners,” the
comportment appropriate to a responsible adult. As one oft-quoted
account by a Venetian visitor to England put it around 1500:

The want of affection in the English is strongly manifested toward their
children; for after having kept them at home till they arrive at the age
of seven or nine years at the utmost, they put them out, both males and
females, to hard service in the households of other people, binding them
generally for seven or nine years.²⁷ And these are called apprentices,
and during that time they perform all the most menial offices; and few
are born who are exempted from this fate, for everyone, however rich he
may be, sends away his children into the houses of others, whilst he, in
return, receives those of strangers into his own. And on inquiring their
reason for this severity, they answered that they did it in order that
their children learn better manners.²⁸

Manners, in the medieval and Early Modern sense, went well beyond
etiquette; the term referred to one’s manner of acting and being in the
world more generally, one’s habits, tastes, and sensibilities. Young
people were expected to work for wages in the households of others
because—unless one was intending to join the clergy and become a
scholar—what we would consider paid work, and what we would consider
education, were seen as largely the same thing, and both were a process
of learning self-discipline, about “achiev[ing] mastery of one’s baser
desires”²⁹ and learning how to behave like a proper self-contained
adult.

This is not to say that medieval and Early Modern culture had no place
for the rambunctiousness of youth. To the contrary. Young people, even
though in service in others’ households, typically also created an
alternative culture of their own, centered on youth lodges with names
such as the Lords of Misrule and Abbots of Unreason, which sometimes
were even allowed to take temporary power during the popular festivals.
Yet ultimately, disciplined work under the direction of an adult head of
a household was to transform the young into self-disciplined adults, at
which point they would no longer have to work for others but would be
self-employed.

•  •  •

As a result of such arrangements, attitudes toward work in medieval
Northern Europe look quite different from those that prevailed in the
classical world, or even, as we’ve seen, the later Mediterranean. (The
Venetian ambassador was scandalized by English practices.) Most of our
sources from Greek and Roman antiquity are male aristocrats who saw
physical labor or service as fit only for women or slaves. Work,
Aristotle insisted, in no sense makes you a better person; in fact, it
makes you a worse one, since it takes up so much time, thus making it
difficult to fulfill one’s social and political obligations. As a
result, the punishment aspect of work tended to be emphasized in
classical literature, while the creative and godlike aspect was largely
seen as falling to those male heads of household rich enough that they
didn’t actually have to get their hands dirty but could tell others what
to do. In Northern Europe in the Middle Ages and the Renaissance, almost
everyone was expected to get their hands dirty at some point or
another.³⁰ As a result, work, especially paid work, was seen as
transformative. This is important because it means that certain key
aspects of what was to become known as the Protestant work ethic were
already there, long before the emergence of Protestantism.

how, with the advent of capitalism, work came to be seen in many quarters either as a means of social reform or ultimately as a virtue in its own right, and how laborers countered by embracing the labor theory of value

No adequate history of the meanings of work has been written.

—C. Wright Mills, White Collar: The American Middle Classes, 1951

All this was to change with the advent of capitalism. By “capitalism,”
here I am referring not to markets—these had long existed—but to the
gradual transformation of relations of service into permanent relations
of wage labor: that is, a relation between some people who owned
capital, and others who did not and thus were obliged to work for them.
What this meant in human terms was, first of all, that millions of young
people found themselves trapped in permanent social adolescence. As the
guild structures broke down, apprentices could become journeymen, but
journeymen could no longer become masters, which meant that, in
traditional terms, they would not be a position to marry and start
families of their own. They were expected to live their entire lives
effectively as unfinished human beings.³¹ Inevitably, many began to
rebel, give up on the interminable waiting, and began marrying early,
abandoning their masters to set up cottages and families of their
own—which, in turn, set off a wave of moral panic among the emerging
employing class very reminiscent of later moral panics about teenage
pregnancy. The following is from The Anatomie of Abuses, a
sixteenth-century manifesto by a Puritan named Phillip Stubbes:

And besides this, you shall have every saucy boy, of ten, fourteen,
sixteen, or twenty years of age, catch up a woman, and marry her,
without any fear of God at all . . . or, which is more, without any
respect how they may live together, with sufficient maintenance for
their callings and estate. No, no! It maketh no matter for these things,
so he have his pretty pussy to huggle withall, for that is the only
thing he desireth. Then build they up a cottage, though but of elder
poles, in every lane end almost, where they live as beggers all their
life after. This filleth the land with such store of mendicants . . .
that in short time it is like to grow to great poverty and scarceness.³²

It was at this moment that one can speak of the birth of the proletariat
as a class—a term derived appropriately enough from a Latin word for
“those who produce offspring,” since in Rome, the poorest citizens who
did not have enough wealth to tax were useful to the government only by
producing sons who could be drafted into the army.

Stubbes’s Anatomie of Abuses might be considered the very manifesto of
the Puritan “Reformation of Manners,” as they called it, which was very
much a middle-class vision, with an equally jaundiced view of both the
carnality of court life, and the “heathenish rioting” of popular
entertainment. It also shows it’s impossible to understand debates about
Puritanism and the origins of the Protestant work ethic without
understanding this larger context of the decline of life-cycle service
and creation of a proletariat. English Calvinists (actually they were
only called “Puritans” by those who disliked them) tended to be drawn
from the class of master craftsmen and “improving” farmers who were
employing this newly created proletariat, and their “Reformation of
Manners” took special aim at popular festivals, gaming, drinking, “and
all the annual rites of misrule when youth temporarily inverted the
social order.”³³ The Puritan ideal was for all such “masterless men” to
be rounded up, and placed under the stern discipline of a pious
household whose patriarch could direct them in work and prayer. But this
was just the first of a long history of attempts to reform the manners
of the lower classes that has followed, from Victorian workhouses where
the poor were taught proper time discipline, to workfare and similar
government programs today.

Why, starting in the sixteenth century, did the middle classes suddenly
develop such an interest in reforming the moral comportment of the
poor—a subject they had not previously found of much interest one way or
the other? This has always been something of a historical mystery. In
the context of life-cycle service, though, it actually makes perfect
sense. The poor were seen as frustrated adolescents. Work—and
specifically, paid labor under the eye of a master—had traditionally
been the means by which such adolescents learned how to be proper,
disciplined, self-contained adults. While in practical terms Puritans
and other pious reformers could no longer promise much to the
poor—certainly not adulthood as it used to be conceived, as freedom from
the need to work under the orders of others—they substituted charity,
discipline, and a renewed infusion of theology. Work, they taught, was
both punishment and redemption. Work was self-mortification and as such
had value in itself, even beyond the wealth it produced, which was
merely a sign of God’s favor (and not to be enjoyed too much.)³⁴

After the industrial revolution, the celebration of work was taken up
with renewed vigor by the Methodists, but even more, if anything, in
educated middle-class circles that didn’t see themselves as particularly
religious. Perhaps its greatest advocate was Thomas Carlyle, an
enormously popular essayist, who, concerned with the decline of morality
in the new Age of Mammon, proposed what he called a Gospel of Work.
Carlyle insisted that labor should not be viewed as a way to satisfy
material needs, but as the essence of life itself; God had intentionally
created the world unfinished so as to allow humans the opportunity to
complete His work through labor:

A man perfects himself by working . . . Consider how, even in the
meanest sorts of Labour, the whole soul of man is composed into a kind
of real harmony, the instant he sets himself to work! Doubt, Desire,
Sorrow, Remorse, Indignation, Despair itself, all these like helldogs
lie beleaguering the soul of the poor day-worker, as of every man; but
he bends himself with free valour against his task, and all these are
stilled, all these shrink murmuring far off into their caves. The man is
now a man. The blessed glow of Labour in him, is it not purifying fire,
wherein all poison is burnt up?

All true Work is sacred; in all true Work, were it but true hand-labour,
there is something of divineness . . . Oh brother, if this is not
“worship,” then I say, the more the pity for worship; for this is the
noblest thing yet discovered under God’s sky. Who art thou that
complainest of thy life of toil? Complain not. Look up, my wearied
brother; see thy fellow Workmen there, in God’s Eternity, sacred Band of
the Immortals, celestial Bodyguard of the Empire of Mankind.³⁵

Carlyle was ultimately led to the conclusion so many reach today: that
if work is noble, then the most noble work should not be compensated,
since it is obscene to put a price on something of such absolute value
(“the ‘wages’ of every noble Work do yet lie in Heaven or else
nowhere”)³⁶—though he was generous enough to allow that the poor did
need to be afforded “fair wages” in order to obtain the means to live.

Such arguments were immensely popular in middle-class circles.
Unsurprisingly, the worker’s movement beginning to form in Europe around
Carlyle’s time was less impressed. Most workers involved in Luddism,
Chartism, Ricardian Socialism, and the various early strains of English
radicalism would probably have agreed there was something divine in
work, but that divine quality lay not in its effect on the soul and
body—as laborers, they knew better than that—but that it was the source
of wealth; everything that made rich and powerful people rich and
powerful was, in fact, created by the efforts of the poor. Adam Smith
and David Ricardo, the founders of British economic science, had
embraced the labor theory of value—as did many of the new
industrialists, since it allowed them to distinguish themselves from the
landed gentry, whom they represented as mere idle consumers—but the
theory was almost instantly taken up by Socialists and labor organizers
and turned against the industrialists themselves. Before long economists
began seeking for alternatives on explicitly political grounds. Already
in 1832—that is, thirty-five years before the appearance of Marx’s
Capital—we encounter warnings like the following: “That labor is the
sole source of wealth seems to be a doctrine as dangerous as it is
false, as it unhappily affords a handle to those who would represent all
property as belonging to the working classes, and the share which is
received by others as a robbery or fraud upon them.”³⁷

By the 1830s, many were, in fact, proclaiming exactly that. It is
important to emphasize just how universally accepted the labor theory of
value became in the generations immediately following the industrial
revolution—even before the dissemination of Marx’s works, which gave
such arguments a renewed energy and a more sophisticated theoretical
language. It was particularly powerful in Britain’s American colonies.
The mechanics and tradesmen who became the foot soldiers of the American
War of Independence represented themselves as producers of the wealth
that they saw the British crown as looting, and after the Revolution,
many turned the same language against would-be capitalists. “The solid
rock on which their idea of the good society rested,” as one historian
put it, “was that labor created all wealth.”³⁸ The word “capitalist” at
that time was largely a term of abuse. When US President Abraham Lincoln
delivered his first annual message to Congress in 1861, for instance, he
included the following lines, which, radical though they seem to a
contemporary ear, where really just a reflection of the common sense of
the time:³⁹ “Labor is prior to and independent of capital. Capital is
only the fruit of labor, and could never have existed if labor had not
first existed. Labor is the superior of capital, and deserves much the
higher consideration.”

Still, Lincoln went on to insist, what made the United States different
from Europe, indeed what made its democracy possible, was that it lacked
a permanent population of wage laborers:

“There is not of necessity any such thing as the free hired laborer
being fixed to that condition for life. Many independent men everywhere
in these States a few years back in their lives were hired laborers. The
prudent, penniless beginner in the world labors for wages a while, saves
a surplus with which to buy tools or land for himself, then labors on
his own account another while, and at length hires another new beginner
to help him.”

In other words, even though he didn’t put it quite this way, Lincoln
argued that, owing to America’s rapid economic and territorial
expansion, it was possible there to maintain something like the old
medieval system, in which everyone started out working for others, then
used the proceeds of wage labor to set up shop, or buy a farm (on land
seized from its indigenous inhabitants), and then eventually themselves
play the capitalist, employing young people as laborers in their own
right.

This was definitely the ideal in pre–Civil War America—though Lincoln
was from Illinois, not too far from the frontier; workingmen’s
associations in the old cities of the Eastern Seaboard were already
taking issue with arguments like this.⁴⁰ What’s significant here is that
Lincoln felt he had to accept the labor theory of value as the framework
of debate. Everyone did. This remained the case at least until the end
of the century. It was true even along the Western frontier, where one
might have imagined European-style class tensions were least likely to
flare up. In 1880 a Protestant “home missionary” who had spent some
years traveling along the Western frontier reported that: “You can
hardly find a group of ranchmen or miners from Colorado to the Pacific
who will not have on their tongue’s end the labor slang of Denis
Kearney, the infidel ribaldry of [atheist pamphleteer] Robert Ingersoll,
the Socialistic theories of Karl Marx.”⁴¹

Certainly a detail left out of every cowboy movie I ever saw! (The
notable exception being The Treasure of the Sierra Madre, which does
indeed begin with a scene where John Huston, as a miner, explains the
labor theory of value to Humphrey Bogart.)⁴²

concerning the key flaw in the labor theory of value as it became popular in the nineteenth century, and how the owners of capital exploited that flaw

Virtually any form of labor can be described as “caring” in the sense
that it results in activities that help meet the needs of others.

—Nancy Folbre

I turned to America for a reason. The United States plays a key role in
our story. Nowhere was the principle that all wealth derives from labor
more universally accepted as ordinary common sense, yet nowhere, too,
was the counterattack against this common sense so calculated, so
sustained, and so ultimately effective. By the early decades of the
twentieth century, when the first cowboy movies were being made, this
work was largely complete, and the idea that ranch hands had once been
avid readers of Marx would have seemed as ridiculous as it would to most
Americans today. Even more important, this counteroffensive laid the
groundwork for the apparently bizarre attitudes toward work, largely
emanating from North America, that we can still observe spreading across
the world, with pernicious results.

Lincoln was no doubt overstating his case, but it is nonetheless true
that in the “Artisans Republic” that existed before the Civil War,
something roughly like the older tradition of life-cycle service did
endure—with the notable difference that most hired laborers were not
called “servants” and did not live in their employers’ homes.
Politicians did see this as the ideal and legislated accordingly.
Would-be capitalists were not granted the right to create
limited-liability corporations unless they could prove doing so would
constitute a clear and incontestable “public benefit” (in other words,
the notion of social value not only existed but was inscribed in
law)—this usually meant, in practice, only if they were proposing to dig
a canal or build a railroad.⁴³ Apart from the atheists along the
frontier, much of this anticapitalist feeling was justified on religious
grounds; popular Protestantism, drawing on its Puritan roots, not only
celebrated work, but embraced the belief that, as my fellow
anthropologists Dimitra Doukas and Paul Durrenberger have put it, “work
was a sacred duty and a claim to moral and political superiority over
the idle rich”—a more explicitly religious version of Carlyle’s “gospel
of work” (most historians simply call it “producerism”), which insisted
that work was both a value in itself and the only real producer of
value.

In the immediate wake of the Civil War all this began to change with the
first stirrings of large-scale bureaucratic, corporate capitalism. The
“Robber Barons,” as the new tycoons came to be called, were at first met
(as the name given them implies) with extraordinary hostility. But by
the 1890s they embarked on an intellectual counteroffensive, proposing
what Doukas and Durrenberger call, after an essay by Andrew Carnegie, a
“Gospel of Wealth”:

The fledgling corporate giants, their bankers, and their political
allies objected to producerist moral claims and, starting in the 1890s,
reached out with a new ideology that claimed, to the contrary, that
capital, not labor, creates wealth and prosperity. Powerful coalitions
of corporate interests made concerted efforts to transform the message
of schools, universities, churches, and civic groups, claiming that
“business had solved the fundamental ethical and political problems of
industrial society.”

Steel magnate Andrew Carnegie was a leader of this cultural campaign. To
the masses, Carnegie argued for what we’d now call consumerism: the
productivity of “concentrated” capital, under the wise stewardship of
the fit, would so lower the price of commodities that the workers of
tomorrow would live as well as the kings of the past. To the elite, he
argued that coddling the poor with high wages was not good for “the
race.”⁴⁴

The promulgation of consumerism also coincided with the beginnings of
the managerial revolution, which was, especially at first, largely an
attack on popular knowledge. Where once hoopers and wainwrights and
seamstresses saw themselves as heirs to a proud tradition, each with its
secret knowledge, the new bureaucratically organized corporations and
their “scientific management” sought as far as possible to literally
turn workers into extensions of the machinery, their every move
predetermined by someone else.

The real question to be asked here, it seems to me, is: Why was this
campaign so successful? Because it cannot be denied that, within a
generation, “producerism” had given way to “consumerism,” the “source of
status,” as Harry Braverman put it, was “no longer the ability to make
things but simply the ability to purchase them,”⁴⁵ and the labor theory
of value—which had, meanwhile, been knocked out of economic theory by
the “marginal revolution”—had so fallen away from popular common sense
that nowadays, only graduate students or small circles of revolutionary
Marxist theorists are likely to have heard of it. Nowadays, if one
speaks of “wealth producers,” people will automatically assume one is
referring not to workers but to capitalists.

This was a monumental shift in popular consciousness. What made it
possible? It seems to me that the main reason lies in a flaw in the
original labor theory of value itself. This was its focus on
“production”—a concept which, as earlier noted, is basically
theological, and bears in it a profound patriarchal bias. Even in the
Middle Ages, the Christian God was seen as a craftsman and an
artificer,⁴⁶ and human work—which was always conceived primarily as male
work—as a matter of making and building things, or perhaps coaxing them
from the soil, while for women “labor” was seen primarily and
emblematically as a matter of producing babies. Most real women’s labor
disappeared from the conversation. Obviously, the startling,
unprecedented increases in productivity that followed in the wake of the
industrial revolution played a role here, too: they could only have had
led to arguments about the relative importance of machines, and the
people operating them, and indeed those arguments remained at the center
of political and economic debate throughout the nineteenth century.

But even when it comes to factory labor, there is something of a darker
story. The initial instinct of most early factory owners was not to
employ men in the mills at all, but women and children: the latter were,
after all, considered more tractable, and women especially, more inured
to monotonous, repetitive work. The results were often brutal and
horrific. The situation also left traditional male craftsmen in a
particularly distressing situation; not only were they thrown out of
work by the new factories, their wives and children, who used to work
under their direction, were now the breadwinners. This was clearly a
factor in the early wave of machine-breaking during the Napoleonic Wars
that came to be known as Luddism, and a key element in allaying that
rebellion seems to have been a tacit social compromise whereby it came
to be understood that it would be primarily adult men who would be
employed in factory work. This, and the fact that for the next century
or so labor organizing tended to focus on factory workers (partly simply
because they were the easiest to organize), led to the situation we have
now, where simply invoking the term “working class” instantly draws up
images of men in overalls toiling on production lines, and it’s common
to hear otherwise intelligent middle-class intellectuals suggest that,
with the decline of factory work, the working class in, say, Britain or
America no longer exists—as if it were actually ingeniously constructed
androids that were driving their buses, trimming their hedges,
installing their cables, or changing their grandparents’ bedpans.

In fact, there was never a time most workers worked in factories. Even
in the days of Karl Marx, or Charles Dickens, working-class
neighborhoods housed far more maids, bootblacks, dustmen, cooks, nurses,
cabbies, schoolteachers, prostitutes, caretakers, and costermongers than
employees in coal mines, textile mills, or iron foundries. Are these
former jobs “productive”? In what sense and for whom? Who “produces” a
soufflé? It’s because of these ambiguities that such issues are
typically brushed aside when people are arguing about value; but doing
so blinds us to the reality that most working-class labor, whether
carried out by men or women, actually more resembles what we
archetypically think of as women’s work, looking after people, seeing to
their wants and needs, explaining, reassuring, anticipating what the
boss wants or is thinking, not to mention caring for, monitoring, and
maintaining plants, animals, machines, and other objects, than it
involves hammering, carving, hoisting, or harvesting things.

This blindness has consequences. Let me give an illustration. In 2014
there was a transit strike when London’s mayor threatened to close
perhaps a hundred London Underground ticket offices, leaving only
machines. This sparked an online debate among certain local Marxists
about whether the workers threatened with redundancy had “bullshit
jobs”—the logic put forward by some being that, either a job produced
value for capitalism, which the capitalists clearly no longer thought
these jobs did, or else it served a social function that would be
necessary even if capitalism did not exist, which clearly these did not
since under full communism, transport would be free. Needless to say I
was drawn in. Asked to respond, I eventually referred my interlocutors
to a circular put out by the strikers themselves, called “Advice to
Passengers Using the Future London Underground.” It included lines like
these:

Please ensure you are thoroughly familiar with London Underground’s 11
lines and 270 stations before traveling . . . Please ensure that there
are no delays in your journey, or any accidents, emergencies, incidents,
or evacuations. Please do not be disabled. Or poor. Or new to London.
Please avoid being too young or too old. Please do not be harassed or
assaulted while traveling. Please do not lose your property or your
children. Please do not require assistance in any way.

It apparently never having occurred to many advocates of proletarian
revolution to investigate what it is that transit workers actually did,
they appear to have lapsed into something very like the right-wing
tabloid stereotype of city employees as overpaid idlers lounging about
on the public dime.

What tube workers actually do, then, is something much closer to what
feminists have termed “caring labor.” It has more in common with a
nurse’s work than a bricklayer’s. It’s just that, in the same way as
women’s unpaid caring labor is made to disappear from our accounts of
“the economy,” so are the caring aspects of other working-class jobs
made to disappear as well. One might make a case, perhaps, that British
working-class traditions of caring labor do make themselves known in
popular culture, which is largely a working-class product, with all the
characteristic gestures, manners, and cadences by which working-class
people cheer one another up reflected in British music, British comedy,
and British children’s literature. But it is not recognized as
value-creating labor in itself.

“Caring labor” is generally seen as work directed at other people, and
it always involves a certain labor of interpretation, empathy, and
understanding. To some degree, one might argue that this is not really
work at all, it’s just life, or life lived properly—humans are naturally
empathetic creatures, and to communicate with one another at all, we
must constantly cast ourselves imaginatively into each other’s shoes and
try to understand what others are thinking and feeling, which usually
means caring about them at least a little—but it very much becomes work
when all the empathy and imaginative identification is on one side. The
key to caring labor as a commodity is not that some people care but that
others don’t; that those paying for “services” (note how the old feudal
term is still retained) feel no need to engage in interpretive labor
themselves. This is even true of a bricklayer, if that bricklayer is
working for someone else. Underlings have to constantly monitor what the
boss is thinking; the boss doesn’t have to care. That, in turn, is one
reason, I believe, why psychological studies regularly find that people
of working-class background are more accurate at reading other people’s
feelings, and more empathetic and caring, than those of middle-class,
let alone wealthy, backgrounds.⁴⁷ To some degree, the skill at reading
others’ emotions is just an effect of what working-class work actually
consists of: rich people don’t have to learn how to do interpretive
labor nearly as well because they can hire other people to do it for
them. Those hirelings, on the other hand, who have to develop a habit of
understanding other’s points of view, will also tend to care about
them.⁴⁸

By this token, as many feminist economists have pointed out, all labor
can be seen as caring labor, since—to turn to an example from the
beginning of the chapter—even if one builds a bridge, it’s ultimately
because one cares about people who might wish to cross the river. As the
examples I cited at the time make clear, people do really think in these
terms when they reflect on the “social value” of their jobs.⁴⁹

To think of labor as valuable primarily because it is “productive,” and
productive labor as typified by the factory worker, effecting that magic
transformation by which cars or teabags or pharmaceutical products are
“produced” out of factories through the same painful but ultimately
mysterious “labor” by which women are seen to produce babies, allows one
to make all this disappear. It also makes it maximally easy for the
factory owner to insist that no, actually, workers are really no
different from the machines they operate. Clearly, the growth of what
came to be called “scientific management” made this easier; but it would
never have been possible had the paradigmatic example of “worker” in the
popular imagination been a cook, a gardener, or a masseuse.

•  •  •

Most economists nowadays see the labor theory of value as a curiosity
from the formative days of the discipline; and it’s probably true that,
if one’s primary interest is to understand patterns of price formation,
there are better tools available. But for the worker’s movement—and
arguably, for revolutionaries like Karl Marx—that was never the real
point. The real point is philosophical. It is a recognition that the
world we inhabit is something we made, collectively, as a society, and
therefore, that we could also have made differently. This is true of
almost any physical object likely to be within reach of us at any given
moment. Every one was grown or manufactured by someone on the basis of
what someone imagined we might be like, and what they thought we might
want or need. It’s even more true of abstractions like “capitalism,”
“society,” or “the government.” They only exist because we produce them
every day. John Holloway, perhaps the most poetic of contemporary
Marxists, once proposed to write a book entitled Stop Making
Capitalism.⁵⁰ After all, he noted, even though we all act as if
capitalism is some kind of behemoth towering over us, it’s really just
something we produce. Every morning we wake up and re-create capitalism.
If one morning we woke up and all decided to create something else, then
there wouldn’t be capitalism anymore. There would be something else.

One might even say that this is the core question—perhaps ultimately the
only question—of all social theory and all revolutionary thought.
Together we create the world we inhabit. Yet if any one of us tried to
imagine a world we’d like to live in, who would come up with one exactly
like the one that currently exists? We can all imagine a better world.
Why can’t we just create one? Why does it seem so inconceivable to just
stop making capitalism? Or government? Or at the very least bad service
providers and annoying bureaucratic red tape?

Viewing work as production allows us to ask such questions. This
couldn’t be more important. It’s not clear, however, if it gives us the
means to answer them. It strikes me that recognizing that a great deal
of work is not strictly speaking productive but caring, and that there
is always a caring aspect even to the most apparently impersonal work,
does suggest one reason why it’s so difficult to simply create a
different society with a different set of rules. Even if we don’t like
what the world looks like, the fact remains that the conscious aim of
most of our actions, productive or otherwise, is to do well by others;
often, very specific others. Our actions are caught up in relations of
caring. But most caring relations require we leave the world more or
less as we found it. In the same way that teenage idealists regularly
abandon their dreams of creating a better world and come to accept the
compromises of adult life at precisely the moment they marry and have
children, caring for others, especially over the long term, requires
maintaining a world that’s relatively predictable as the grounds on
which caring can take place. One cannot save to ensure a college
education for one’s children unless one is sure in twenty years there
will still be colleges—or for that matter, money. And that, in turn,
means that love for others—people, animals, landscapes—regularly
requires the maintenance of institutional structures one might otherwise
despise.

how, over the course of the twentieth century, work came to be increasingly valued primarily as a form of discipline and self-sacrifice

We keep inventing jobs because of this false idea that everyone has to
be employed at some sort of drudgery because, according to Malthusian
Darwinian theory, he must justify his right to exist.

—Buckminster Fuller

However this may be, the “Gospel of Wealth” counteroffensive has been
successful, and the captains of industry, first in America, then
increasingly everywhere, have been able to convince the public that
they, and not those they employ, are the real creators of prosperity.
Their very success, however, created an inevitable problem. How are
workers supposed to find meaning and purpose in jobs where they are
effectively being turned into robots? Where they are actually being told
they are little better than robots, even as at the same time they are
increasingly expected to organize their lives around their work?

The obvious answer is to fall back on the old idea that work forms
character; and this is precisely what seems to have happened. One could
call it a revival of Puritanism, but as we’ve seen this idea goes much
further back: to a fusion of the Christian doctrine of the curse of Adam
with the Northern European notion that paid labor under a master’s
discipline is the only way to become a genuine adult. This history made
it very easy to encourage workers to see their work not so much as
wealth-creation, or helping others, or at least not primarily so, but as
self-abnegation, a kind of secular hair-shirt, a sacrifice of joy and
pleasure that allows us to become an adult worthy of our consumerist
toys.

A great deal of contemporary research has confirmed this assessment.
True, people in Europe or America have not historically seen their
avocation as what should mark them in the eyes of eternity. Visit a
graveyard; you will search in vain for a tombstone inscribed with the
words “steam-fitter,” “executive vice president,” “park ranger,” or
“clerk.” In death, the essence of a soul’s being on earth is seen as
marked by the love they felt for, and received from, their husbands,
wives, and children, or sometimes also by what military unit they served
with in time of war. These are all things which involve both intense
emotional commitment, and the giving and taking of life. While alive, in
contrast, the first question anyone was likely to have asked on meeting
any of those people was, “What do you do for a living?”

This continues to be the case. The fact that it does remains something
of a stubborn paradox because the “Gospel of Wealth” and subsequent rise
of consumerism was supposed to have changed all that. No longer were we
to think of ourselves as expressing our being through what we produced,
but rather, through what we consumed: what sorts of clothes we wear,
music we listen to, sports teams we follow. Especially since the
seventies, everyone has been expected to sort themselves out into tribal
subcultures as sci-fi geeks, dog lovers, paintball enthusiasts, stoners,
or supporters of the Chicago Bulls or Manchester United but definitely
not as longshoremen or Catastrophe Risk Analysts. And it is true that on
one level, most of us do prefer to think of ourselves as being defined
by anything other than our jobs.⁵¹ Yet somehow, paradoxically, people
regularly report that work is what gives the ultimate meaning to their
lives, and that unemployment has devastating psychological effects.

There have been an enormous number of surveys, studies, inquests, and
ethnographies of work over the course of the twentieth century. Work
about work has become a kind of minor industry in its own right. The
conclusions reached by this body of research—and what follows appears to
hold true, with only minor variations, for both blue- and white-collar
workers virtually anywhere in the world—might be summarized as follows:

1. Most people’s sense of dignity and self-worth is caught up in working
for a living.

2. Most people hate their jobs.

We might refer to this as “the paradox of modern work.” The entire
discipline of the sociology of work, not to mention industrial
relations, has largely been concerned with trying to understand how both
these things can be true at the same time. As two paragons of the field,
Al Gini and Terry Sullivan, put it in 1987:

In well over a hundred studies in the last twenty-five years, workers
have regularly depicted their jobs as physically exhausting, boring,
psychologically diminishing or personally humiliating and unimportant.

[But at the same time] they want to work because they are aware at some
level that work plays a crucial and perhaps unparalleled psychological
role in the formation of human character. Work is not just a course of
livelihood, it is also one of the most significant contributing factors
to an inner life . . . To be denied work is to be denied far more than
the things that work can buy; it is to be denied the ability to define
and respect one’s self.”⁵²

After many years of research on the topic, Gini finally came to the
conclusion that work was coming to be considered less and less a means
to an end—that is, a way of obtaining resources and experiences that
make it possible to pursue projects (as I’ve put it, values other than
the economic: family, politics, community, culture, religion)—and more
and more as an end in itself. Yet at the same time it was an end in
itself that most people found harmful, degrading, and oppressive.

How to reconcile these two observations? One way might be to return to
the arguments I made in chapter 3 and to acknowledge that human beings
essentially are a set of purposes, so that without any sense of purpose,
we would barely be said to exist at all. There is surely truth in this.
In some sense we are all in the situation of the inmate who prefers
working in the prison laundry to sitting in the cell watching TV all
day. But one possibility the sociologists generally overlook is that, if
work is a form of self-sacrifice or self-abnegation, then the very
awfulness of modern work is what makes it possible to see it as an end
in itself. We have returned to Carlyle: work should be painful, the
misery of the job is itself what “forms character.”

Workers, in other words, gain feelings of dignity and self-worth because
they hate their jobs.

This is the attitude that, as Clement observed, seems to remain in the
air all around us, implicit in office small-talk. “The pressure to value
ourselves and others on the basis of how hard we work at something we’d
rather not be doing . . . If you’re not destroying your mind and body
via paid work, you’re not living right.” It is, to be sure, more common
among middle-class office workers like Clement than among migrant farm
workers, parking lot attendants, or short-order chefs. But even in
working-class environments, the attitude can be observed through its
negation, since even those who do not feel they have to validate their
existence, on a day-to-day basis, by boasting how overworked they are
will nonetheless agree that those who avoid work entirely should
probably drop dead.

In America, stereotypes of the lazy and undeserving poor have long been
tied up in racism: generations of immigrants learned what it means to be
a “hardworking American” by being taught to despise the imagined
indiscipline of the descendants of slaves, just as Japanese workers were
taught to disdain Koreans, or English workers, Irish.⁵³ Nowadays
mainstream media is usually obliged to be more subtle, but there is an
endless drumbeat of vilification of the poor, the unemployed, and
especially those on public relief—and most people do seem to accept the
basic logic of the contemporary moralists: that society is besieged by
those who want something for nothing, that the poor are largely poor
because they lack the will and discipline to work, that only those who
do or have worked harder than they’d like to at something they would
rather not be doing, preferably under a harsh taskmaster, deserve
respect and consideration from their fellow citizens. As a result, the
sadomasochistic element in work described in chapter 4, rather than
being an ugly, if predictable, side effect to top-down chains of command
in the workplace, has actually become central to what validates work
itself. Suffering has become a badge of economic citizenship. It’s not
that much different than a home address. Without it, you have no right
to make any other claim.

We have come full circle, then, to the situation with which we began;
but at least now we can understand it in its full historical context.
Bullshit jobs proliferate today in large part because of the peculiar
nature of managerial feudalism that has come to dominate wealthy
economies—but to an increasing degree, all economies. They cause misery
because human happiness is always caught up in a sense of having effects
on the world; a feeling which most people, when they speak of their
work, express through a language of social value. Yet at the same time
they are aware that the greater the social value produced by a job, the
less one is likely to be paid to do it. Like Annie, they are faced with
the choice between doing useful and important work like taking care of
children but being effectively told that the gratification of helping
others should be its own reward, and it’s up to them to figure out how
to pay their bills, or accepting pointless and degrading work that
destroys their mind and body for no particular reason, other than a
widespread feeling that if one does not engage in labor that destroys
the mind and body, whether or not there is a reason to be doing it, one
does not deserve to live.

Perhaps we should leave the last word to Carlyle, who includes in his
celebration of work one chapter that consists entirely of a peculiar
diatribe against happiness. Here he was responding to the utilitarian
doctrines of men like Jeremy Bentham, who had proposed that human
pleasure could be precisely quantified, and therefore all morality
reduced to calculating what would provide “the greatest happiness for
the greatest number.”⁵⁴ Happiness, Carlyle objected, is an ignoble
concept. “The only happiness a brave man ever troubled himself with
asking much about was, happiness enough to get his work done. It is,
after all, the one unhappiness of a man that he cannot work, that he
cannot get his destiny as man fulfilled.”⁵⁵

Bentham and the Utilitarians, who saw no purpose of human life other
than the pursuit of pleasure, can be seen as the philosophical ancestors
of modern consumerism, which is still justified by an economic theory of
“utility.” But Carlyle’s perspective isn’t really the negation of
Bentham’s; or if it is, then only in the dialectical sense, where two
apparent opposites remain permanently at war with one another, their
advocates unaware that in their struggle, they constitute a higher unity
which would be impossible without both. The belief that what ultimately
motivates human beings has always been, and must always be, the pursuit
of wealth, power, comforts, and pleasure, has always and must always be
complemented by a doctrine of work as self-sacrifice, as valuable
precisely because it is the place of misery, sadism, emptiness, and
despair. As Carlyle put it:

“All work, even cotton-spinning, is noble; work is alone noble, be that
here said and asserted once more. And in like manner too, all dignity is
painful. A life of ease is not for any man . . . Our highest religion is
named the Worship of Sorrow. For the son of man there is no noble crown,
well worn or even ill worn, but there is a crown of thorns!”⁵⁶


Chapter 7


What Are the Political Effects of Bullshit Jobs, and Is There Anything That Can Be Done About This Situation?

I believe that this instinct to perpetuate useless work is, at bottom,
simply fear of the mob. The mob (the thought runs) are such low animals
that they would be dangerous if they had leisure; it is safer to keep
them too busy to think.

—George Orwell, Down and Out in Paris and London

If someone had designed a work regime perfectly suited to maintaining
the power of finance capital, it’s hard to see how they could have done
a better job. Real, productive workers are relentlessly squeezed and
exploited. The remainder are divided between a terrorized stratum of
the, universally reviled, unemployed and a larger stratum who are
basically paid to do nothing, in positions designed to make them
identify with the perspectives and sensibilities of the ruling class
(managers, administrators, etc.)—and particularly its financial
avatars—but, at the same time, foster a simmering resentment against
anyone whose work has clear and undeniable social value.

—from “On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs”

I would like to end this book with a few thoughts about the political
implications of the current work situation, and one suggestion about a
possible way out. What I have described over the last two chapters are
the economic forces driving the proliferation of bullshit jobs—what I’ve
called managerial feudalism—and the cosmology, the overall way of
imagining the place of human beings in the universe, that allows us to
put up with this arrangement. The more the economy becomes a matter of
the mere distribution of loot, the more inefficiency and unnecessary
chains of command actually make sense, since these are the forms of
organization best suited to soaking up as much of that loot as possible.
The less the value of work is seen to lie either in what it produces, or
the benefits it provides to others, the more work comes to be seen as
valuable primarily as a form of self-sacrifice, which means that
anything that makes that work less onerous or more enjoyable, even the
gratification of knowing that one’s work benefits others, is actually
seen to lower its value—and as a result, to justify lower levels of pay.

All this is genuinely perverse.

In a sense, those critics who claim we are not working a fifteen-hour
week because we have chosen consumerism over leisure are not entirely
off the mark. They just got the mechanisms wrong. We’re not working
harder because we’re spending all our time manufacturing PlayStations
and serving one another sushi. Industry is being increasingly robotized,
and the real service sector remains flat at roughly 20 percent of
overall employment. Instead, it is because we have invented a bizarre
sadomasochistic dialectic whereby we feel that pain in the workplace is
the only possible justification for our furtive consumer pleasures, and,
at the same time, the fact that our jobs thus come to eat up more and
more of our waking existence means that we do not have the luxury of—as
Kathi Weeks has so concisely put it—“a life,” and that, in turn, means
that furtive consumer pleasures are the only ones we have time to
afford. Sitting around in cafés all day arguing about politics or
gossiping about our friends’ complex polyamorous love affairs takes time
(all day, in fact); in contrast pumping iron or attending a yoga class
at the local gym, ordering out for Deliveroo, watching an episode of
Game of Thrones, or shopping for hand creams or consumer electronics can
all be placed in the kind of self-contained predictable time-slots one
is likely to have left over between spates of work, or else while
recovering from it. All these are examples of what I like to call
“compensatory consumerism.” They are the sorts of things you can do to
make up for the fact that you don’t have a life, or not very much of
one.

on how the political culture under managerial feudalism comes to be maintained by a balance of resentments

Now at the time of which I was speaking, as the voters were inscribing
their ostraka [to determine which politician would be expelled from the
city], it is said that an unlettered and utterly boorish fellow handed
his ostrakon to Aristides, whom he took to be one of the ordinary crowd,
and asked him to write Aristides on it. He, astonished, asked the man
what possible wrong Aristides had done him. “None whatever,” was the
answer, “I don’t even know the fellow, but I am tired of hearing him
everywhere called ‘The Just.’ ” On hearing this, Aristides made no
answer, but wrote his name on the ostrakon and handed it back.

—Plutarch, Life of Aristides the Just

No doubt I am overstating my case. People in consumer societies, even
those in bullshit jobs, do eke out some kind of a life—though one might
ask how viable such forms of life really are in the long term,
considering that the stratum of the population most likely to be trapped
in pointless employment would also appear to be the most likely to have
lives marked by episodes of clinical depression or other forms of mental
illness, not to mention, to fail to reproduce. At least, I suspect that
this is the case. Such suspicions could only be affirmed by empirical
research.

Even if none of this turned out to be the case, though, one thing is
inescapable: such work arrangements foster a political landscape rife
with hatred and resentment. Those struggling and without work resent the
employed. The employed are encouraged to resent the poor and unemployed,
who they are constantly told are scroungers and freeloaders. Those
trapped in bullshit jobs resent workers who get to do real productive or
beneficial labor, and those who do real productive or beneficial labor,
underpaid, degraded, and unappreciated, increasingly resent those who
they see as monopolizing those few jobs where one can live well while
doing something useful, high-minded, or glamorous—who they refer to as
“the liberal elite.” All are united in their loathing for the political
class, who they see (correctly) as corrupt, but the political class, in
turn, finds these other forms of vacuous hatred extremely convenient,
since they distract attention from themselves.

Some of these forms of resentment are familiar enough, and will be
instantly recognizable by the reader; others are less discussed, and
might seem at first puzzling. It’s easy to imagine how someone working
in a French tea factory might resent the flock of useless new middle
managers imposed on them (even before those middle managers decided to
fire them all). It’s not nearly so clear why those middle managers
should resent the factory workers. But often middle managers, and even
more, those managers’ administrative assistants, clearly do resent
factory workers, for the simple reason that the latter have legitimate
reason to take pride in their work. A key part of the justification of
underpaying such workers is simple envy.

Moral envy is an undertheorized phenomenon. I’m not sure that anyone has
ever written a book about it. Still, it’s clearly an important factor in
human affairs. By “moral envy,” I am referring here to feelings of envy
and resentment directed at another person, not because that person is
wealthy, or gifted, or lucky, but because his or her behavior is seen as
upholding a higher moral standard than the envier’s own. The basic
sentiment seems to be “How dare that person claim to be better than me
(by acting in a way that I do indeed acknowledge is better than me)?” I
remember first encountering this attitude in college, when a lefty
friend once told me that he no longer had any respect for a certain
famous activist since he had learned the activist in question kept an
expensive apartment in New York for his ex-wife and child. “What a
hypocrite!” he exclaimed. “He could have given that money to the poor!”
When I pointed out the activist in question gave almost all his money to
the poor, he was unmoved. When I pointed out the critic, while not
exactly poor himself, appeared to give nothing to charity, he was
offended. In fact I’m not sure he ever spoke to me again. I’ve run into
this attitude repeatedly ever since. Within a community of do-gooders,
anyone who exemplifies shared values in too exemplary a way is seen as a
threat; ostentatiously good behavior (“virtue signaling” is the new
catchword) is often perceived as a moral challenge; it doesn’t matter if
the person in question is entirely humble and unassuming—in fact, that
can even make it worse, since humility can be seen as itself a moral
challenge to those who secretly feel they aren’t humble enough.

Moral envy of this sort is rife in activist or religious communities;
what I would like to suggest here is that it is also, more subtly,
present in the politics surrounding work. Just as anger at immigrants
often involves the simultaneous accusation that newcomers work both too
much and too little, so does resentment against the poor focus
simultaneously on those who don’t work, since they are imagined to be
lazy, and those who do work, since (unless they’ve been dragooned into
some kind of work-fare) at least they don’t have bullshit jobs. Why, for
instance, have conservatives in the United States been so successful at
whipping up popular resentment against unionized hospital or
autoworkers? During the 2008 bailout of the financial industry, while
there was a public outcry against bankers’ million-dollar bonuses, no
actual sanctions followed; however, the consequent bailout of the auto
industry did involve sanctions: on assembly line workers. They were
widely denounced as coddled for having union contracts that allowed them
generous health and pension plans, vacations, and $28-per-hour wages,
and forced into massive give-backs. Those working in the financial
offices of the same companies who (insofar as they were not just sitting
around doing nothing at all) were the ones who had actually caused the
problems and were not expected to make similar sacrifices. As a local
paper recalled:

The bank bailout would be followed in February by a bailout of auto
companies. Here, it was assumed that thousands of jobs must be shed for
those companies to regain profitability. There had long been envy of
auto-workers’ job protection and health benefits; now they became a
scapegoat. As once-proud Michigan manufacturing cities all but shut
down, right-wing radio commentators asserted that workers—instrumental,
historically, through their labor struggles in obtaining seven-day work
weeks and forty-hour days for everyone—were getting their just
desserts.¹

One reason American autoworkers had such relatively generous plans,
compared with other blue-collar workers, was first and foremost because
they played such an essential role in creating something their fellow
citizens actually needed, and what’s more, something recognized as
culturally important (indeed, central to their sense of themselves as
Americans).² It’s hard to escape the impression that this was precisely
what others resented about them. “They get to make cars! Shouldn’t that
be enough for them? I have to sit around filling out stupid forms all
day, and these bastards want to rub it in by threatening to go on strike
to demand a dental plan, or two weeks off to take their kids to see the
Grand Canyon or the Colosseum, on top of that?”

It’s quite the same with the otherwise inexplicable drum-beat of
animosity directed, in the United States, against primary and secondary
school teachers. Schoolteachers, of course, are the very definition of
those who chose a socially important and high-minded vocation in the
full knowledge that it would involve low pay and stressful conditions.
One becomes a teacher because one wants to have a positive impact on
others’ lives. (As a New York subway recruiting ad used to say, “No one
ever called someone up twenty years later to thank them for being such
an aspiring insurance claims adjuster.”) Yet again, this seems to be
what makes them fair game in the eyes of all those who denounce them as
spoiled, entitled, overpaid spouters of secular humanist
anti-Americanism. Granted, one can understand why Republican activists
target teachers’ unions. Teachers’ unions are one of the mainstays of
support for the Democratic Party. But teachers’ unions include both
teachers and school administrators, the latter being those actually
responsible for most of the policies most Republican activists object
to. So why not focus on them? It would have been much easier for them to
make a case that the school administrators are overpaid parasites than
that teachers are coddled and spoiled. As Eli Horowitz noted:

What’s remarkable about this is that Republicans and other conservatives
actually did complain about school administrators—but then they stopped.
For whatever reason, those voices (which were few and quiet to begin
with) dwindled to nonexistence almost as soon as the conversation began.
In the end, the teachers themselves turned out to be the more valid
political targets, even though they do the more valuable work.³

Again, I think this can only be put down to moral envy. Teachers are
seen as people who have ostentatiously put themselves forward as
self-sacrificing and public-spirited, as wanting to be the sort of
person who gets a call twenty years later saying “Thank you, thank you
for all you did for me.” For people like that to form unions, threaten
strikes, and demand better working conditions is considered almost
hypocritical.

•  •  •

There is one major exception to the rule that anyone pursuing a useful
or high-minded line of work, but who also expects comfortable levels of
pay and benefits, is a legitimate target of resentment. The rule does
not apply to soldiers, or anyone else who works directly for the
military. To the contrary, soldiers must never be resented. They are
above critique.

I’ve written about this curious exception before, but it might be
helpful to recall the argument very briefly, because I think it’s
impossible to really understand right-wing populism without it.⁴ Let me
again take the case of America because it’s the one I’m most familiar
with (though I’m assured the argument, in its broad outlines, does apply
anywhere from Brazil to Japan). For right-wing populists, in particular,
military personnel are the ultimate good guys. One must “support the
troops”; this is an absolute injunction; anyone who would compromise on
it in any way is a traitor pure and simple. The ultimate bad guys in
contrast are the intelligentsia. Most working-class conservatives, for
instance, don’t have much use for corporate executives, but they usually
don’t feel especially passionate about their dislike for them. Their
true hatred is directed at the “liberal elite” (this divides into
various branches: the “Hollywood elite,” the “journalistic elite,”
“university elite,” “fancy lawyers,” or “the medical
establishment”)—that is, the sort of people who live in big coastal
cities, watch public television or public radio, or even more, who might
be involved in producing or appearing in same. It seems to me there are
two perceptions that lie behind this resentment: (1) the perception that
members of this elite see ordinary working people as a bunch of
knuckle-dragging cavemen, and (2) the perception that these elites
constitute an increasingly closed caste; one which the children of the
working class would actually have far more difficulty breaking into than
the class of actual capitalists.

It also seems to me that both these perceptions are largely accurate.
The first is pretty much self-evidently true if reactions to the 2016
election of Donald Trump are anything to go by. The white working class
in particular is the one identity group in America toward which
statements that might otherwise be immediately denounced as bigoted (for
instance, that a certain class of people are ugly, violent, or stupid)
are accepted without remark in polite society. The second is also true
if you really think about it. We might again look to Hollywood for an
illustration. Back in the thirties and forties, even the name
“Hollywood” would tend to evoke images of magical social advance:
Hollywood was a place where a simple farm girl could go to the big city,
be discovered, find herself a star. For present purposes, it doesn’t
really matter how often this actually happened (it clearly did now and
then); the point is at the time, Americans did not see the fable as
inherently implausible. Look at a list of the lead actors of a major
motion picture nowadays and you are likely to find barely a single one
that can’t boast at least two generations of Hollywood actors, writers,
producers, and directors in their family tree. The film industry has
come to be dominated by an in-marrying caste. Is it surprising, then,
that Hollywood celebrities’ pretensions to egalitarian politics tend to
ring a bit hollow in the ears of most working-class Americans? Neither
is Hollywood in any way an exception in this regard. If anything it’s
emblematic of what has happened to all the liberal professions (if,
perhaps, a trifle more advanced).

Conservative voters, I would suggest, tend to resent intellectuals more
than they resent rich people, because they can imagine a scenario in
which they or their children might become rich, but cannot possibly
imagine one in which they could ever become a member of the cultural
elite. If you think about it that’s not an unreasonable assessment. A
truck driver’s daughter from Nebraska might not have very much chance of
becoming a millionaire—America now has the lowest social mobility in the
developed world—but it could happen. There’s virtually no way that same
daughter will ever become an international human rights lawyer, or drama
critic for the New York Times. Even if she could get into the right
schools, there would certainly be no possible way for her to then go on
to live in New York or San Francisco for the requisite years of unpaid
internships.⁵ Even if the son of glazier got a toehold in a
well-positioned bullshit job, he would likely, like Eric, be unable or
unwilling to transform it into a platform for the obligatory networking.
There are a thousand invisible barriers.

If we return to the opposition of “value” versus “values” laid out in
the last chapter, we might put it this way: if you just want to make a
lot of money, there might be a way to do it; on the other hand, if your
aim is to pursue any other sort of value—whether that be truth
(journalism, academia), beauty (the art world, publishing), justice
(activism, human rights), charity, and so forth—and you actually want to
be paid a living wage for it, then if you do not possess a certain
degree of family wealth, social networks, and cultural capital, there’s
simply no way in. The “liberal elite,” then, are those who have placed
an effective lock on any position where it’s possible to get paid to do
anything that one might do for any reason other than the money. They are
seen as trying, and largely succeeding, in constituting themselves as a
new American nobility—in the same sense as the Hollywood aristocracy,
monopolizing the hereditary right to all those jobs where one can live
well, and still feel one is serving some higher purpose—which is to say,
feel noble.

In the United States, of course, all this is very much complicated by
the country’s legacy of slavery and inveterate racism. It’s largely the
white working class that expresses class resentment by focusing on
intellectuals; African Americans, migrants, and the children of migrants
tend to reject anti-intellectual politics, and still see the educational
system as the most likely means of social advancement for their
children. This makes it easier for poor whites to see them as unfairly
in alliance with rich white liberals.

But what does all this have to do with supporting the troops? Well if
that truck driver’s daughter was absolutely determined to find a job
that would allow her to pursue something unselfish and high-minded, but
still paid the rent and guaranteed access to adequate dental care, what
options does she really have? If she’s of a religious temperament there
might be some possibility in her local church. But such jobs are hard to
come by. Mainly, she can join the army.

The reality of the situation first came home to me over a decade ago
when attending a lecture by Catherine Lutz, an anthropologist who has
been carrying out a project studying the archipelago of US overseas
military bases. She made the fascinating observation that almost all of
these bases organize outreach programs, in which soldiers venture out to
repair schoolrooms or to perform free dental checkups in nearby towns
and villages. The ostensible reason for the programs was to improve
relations with local communities, but they rarely have much impact in
that regard; still, even after the military discovered this, they kept
the programs up because they had such an enormous psychological impact
on the soldiers, many of whom would wax euphoric when describing them:
for example, “This is why I joined the army,” “This is what military
service is really all about—not just defending your country, it’s about
helping people!” Soldiers allowed to perform public service duties, they
found, were two or three times more likely to reenlist. I remember
thinking, “Wait, so most of these people really want to be in the Peace
Corps?” And I duly looked it up and discovered: sure enough, to be
accepted into the Peace Corps, you need to already have a college
degree. The US military is a haven for frustrated altruists.

•  •  •

A case could be made that the great historical difference between what
we call the Left and the Right largely turns on the relation between
“value” and “values.” The Left has always been about trying to collapse
the gulf between the domain dominated by pure self-interest and the
domain traditionally dominated by high-minded principles; the Right has
always been about prising them even farther apart, and then claiming
ownership of both. They stand for both greed and charity. Hence, the
otherwise inexplicable alliance in the Republican Party between the free
market libertarians and the “values voters” of the Christian Right. What
this comes down to in practice has usually been the political equivalent
of a strategy of good-cop-bad-cop: first unleash the chaos of the market
to destabilize lives and all existing verities alike; then, offer
yourself up as the last bastion of the authority of church and
fatherhood against the barbarians they have themselves unleashed.

By juxtaposing the call to “support the troops” with condemnations of
the “liberal elite” the Right is effectively calling out the Left as
hypocrites. They’re saying, “Sixties campus radicals claimed they were
trying to create a new society in which everyone could be happy
idealists living in material prosperity, where under Communism the
distinction between value and values would be annihilated and all would
work for the common good—but all they really ended up doing was to
guarantee any jobs which allow one to feel like one is doing that are
set aside exclusively for their own spoiled children.”

This has some very important implications for the nature of the
societies we live in. One thing it suggests about capitalism more
generally, is that societies based on greed, even that say that human
beings are inherently selfish and greedy and that attempt to valorize
this sort of behavior, don’t really believe it, and secretly dangle out
the right to behave altruistically as a reward for playing along. Only
those who can prove their mettle at selfishness are to be afforded the
right to be selfless. Or, that’s how the game is supposed to work. If
you suffer and scheme and by doing so manage to accumulate enough
economic value, then you are allowed to cash in and turn your millions
into something unique, higher, intangible, or beautiful—that is, turn
value into values. You assemble a collection of Rembrandts, or classic
racing cars. Or you set up a foundation and devote the rest of your life
to charity. To skip straight to the end is obviously cheating.

We are back to Abraham Lincoln’s version of medieval life-cycle service,
with the proviso that now, the overwhelming majority of us can only
expect to experience anything like full adulthood on retirement, if at
all.

Soldiers are the one legitimate exception because they “serve” their
country; and—I suspect—because usually, they don’t get much out of it in
the long run. This would explain why right-wing populists, so
unconditional in their support for the troops during their term of
service, seem so strangely indifferent to the fact that a large
percentage of them end up spending the rest of their lives homeless,
jobless, impoverished, addicted, or begging with no legs. A poor kid
might tell himself he’s joining the Marines for the educational and
career opportunities; but everyone knows that’s at best a crapshoot.
Such is the nature of his sacrifice; hence, of his true nobility.

All the other objects of resentment I’ve mentioned so far can be seen as
ostentatious violations of the principle of inverse relation of
compensation and social benefit. Unionized autoworkers and teachers
perform a vitally necessary function, yet have the temerity to demand
middle-class lifestyles. They are objects of a special ire, I suspect,
by those trapped in soul-destroying low- and middle-level bullshit jobs.
Members of the “liberal elite” of the Bill Maher or Angelina Jolie
variety are seen as having skipped to the front of every line they’ve
ever been asked to stand on, so as to be able to monopolize the few jobs
that do exist that are simultaneously fun, well paid, and make a
difference in the world—while at the same time, presuming to represent
themselves as the voice of social justice. They are the particular
objects of resentment of the working class, whose painful, difficult,
body-destroying, but equally socially useful labor never seems to strike
such paragons of liberalism as of much interest or importance. At the
same time, that indifference would seem to overlap with the outright
envious hostility of those members of the “liberal classes” trapped in
higher-order bullshit jobs, toward those same working classes for their
ability to make an honest living.

how the current crisis over robotization relates to the larger problem of bullshit jobs

Puritanism: the haunting fear that someone, somewhere, may be happy.

—H. L. Mencken

A crisscrossing of resentments increasingly defines the politics of
wealthy countries. This is a disastrous state of affairs.

It seems to me all this makes the old leftist question—“every day we
wake up and collectively make a world together; but which one of us,
left to our own devices, would ever decide they wanted to make a world
like this one?”—more relevant than ever. In many respects, the
science-fiction fantasies of the early twentieth century have become
possible. We can’t teleport or place colonies on Mars, it’s true, but we
could easily rearrange matters in such a way that pretty much everyone
on earth lived lives of relative ease and comfort. In material terms
this would not be very difficult. While the pace at which scientific
revolutions and technological breakthroughs occur has slowed
considerably since the heady pace the world came to be familiar with
from roughly 1750 to 1950, improvements in robotics continue, largely
because they are a matter of improved application of existing
technological knowledge. Combined with advances in materials science,
they are ushering in an age where a very large proportion of the most
dreary and tiresome mechanical tasks can indeed be eliminated. What this
means is that work, as we know it, will less and less resemble what we
think of as “productive” labor, and more and more resemble “caring”
labor—since, after all, caring consists mainly of the sorts of things
most of us would least like to see done by a machine.⁶

There has been a lot of scare literature of late about the perils of
mechanization. Most of it follows along the lines that Kurt Vonnegut had
already developed in his very first novel, Player Piano, in 1952: with
most forms of manual labor eliminated, society, these critics warn, will
necessarily divide into two classes, a wealthy elite who own and design
the robots, and a haggard and disconsolate former working class who
spend their days shooting pool and drinking because they have nothing
else to do. (The middle class would split between them.) This obviously
not only completely ignored the caring aspects of real labor, it also
assumed property relations were unalterable, and that human beings—at
least, those who were not, say, science-fiction writers—were so
completely unimaginative that even with unlimited free time, they would
be unable to come up with anything particularly interesting to do.⁷ The
1960s counterculture challenged the second and third assumptions (though
not so much the first one), with many sixties revolutionaries embracing
the slogan “Let the machines do all the work!” This in turn led to a
renewed backlash of moralizing about work as a value in itself of the
sort we’ve already encountered in chapter 6—at the same time as an
export of many factory jobs to poor countries where labor was cheap
enough it could still be performed by human beings. It was in the wake
of this reaction to the sixties counterculture, in the seventies and
eighties, that the first wave of managerial feudalism, and the extreme
bullshitization of employment, began to make itself felt.

The latest wave of robotization has caused the same moral crises and
moral panics as the sixties. The only real difference is that, since any
significant change in economic models, let alone property regimes, is
now treated as definitively off of the table, it’s simply assumed the
only possible result will be to convey even more wealth and power to the
1 percent. Martin Ford’s recent The Rise of the Robots, for example,
documents how, after making most blue-collar workers redundant, Silicon
Valley is in the process of taking aim at health care, education, and
the liberal professions as well. The likely outcome, he predicts, is
“techno-feudalism.” Throwing workers out of work, or impoverishing them
by forcing them to compete with machines, will be deeply problematic, he
argues: particularly since, without paychecks, how exactly is anyone
going to afford all the shiny toys and efficient services the robots
will provide? This may be a cruelly simplified summary, but it helps to
underline what I think to be missing from such accounts—that predictions
of robots replacing humans always go just so far, and then stop. It’s
possible for futurologists to imagine robots replacing sports editors,
sociologists, or real estate agents, for example, yet I have yet to see
one suggest that the basic functions that capitalists are supposed to
perform, which mainly consist of figuring out the optimal way to invest
resources in order to answer current or potential future consumer
demand, could possibly be performed by a machine. Why not? One could
easily make a case that the main reason the Soviet economy worked so
badly was because they never were able to develop computer technology
efficient enough to coordinate such large amounts of data automatically.
But the Soviet Union only made it to the 1980s. Now it would be easy.
Yet no one dares suggest this. The famous Oxford study by engineer
Michael Osborne and economist Carl Frey, which sizes up 702 different
professions in terms of their susceptibility for being replaced by
robots,⁸ for instance, considers hydrologists, makeup artists, and
travel guides, but makes no mention whatsoever of the possibility of
automated entrepreneurs, investors, or financiers.

At this point, my own instinct is to turn for inspiration from Vonnegut
to a different science-fiction writer, Stanislaw Lem, whose space
voyager Ijon Tichy describes a visit to a planet inhabited by a species
to which the author gives the rather unsubtle name of Phools. At the
time of his arrival the Phools were experiencing a classic Marxian
overproduction crisis. Traditionally, they had been divided into
Spiritors (Priests), Eminents (Aristocrats), and Drudgelings (Workers).
As one helpful native explained:

“Through the ages inventors built machines that simplified work, and
where in ancient times a hundred Drudgelings had bent their sweating
backs, centuries later a few stood by a machine. Our scientists improved
the machines, and the people rejoiced at this, but subsequent events
show how cruelly premature was that rejoicing.”

The factories, ultimately, became a little too efficient, and one day an
engineer created machines that could operate with no supervision at all:

“When the New Machines appeared in the factories, hordes of Drudgelings
lost their jobs; and, receiving no salary, they faced starvation.”

“Excuse me, Phool,” I asked, “but what became of the profits the
factories made?”

“The profits,” he replied, “went to the rightful owners, of course. Now,
then, as I was saying, the threat of annihilation hung—”

“But what are you saying, worthy Phool!” I cried. “All that had to be
done was to make the factories common property, and the New Machines
would have become a blessing to you!”

The minute I say this the Phool trembled, blinked his ten eyes
nervously, and cupped his ears to ascertain whether any of his
companions milling about the stairs had overheard my remark.

“By the Ten Noses of the Phoo, I implore you, O stranger, do not utter
such vile heresy, which attacks the very foundations of our freedom! Our
supreme law, the principle of Civic Initiative, states that no one can
be compelled, constrained, or even coaxed to do what he does not wish.
Who, then, would dare expropriate the Eminents’ factories, it being
their will to enjoy possession of same? That would be the most horrible
violation of liberty imaginable. Now, then, to continue, the New
Machines produced an abundance of extremely cheap goods and excellent
food, but the Drudgelings bought nothing, for they had not the
wherewithal—”⁹

Before long, the Drudgelings, though—as Tichy’s interlocutor insisted,
entirely free to do what they wanted provided they did not interfere in
anyone else’s property rights—were dropping like flies. Much heated
debate ensued, and a succession of failed half measures. The Phools’
high council, the Plenum Moronicum, attempted to replace the Drudgelings
as consumers as well, by creating robots that would eat, use, and enjoy
all the products the New Machines produced far more intensely than any
living being could possibly do, while also materializing money to pay
for it. But this was unsatisfying. Finally, realizing a system where
both production and consumption were being done by machines was rather
pointless, they concluded the best solution would be for the entire
population to render itself—entirely voluntarily—to the factories to be
converted into beautiful shiny disks and arranged in pleasant patterns
across the landscape.

This might seem heavy-handed,¹⁰ but sometimes, I think, a dose of
heavy-handed Marxism is exactly what we need. Lem is right. It’s hard to
imagine a surer sign that one is dealing with an irrational economic
system than the fact that the prospect of eliminating drudgery is
considered to be a problem.

Star Trek solved the problem with replicators, and young radicals here
in the United Kingdom sometimes talk about a future of “fully automated
luxury communism,” which is basically the same thing. A case could
easily be made that any future robots and replicators should be the
common property of humanity as a whole, since they would be the fruit of
a collective mechanical intelligence that goes back centuries, in much
the same way as a national culture is the creation of, and thus belongs
to, everyone. Automated public factories would make life easier. Still,
they wouldn’t actually eliminate the need for Drudgelings. Lem’s story,
and others like it, still assume that “work” means factory work, or,
anyway, “productive” work, and ignore what most working-class jobs
actually consist of—for instance, the fact noted in the last chapter,
that workers in “ticket offices” in the London Underground aren’t there
to take tickets but to find lost children and talk down drunks. Not only
are robots that could perform such functions very far away, but even if
they did exist, most of us would not want such tasks performed in the
way a robot would perform them anyway.

So the more automation proceeds, the more it should be obvious that
actual value emerges from the caring element of work. Yet this leads to
another problem. The caring value of work would appear to be precisely
that element in labor that cannot be quantified.

Much of the bullshitization of real jobs, I would say, and much of the
reason for the expansion of the bullshit sector more generally, is a
direct result of the desire to quantify the unquantifiable. To put it
bluntly, automation makes certain tasks more efficient, but at the same
time, it makes other tasks less efficient. This is because it requires
enormous amounts of human labor to render the processes, tasks, and
outcomes that surround anything of caring value into a form that
computers can even recognize. It is now possible to build a robot that
can, all by itself, sort a pile of fresh fruits or vegetables into ripe,
raw, and rotten. This is a good thing because sorting fruit, especially
for more than an hour or two, is boring. It is not possible to build a
robot that can, all by itself, scan over a dozen history course reading
lists and decide which is the best course. This isn’t such a bad thing,
either, because such work is interesting (or at least, it’s not hard to
locate people who would find it so). One reason to have robots sorting
fruit is so that real human beings can have more time to think about
what history course they’d prefer to take, or some equally
unquantifiable thing like who’s their favorite funk guitarist or what
color they’d like to dye their hair. However—and here’s the catch—if we
did for some reason wish to pretend that a computer could decide which
is the best history course, say, because we decided we need to have
uniform, quantifiable, “quality” standards to apply across the
university for funding purposes, there’s no way that computer could do
the task by itself. The fruit you can just roll into a bin. In the case
of the history course, it requires enormous human effort to render the
material into units that a computer would even begin to know what to do
with.

To get even the most minimal sense of what happens when you try,
consider the following diagrams, which illustrate the difference between
what’s required to print an exam, or upload a syllabus, in Queensland, a
contemporary managerial university in Australia (where all course
materials have to be in a uniform format), as compared with a
traditional academic department (see figures 8.1–8.4).

Figure 8.1 Creation of Course Profile/Syllabus (Managerial)

[Image]

Figure 8.2 Creation of Course Profile/Syllabus (Non-Managerial)

[Image]

Figure 8.3 Creation of Exam (Managerial)

[Image]

Figure 8.4 Creation of Exam (Non-Managerial)

[Image]

The critical thing about this diagram is that each of those additional
lines represents an action that has to be performed, not by a computer,
but by an actual human being.

on the political ramifications of bullshitization and consequent decline of productivity in the caring sector as it relates to the possibility of a revolt of the caring classes

Since at least the Great Depression, we’ve been hearing warnings that
automation was or was about to be throwing millions out of work—Keynes
at the time coined the term “technological unemployment,” and many
assumed the mass unemployment of the 1930s was just a sign of things to
come—and while this might make it seem such claims have always been
somewhat alarmist, what this book suggests is that the opposite was the
case. They were entirely accurate. Automation did, in fact, lead to mass
unemployment. We have simply stopped the gap by adding dummy jobs that
are effectively made up. A combination of political pressure from both
right and left, a deeply held popular feeling that paid employment alone
can make one a full moral person, and finally, a fear on the part of the
upper classes, already noted by George Orwell in 1933, of what the
laboring masses might get up to if they had too much leisure on their
hands, has ensured that whatever the underlying reality, when it comes
to official unemployment figures in wealthy countries, the needle should
never jump too far from the range of 3 to 8 percent. But if one
eliminates bullshit jobs from the picture, and the real jobs that only
exist to support them, one could say that the catastrophe predicted in
the 1930s really did happen. Upward of 50 percent to 60 percent of the
population has, in fact, been thrown out of work.

Except of course, there’s absolutely no reason it should have been a
catastrophe. Over the course of the last several thousand years there
have been untold thousands of human groups that might be referred to as
“societies,” and the overwhelming majority of them managed to figure out
ways to distribute those tasks that needed to be done to keep them alive
in the style to which they were accustomed in such a fashion that most
everyone had some way to contribute, and no one had to spend the
majority of their waking hours performing tasks they would rather not be
doing, in the way that people do today.¹¹ What’s more, faced with the
“problem” of abundant leisure time, people in those societies seem to
have had little trouble figuring out ways to entertain themselves or
otherwise pass the time.¹² From the perspective of anyone born in one of
those past societies, we’d probably look just as irrational as the
Phools to Ijon Tichy.

The reason the current allocation of labor looks the way it does, then,
has nothing to do with economics or even human nature. It’s ultimately
political. There was no reason we had to try to quantify the value of
caring labor. There is no real reason we have to continue to do so. We
could stop. But before we launch a campaign to reconstitute work and how
we value it, I think we would do well to once again consider carefully
the political forces at play.

•  •  •

One way to think about what’s happened is to return to the opposition
between “value” and “values,” through which perspective, of course, what
we are seeing is an attempt to force one to submit to the logic of the
other.

Before the industrial revolution, most people worked at home. It’s only
since perhaps 1750 or even 1800 that it’s made any sense to talk about
society as we typically do today, as if it were made up of a collection
of factories and offices (“workplaces”) on the one hand, and a
collection of homes, schools, churches, waterparks, and the like on the
other—presumably, with a giant shopping mall placed somewhere in
between. If work is the domain of “production” then home is the domain
of “consumption,” which is also, of course, the domain of “values”
(which means that what work people do engage in, in this domain, they
largely do for free). But you could also flip the whole thing around and
look at society from the opposite point of view. From the perspective of
business, yes, homes and schools are just the places we produce and
raise and train a capable workforce, but from a human perspective,
that’s about as crazy as building a million robots to consume the food
that people can no longer afford to eat, or warning African countries
(as the World Bank has occasionally been known to do) that they need to
do more to control HIV because if everyone is dead it will have adverse
effects on the economy. As Karl Marx once pointed out: prior to the
industrial revolution, it never seems to have occurred to anyone to
write a book asking what conditions would create the most overall
wealth. Many, however, wrote books about what conditions would create
the best people—that is, how should society be best arranged to produce
the sort of human beings one would like to have around, as friends,
lovers, neighbors, relatives, or fellow citizens? This is the kind of
question that concerned Aristotle, Confucius, and Ibn Khaldun, and in
the final analysis it’s still the only really important one. Human life
is a process by which we, as humans, create one another; even the most
extreme individualists only become individuals through the care and
support of their fellows; and “the economy” is ultimately just the way
we provide ourselves with the necessary material provisions with which
to do so.

If so, talking about “values”—which are valuable because they can’t be
reduced to numbers—is the way that we have traditionally talked about
the process of mutual creation and caring.¹³

Now, clearly, if we assume this to be true, then the domain of value has
been systematically invading the domain of values for at least the last
fifty years, and it’s hardly surprising that political arguments have
come to take the form they do. For instance, in many major American
cities, the largest employers are now universities and hospitals. The
economy of such cities, then, centers on a vast apparatus of production
and maintenance of human beings—divided, in good Cartesian fashion,
between educational institutions designed to shape the mind, and medical
institutions designed to maintain the body. (In other cities such as New
York, universities and hospitals come in second and third as employers,
the biggest employers being banks. I’ll get back to banks in a moment.)
Where once left-wing political parties at least claimed to represent
factory workers, nowadays, all such pretense has been discarded, and
they have come to be dominated by the professional-managerial classes
that run institutions like schools and hospitals. Right-wing populism
has taken systematic aim at the authority of those institutions in the
name of a different set of religious or patriarchal “values”—for
instance, challenging the authority of universities by rejecting climate
science or evolution, or challenging the authority of the medical system
by campaigns against contraception or abortion. Or it has dabbled in
impossible fantasies about returning to the Industrial Age (Trump). But
really this is something of a bitter-ender game. Realistically, the
likelihood of right populists in America wresting control of the
apparatus of human production from the corporate Left is about as great
as the likelihood of a Socialist party taking power in America and
collectivizing heavy industry. For the moment, it would appear to be a
stand-off. The mainstream Left largely controls the production of
humans. The mainstream Right largely controls the production of things.

It’s in this context that the financialization and bullshitization of
both the corporate sector, and particularly the caring sector, are
taking place—leading to ever-higher social costs, even at the same time
as those who are doing the actual frontline caring are finding
themselves increasingly squeezed. Everything seems to be in place for a
revolt of the caring classes. Why has none yet taken place?

Well, one obvious reason is the way that right-wing populism and
divide-and-conquer racism have placed many of the caring classes in
opposite camps. But on top of that, there’s the even stickier problem
that in many areas of dispute, both sides are supposed to be in the
“same” political camp. This is where banks come in. The entanglement of
banks, universities, and hospitals has become truly insidious. Finance
works its way into everything, from car loans to credit cards, but it’s
significant that the principal cause of bankruptcy in America is medical
debt, and the principal force drawing young people into bullshit jobs is
the need to pay student loans. Yet since Clinton in the United States
and Blair in the United Kingdom, it’s been the ostensibly left parties
that have most embraced the rule of finance, received the largest
contributions from the financial sector, and worked the most closely
with financial lobbyists to “reform” the laws to make all this
possible.¹⁴ It was exactly at the same time that these same parties
self-consciously rejected any remaining elements of their old
working-class constituencies, and instead became, as Tom Frank has so
effectively demonstrated, the parties of the professional-managerial
class: that is, not just doctors and lawyers, but the administrators and
managers actually responsible for the bullshitization of the caring
sectors of the economy.¹⁵ If nurses were to rebel against the fact that
they have to spend the bulk of their shifts doing paperwork, they would
have to rebel against their own union leaders, who are firmly allied
with the Clintonite Democratic Party, whose core support comes from the
hospital administrators responsible for imposing the paperwork on them
to begin with. If teachers were to rebel they’d have to rebel against
school administrators who are actually represented, in many cases, by
the exact same union. If they protest too loudly, they will simply be
told they have no choice but to accept bullshitization, because the only
alternative is to surrender to the racist barbarians of the populist
Right.

I have myself smashed my head against this dilemma repeatedly. Back in
2006, when I was being kicked out of Yale for my support of grad
students engaged in a teacher unionization drive (the Anthropology
Department had to get special permission to change the reappointment
rules for my case, and my case only, in order to get rid of me), union
strategists considered a campaign on my behalf on MoveOn.org and similar
left liberal mailing lists—until reminded that the Yale administrators
behind my dismissal were probably active on those lists themselves.
Years later, with Occupy Wall Street, which might be considered the
first great rising of the caring classes, I watched those same
“progressive” professional-managerials first attempt to co-opt the
movement for the Democratic Party, then, when that proved impossible,
sit idly by or even collude while a peaceful movement was suppressed by
military force.

on universal basic income as an example of a program that might begin to detach work from compensation and put an end to the dilemmas described in this book

I don’t usually like putting policy recommendations in my books. One
reason for this is that it has been my experience that if an author is
critical of existing social arrangements, reviewers will often respond
by effectively asking “so what are you proposing to do about it, then?”
search the text until they find something that looks like a policy
suggestion, and then act as if that is what the book is basically about.
So if I were to suggest that a mass reduction of working hours or a
policy of universal basic income might go far in solving the problems
described here, the likely response will be to see this as a book about
reducing working hours or about universal basic income, and to treat it
as if it stands and falls on the workability of that policy—or even, the
ease by which it could be implemented.

That would be deceptive. This is not a book about a particular solution.
It’s a book about a problem—one that most people don’t even acknowledge
exists.

Another reason I hesitate to make policy suggestions is that I am
suspicious of the very idea of policy. Policy implies the existence of
an elite group—government officials, typically—that gets to decide on
something (“a policy”) that they then arrange to be imposed on everybody
else. There’s a little mental trick we often play on ourselves when
discussing such matters. We say, for instance, “What are we going to do
about the problem of X?” as if “we” were society as a whole, somehow
acting on ourselves, but, in fact, unless we happen to be part of that
roughly 3 percent to 5 percent of the population whose views actually do
affect policy makers, this is all a game of make-believe; we are
identifying with our rulers when, in fact, we’re the ones being ruled.
This is what happens when we watch a politician on television say “What
shall we do about the less fortunate?” even though at least half of us
would almost certainly fit that category ourselves. Myself, I find such
games particularly pernicious because I’d prefer not to have policy
elites around at all. I’m personally an anarchist, which means that, not
only do I look forward to a day sometime in the future when governments,
corporations, and the rest will be looked at as historical curiosities
in the same way as we now look at the Spanish Inquisition or nomadic
invasions, but I prefer solutions to immediate problems that do not give
more power to governments or corporations, but rather, give people the
means to manage their own affairs.

It follows that when faced with a social problem my impulse is not to
imagine myself in charge, and ponder what sort of solutions I would then
impose, but to look for a movement already out there, already trying to
address the problem and create its own solutions. The problem of
bullshit jobs, though presents unusual challenges in this regard. There
are no anti–bullshit job movements. This is partly because most people
don’t acknowledge the proliferation of bullshit jobs to be a problem,
but also because even if they did, it would be difficult to organize a
movement around such a problem. What local initiatives might such a
movement propose? One could imagine unions or other worker organizations
launching anti-bullshit initiatives in their own workplaces, or even
across specific industries—but they would presumably call for the
de-bullshitization of real work rather than firing people in unnecessary
positions. It’s not at all clear what a broader campaign against
bullshit jobs would even look like. One might try to shorten the working
week and hope things would sort themselves out in response. But it seems
unlikely that they would. Even a successful campaign for a fifteen-hour
week would be unlikely to cause the unnecessary jobs and industries to
be spontaneously abandoned; at the same time, calling for a new
government bureaucracy to assess the usefulness of jobs would inevitably
itself turn into a vast generator of bullshit.

So would a guaranteed jobs program.

I’ve only been able to identify one solution currently being promoted by
social movements, that would reduce rather than increase the size and
intrusiveness of government. That’s Universal Basic Income.

Let me end with a final testimony, from an activist friend whose
political purpose in life is to render her own bullshit job unnecessary,
and one of her fellow activists. Leslie is a Benefits Advisor in the
United Kingdom, that is, she works for an NGO whose purpose is to guide
citizens through the elaborate obstacle course successive governments
have set up to make it as difficult as possible for those out of work,
or otherwise in material need, to get access to the money the government
claims it has set apart for them. Here is the testimony she sent in:

Leslie: My job shouldn’t be necessary, but it is, because of the whole
long train of bullshit jobs invented to keep people who need money from
having it. As if claiming any kind of benefit were not Kafkaesque,
intrusive and humiliating enough, they also make it incredibly
complicated. Even when someone is entitled to something, the process of
applying is so complex most need help to understand the questions and
their own rights.

Leslie has had to deal for years with the insanity that ensues when one
tries to reduce human caring to a format that can be recognized by
computers—let alone computers designed to keep caring precisely limited.
As a result she ends up in much the same position as Tania in chapter 2,
who had to spend hours rewriting job applicants’ CVs and coaching them
on which keywords to use to “make it past the computer”:

Leslie: There are now certain words which have to be used on the forms,
I call it the catechism, which if not used can result in a failed
claim—but these are only known by those like myself who have had
training and access to the handbooks. And even then, especially for
disability claims, the claimant often ends up having to fight through to
a tribunal to get their entitlement recognized. I do get a little thrill
every time we win through for someone. But this doesn’t make up for the
anger I feel about the colossal waste of everyone’s time this is. For
the claimant, for me, for the various bods at the DWP [Department of
Works and Pensions] who deal with the claim, for the judges at the
tribunals, the experts called in to support either side. Isn’t there
something more constructive we could all be doing, like, I don’t know,
installing solar panels or gardening? I also often wonder about whoever
made up these rules. How much did they get paid for it? How long did it
take them? How many people were involved? To their minds I guess they
were ensuring that the noneligible don’t get money . . . And then I
think of visiting aliens laughing at us, humans inventing rules to
prevent other humans from getting access to tokens of a human concept,
money—which is by its nature not scarce.

On top of all that, since she is a do-gooder, Leslie can expect to make
only a minimal living herself and the money to run her office itself
involves satisfying an endless chain of self-satisfied paper pushers.

Leslie: To add insult to injury, my work is funded by charity trusts, a
whole other long chain of BS jobs, from me applying for money up to the
CEOs who claim their organizations fight poverty, or “make the world a
better place.” At my end this starts with hours searching for relevant
funds, reading their guidelines, spending time learning how to best
approach them, filling out forms, making phone calls. If successful,
I’ll next have to spend hours every month compiling statistics and
filling out monitoring forms. Each trust has its own catechism and its
own sets of indicators, each wants their own set of evidence that we are
“empowering” people, or “creating change” or innovation, when, in fact,
we’re juggling rules and language on behalf of people who just need help
to fill out the paperwork, so they can get on with their lives.

Leslie told me of studies that demonstrate that any system of means
testing, no matter how it’s framed, will necessarily mean at least 20
percent of those who legitimately qualify for benefits give up and don’t
apply. That’s almost certainly more than the number of “cheats” who
might be detected by the rules—in fact, even counting those who are
honestly mistaken the number still only comes to 1.6 percent. The 20
percent figure would apply even if no one actually was formally denied
benefits at all. But of course the rules are designed to deny as many
claimants as can plausibly be denied: between sanctions and capricious
applications of the rules, we’ve gotten to the point now where 60
percent of those eligible for unemployment benefits in the United
Kingdom don’t get them. In other words, everyone she describes, the
entire archipelago that starts with the bureaucrats who write the rules,
and includes the DWP, enforcement tribunals, advocates, and employees
who work for the funding bodies that process applications for the NGOs
that employ those advocates, all of them, are part of a single vast
apparatus that exists to maintain the illusion that people are naturally
lazy and don’t really want to work—and therefore, that even if society
does have a responsibility to ensure they don’t literally starve to
death, it is necessary to make the process of providing them with the
means of continued existence as confusing, time-consuming, and
humiliating as possible.

The job, then, is essentially a kind of horrific combination of box
ticking and duct taping, making up for the inefficiencies of a system of
caregiving intentionally designed not to work. Thousands of people are
maintained on comfortable salaries in air-conditioned offices simply in
order to ensure that poor people continue to feel bad about themselves.

Leslie knew this better than anyone because she’d spent time on both
sides of the desk. She had been on benefits herself for years as a
single mother; she knew exactly what things looked like on the receiving
end. Her solution? Eliminate the apparatus entirely. She is involved in
the movement for Universal Basic Income, which calls for replacing all
means-tested social welfare benefits with a flat fee to be paid to
everyone, equally, residing in the country.

Candi, a fellow Basic Income activist—who also held a useless job in the
system whose details she preferred not to disclose—told me she
originally became interested in such issues when she first moved to
London in the 1980s and became part of the International Wages for
Housework Movement:

Candi: I got involved in Wages for Housework because I felt that my
mother needed it. She was trapped in a bad marriage, and she would have
left my dad a lot earlier if she’d had her own money. That’s something
really important for anyone in an abusive or even just boring
relationship: to be able to get out of it without being financially
impacted.

I’d just been in London for a year. I’d been trying to get involved in
some form of feminism back in the States. One of my formative memories
was my mother taking me to a consciousness raising group in Ohio when I
was nine. We ripped out pages from St. Paul’s Gospel where he was
talking about how terrible women are and made a pile of them. And
because I was the youngest member of the group they told me to light the
pile. I remember I wouldn’t do it at first because I’d been taught not
to play with matches.

David: But you did eventually light it?

Candi: I did. My mother gave me permission. Not long after that she got
a job that paid enough to live on, and immediately, she left my dad.
That was kind of proof in the pudding for me.

In London, Candi found herself drawn to Wages for Housework—then widely
seen by most other feminists as an annoying if not dangerous fringe
group—because she saw it as providing an alternative to sterile debates
between liberals and separatists. Here at least was an economic analysis
of the real-life problems women faced. Some at the time were beginning
to speak of a “global work machine,” a planetwide wage-labor system
designed to pump more and more effort out of more and more people, but
what feminist critics had begun pointing out was that same system also
defined what was to be considered “real” labor—the kind that could be
reduced to “time” and could thus be bought and sold—and what wasn’t.
Most women’s labor was placed in the latter category, despite the fact
that without it, the very machine that stamped it as “not really work”
would grind to a halt immediately.

Wages for Housework was essentially an attempt to call capitalism’s
bluff, to say, “Most work, even factory work, is done for a variety of
motives; but if you want to insist that work is only valuable as a
marketable commodity, then at least you can be consistent about the
matter!” If women were to be compensated in the same way as men then a
huge proportion of the world’s wealth would instantly have to be handed
over to them; and wealth, of course, is power. What follows is from a
conversation with both of them:

David: So inside Wages for Housework, were there many debates about the
policy implications—you know, the mechanisms through which the wages
would actually be paid?

Candi: Oh, no, it was much more a perspective—a way to expose the unpaid
work that was being done that nobody was supposed to talk about. And for
that it did a really good job. Few were talking about the work women
were already doing for free in the 1960s, but it became an issue when
Wages for Housework was established in the 1970s—and now it’s standard
to take it into account when working out divorce settlements, for
example.

David: So the demand itself was basically a provocation?

Candi: It was much more a provocation than it was ever a plan, “this is
how we could actually do it”—anything like that. We did talk about where
the money would come from. At first, it was all about getting money out
of capital. Then in the later eighties, Wilmette Brown’s book Black
Women and the Peace Movement came out,¹⁶ all about how war and the war
economy affects women and particularly Black women more than anyone
else, so we started using the slogan “pay women not soldiers.” Actually
you still hear that, “wage caring not killing.”

So we certainly targeted where the money was. But we never much got into
the mechanics.

David: Wait, “wage caring not killing”—whose slogan is that?

Leslie: Global Women’s Strike. That’s the contemporary successor to
Wages for Housework. When we came out with the first European UBI
[Universal Basic Income] petition back in 2013, that was Global Women’s
Strike’s response: two months later, they put out a petition to wage
carers instead. Which myself, I wouldn’t have a problem with, if they
were willing to admit that everyone is a carer in one form or another.
If you’re not looking after someone else then at the very least you’re
looking after yourself, and this takes time and energy the system is
less and less willing to afford people. But then recognizing that would
just lead back to UBI again: if everyone’s a carer, then you might as
well just fund everybody, and let them decide for themselves who they
want to care for at any given time.

Candi had come around from Wages for Housework to UBI for similar
reasons. She and some of her fellow activists started asking themselves:
Say we did want to promote a real, practical program, what would that
be?

Candi: The reaction we used to get on the street when we leafleted for
Wages for Housework was, either women would say, “Great! Where can I
sign up?” or they’d say, “How dare you demand money for something I do
for love?” That second reaction wasn’t entirely crazy, these women were
understandably resistant to commodifying all human activity in the way
that getting a wage for housework might imply.

Candi was particularly moved by the arguments of the French Socialist
thinker André Gorz. When I offered my own analysis on the inherently
unquantifiable nature of caring, she told me Gorz had anticipated it
forty years ago:

Candi: Gorz’s critique of Wages for Housework was that if you kept
emphasizing the importance of care to the global economy in strictly
financial terms, then there was the danger that you’d end up putting a
dollar value on different forms of caring, and saying, that’s its real
“value.” But in that case, you are running the risk of more and more of
that caring becoming monetized, quantified, and therefore, kind of
fucked up, because monetizing those activities often decreases the
qualitative value of the care, especially if it’s done, as it is
usually, as a list of specific tasks with set time limits. He was
already saying that in the seventies, and now, of course, that’s exactly
what’s transpired. Even in teaching, nursing.¹⁷

Leslie: Let alone what I do.

David: Yeah, I know. “Bullshitization” is my phrase.

Candi: Yes, it’s been bullshitized, absolutely.

Leslie: Whereas UBI  . . . Didn’t Silvia [Federici] write or talk in an
interview recently about how the UN and then all sorts of world bodies
kind of glommed onto feminism as a way to resolve the capitalist crisis
of the seventies? They said, sure, let’s bring women and carers into the
paid workforce (most working-class women were already doing a “double
day”), not to empower women but as a way of disciplining men. Because
insofar as you see an equalization of wages since then, it’s mainly
because in real terms, working-class men’s wages have gone down, not
because women are necessarily getting that much more. They’re always
trying to set us against each other. And that’s what all these
mechanisms for assessing the relative value of different kinds of work
are necessarily going to be about.

That’s why for me, the pilot study of Basic Income carried out in India
is so exciting. Well a lot of things are exciting about it—for instance,
domestic violence goes way down. (This makes sense because I think some
80 percent of domestic disputes that lead to violence turn out to be
about money.) But the main thing is, it starts to make social
inequalities dissolve. You start by giving everyone an equal amount of
money. That in itself is important, because money has a certain symbolic
power: it’s something that’s the same for everyone, and when you give
everyone, men, women, old, young, high caste, low caste, exactly the
same amount, those differences start to dissolve. This happened in the
Indian pilot where they observed that the girls were given the same
amount of food as boys unlike before, disabled people were more accepted
in village activities, and young women dropped the social convention
that said they were supposed to be shy and modest and started hanging
around in public like boys . . . Girls started participating in public
life.¹⁸

And any UBI payment would have to be enough to live on, all by itself,
and it would have to be completely unqualified. Everyone has to get it.
Even people who don’t need it. It’s worth it, just to establish the
principle that when it comes to what’s required to live, everyone
deserves that, equally, without qualification. This makes it a human
right, not just charity or duct tape for lack of other forms of income.
Then if there are further needs on top of that, say someone is disabled,
well, then you address that, too. But only after you establish the right
of material existence for all people.

This is one of the elements that startles and confuses a lot of people
when they first hear about the concept of Basic Income. Surely you
aren’t going to give $25,000 a year (or whatever it is) to Rockefellers,
too? The answer is yes. Everyone is everyone. It’s not like there are so
many billionaires this will come to a particularly large amount of
money; rich people could be taxed more anyway; if one wanted to start
means-testing, even for billionaires, then one would have to set up a
bureaucracy to start means-testing again, and if history tells us
anything, it’s that such bureaucracies tend to expand.

What Basic Income ultimately proposes is to detach livelihood from work.
Its immediate effect would be to massively reduce the amount of
bureaucracy in any country that implemented it. As Leslie’s case shows,
an enormous amount of the machinery of government, and that
half-government corporate NGO penumbra that surrounds it in most wealthy
societies, is just there to make poor people feel bad about themselves.
It’s an extraordinarily expensive moral game played to prop up a largely
useless global work machine.

Candi: Let me give an example. Recently I was thinking maybe I’d foster
a kid. So I looked into the package. It’s quite generous. You get a
council flat, and on top of that you get £250 a week to look after the
child. But then I realized: wait a minute. They’re talking about £13,000
a year and an apartment, for one child. Which the child’s parents in
probably most cases didn’t have. If we’d just given the same thing to
the parents so they didn’t get into so many problems they’d never have
had to foster the child to begin with.

And, of course, that’s not even counting the cost of the salaries of the
civil servants who arrange and monitor fosterage, the building and
upkeep of the offices in which they work, the various bodies that
monitor and control those civil servants, the building and upkeep of the
offices in which they work, and so forth.

This is not the place to enter into arguments about how a Basic Income
program might actually work.¹⁹ If it seems implausible to most (“But
where would the money come from?”), it’s largely because we’ve all grown
up with largely false assumptions about what money is, how it’s
produced, what taxes are really for, and a host of other issues that lie
far beyond the scope of this volume. Waters are further muddied by the
fact that there are radically different visions of what a universal
income is and why it would be good to have one: ranging from a
conservative version that aims to provide a modest stipend as a pretext
to completely eliminate existing welfare state provisions like free
education or health care, and just submit everything to the market, to a
radical version such as Leslie and Candi support, which assumes existing
unconditional guarantees like the British National Health Service will
be left in place.²⁰ One sees Basic Income as a way of contracting, the
other sees it as a way of expanding the zone of unconditionality. This
latter is the kind that I would myself be able to get behind. I do this
despite my own politics, which is quite explicitly antistatist: as an
anarchist, I look forward to seeing states dismantled entirely, and in
the meantime, have no interest in policies that will give states more
power than they have already.

But oddly, this is why I can get behind Basic Income. Basic Income might
seem like it is a vast expansion of state power, since presumably it’s
the government (or some quasi-state institution like a central bank)
that would be creating and distributing the money, but, in fact, it’s
the exactly the reverse. Huge sections of government—and precisely, the
most intrusive and obnoxious ones, since they are most deeply involved
in the moral surveillance of ordinary citizens—would be instantly made
unnecessary and could be simply closed down.²¹ Yes, millions of minor
government officials and benefit advisors like Leslie would be thrown
out of their current jobs, but they’d all receive basic income too.
Maybe some of them will come up with something genuinely important to
do, like installing solar panels, as Leslie suggests, or discovering the
cure for cancer. But it wouldn’t matter if they instead formed jug
bands, devoted themselves to restoring antique furniture, spelunking,
translating Mayan hieroglyphics, or trying to set the world record for
having sex at an advanced age. Let them do what they like! Whatever they
end up doing, they will almost certainly be happier than they are now,
imposing sanctions on the unemployed for arriving late at CV-building
seminars or checking to see if the homeless are in possession of three
forms of ID; and everybody else will be better off for their newfound
happiness.

Even a modest Basic Income program could become a stepping-stone toward
the most profound transformation of all: to unlatch work from livelihood
entirely. As we saw in the last chapter, a strong moral case can be made
for paying everyone the same regardless of their work. Yet the argument
cited in that chapter did assume people were being paid for their work,
and this would at the very least require some kind of monitoring
bureaucracy to ensure that people were, in fact, working, even if it did
not have to measure how hard or how much they produced. A full Basic
Income would eliminate the compulsion to work, by offering a reasonable
standard of living to all, and then either leaving it up to each
individual to decide whether they wished to pursue further wealth, by
doing a paying job, or selling something, or whether they wished to do
something else with their time. Alternately, it might open the way to
developing better ways of distributing goods entirely. (Money is after
all a rationing ticket, and in an ideal world, one would presumably wish
to do as little rationing as possible.) Obviously, all this depends on
the assumption that human beings don’t have to be compelled to work, or
at least, to do something that they feel is useful or beneficial to
others. As we’ve seen, this is a reasonable assumption. Most people
would prefer not to spend their days sitting around watching TV and the
handful who really are inclined to be total parasites are not going to
be a significant burden on society, since the total amount of work
required to maintain people in comfort and security is not that
formidable. The compulsive workaholics who insist on doing far more than
they really have to would more than compensate for the occasional
slackers.²²

Finally, the concept of unconditional universal support is directly
relevant to two issues that have come up repeatedly over the course of
this book. The first is the sadomasochistic dynamic of hierarchical work
arrangements—a dynamic that tends to be sharply exacerbated when
everyone knows the work to be pointless. A lot of the day-to-day misery
in working people’s lives springs directly from this source. In
chapter 4, I cited Lynn Chancer’s notion of sadomasochism in everyday
life, and particularly the point that, unlike actual BDSM play, where
there’s always a safe-word, when “normal” people fall into the same
dynamic, there’s never such an easy way out.

“You can’t say ‘orange’ to your boss.”

It’s always occurred to me this insight is important and could even
become the basis for a theory of social liberation. I like to think that
Michel Foucault, the French social philosopher, was moving in this
direction before his tragic death in 1984. Foucault, according to people
who knew him, underwent a remarkable personal transformation on
discovering BDSM, turning from a notoriously cagey and standoffish
personality to one suddenly warm, open, and friendly²³—but his
theoretical ideas also entered into a period of transformation that he
was never able to fully bring to fruit. Foucault, of course, is famous
mainly as a theorist of power, which he saw as flowing through all human
relationships, even as the basic substance of human sociality, since he
once defined it as simply a matter of “acting on another’s actions.”²⁴
This always created a peculiar paradox because while he wrote in such a
way as to suggest he was an antiauthoritarian opposed to power, he
defined power in such a way that social life would impossible without
it. At the very end of his career, he seems to have aimed to resolve the
dilemma by introducing a distinction between what he called power and
domination. The first, he said, was just a matter of “strategic games.”
Everyone is playing power games all the time, we can hardly help it, but
neither is there anything objectionable about our doing so. So in this,
his very last interview:

Power is not an evil. Power is strategic games. We know very well that
power is not an evil. Take for example, sexual relationship or love
relationships. To exercise power over another, in a sort of open
strategic game, where things could be reversed, that is not evil. That
is part of love, passion, of sexual pleasure . . .

It seems to me we must distinguish the relations of power as strategic
games between liberties—strategic games that result from the fact that
some people try to determine the conduct of others—and the states of
domination, which are what we ordinarily call “power.”²⁵

Foucault isn’t quite explicit on how we are to distinguish one from the
other, other than to say that in domination, things are not open and
cannot be reversed—otherwise fluid relations of power become rigid and
“congealed.” He gives the example of the mutual manipulation of teacher
and student (power-good), versus the tyranny of the authoritarian pedant
(domination-bad). I think Foucault is circling around something here,
and never quite gets to the promised land: a safe-word theory of social
liberation. Because this would be the obvious solution. It’s not so much
that certain games are fixed—some people like fixed games, for whatever
reasons—but that sometimes, you can’t get out of them. The question then
does indeed become: What would be the equivalent of saying “orange” to
one’s boss? Or to an insufferable bureaucrat, obnoxious academic
advisor, or abusive boyfriend? How do we create only games that we
actually feel like playing, because we can opt out at any time? In the
economic field, at least, the answer is obvious. All of the gratuitous
sadism of workplace politics depends on one’s inability to say “I quit”
and feel no economic consequences. If Annie’s boss knew Annie’s income
would be unaffected even if she did walk off in disgust at being called
out yet again for a problem she’d fixed months ago, she would know
better than to call her into the office to begin with. Basic Income in
this sense would, indeed, give workers the power to say “orange” to
their boss.

Which leads to the second theme: it’s not just that Annie’s boss would
have to treat her with at least a small degree of dignity and respect in
a world of guaranteed incomes. If Universal Basic Income was instituted,
it’s very hard to imagine jobs like Annie’s long continue to exist. One
could well imagine people who didn’t have to work to survive still
choosing to become dental assistants, or toymakers, or movie ushers, or
tugboat operators, or even sewage treatment plant inspectors. It’s even
easier to imagine them choosing to become some combination of several of
these. It’s extremely difficult to imagine someone living without
financial constraints choosing to spend any significant amount of their
time highlighting forms for a Medical Care Cost Management company—let
alone in an office where underlings were not allowed to speak. In such a
world, Annie would have no reason to give up on being a preschool
teacher, unless she actually decided she was no longer interested in
being a preschool teacher, and if Medical Care Cost Management companies
continued to exist, they would have to figure out another way to
highlight their forms.

It’s unlikely Medical Care Cost Management companies would exist for
long. The need for such firms (if you can even call it a “need”) is a
direct result of a bizarre and labyrinthine US health care system which
overwhelming majorities of Americans see as idiotic and unjust, and
which they wish to see replaced by some kind of public insurance or
public health provider. As we have seen, one of the main reasons this
system has not been replaced—at least, if President Obama’s own account
is to be believed—is precisely because its inefficiency creates jobs
like Annie’s. If nothing else, Universal Basic Income would mean
millions of people who recognize the absurdity of this situation will
have the time to engage in political organizing to change it, since they
will no longer be forced to highlight forms for eight hours a day, or
(if they insist on doing something useful with their lives) scramble
around for an equivalent amount of time trying to figure out a way to
pay the bills.

It’s hard to escape the impression that for many of those who, like
Obama, defend the existence of bullshit jobs, that’s one of the most
appealing things about such arrangements. As Orwell noted, a population
busy working, even at completely useless occupations, doesn’t have time
to do much else. At the very least, this is further incentive not to do
anything about the situation.

Be this as it may, however, it opens the way to my second and final
point. The first objection typically raised when someone suggests
guaranteeing everyone a livelihood regardless of work is that if you do
so, people simply won’t work. This is just obviously false and at this
point I think we can dismiss it out of hand. The second, more serious
objection is that most will work, but many will choose work that’s of
interest only to themselves. The streets would fill up with bad poets,
annoying street mimes, and promoters of crank scientific theories, and
nothing would get done. What the phenomenon of bullshit jobs really
brings home is the foolishness of such assumptions. No doubt a certain
proportion of the population of a free society would spend their lives
on projects most others would consider to be silly or pointless; but
it’s hard to imagine how it would go much over 10 or 20 percent. But
already right now, 37 to 40 percent of workers in rich countries already
feel their jobs are pointless. Roughly half the economy consists of, or
exists in support of, bullshit. And it’s not even particularly
interesting bullshit! If we let everyone decide for themselves how they
were best fit to benefit humanity, with no restrictions at all, how
could they possibly end up with a distribution of labor more inefficient
than the one we already have?

This is a powerful argument for human freedom. Most of us like to talk
about freedom in the abstract, even claim that it’s the most important
thing for anyone to fight or die for, but we don’t think a lot about
what being free or practicing freedom might actually mean. The main
point of this book was not to propose concrete policy prescriptions, but
to start us thinking and arguing about what a genuine free society might
actually be like.


Acknowledgments

I would like to thank the hundreds of people who shared their stories of
workplace woe, but cannot be named. You know who you are.

I would like to thank Vyvian Raoul at Strike! for commissioning the
original essay and everyone else at Strike! (especially The Special
Patrol Group) for making all this possible.

This book wouldn’t exist without the hard work of my team at Simon &
Schuster: editor Ben Loehnen, Erin Reback, Jonathan Karp, and Amar Deol,
and without the encouragement of my agent, Melissa Flashman at Janklow &
Nesbit.

And, of course, much gratitude to my friends who put up with me and my
colleagues at LSE, for their patience and support, and particularly to
the administrative staff: Yanina and Tom Hinrichsen, Renata Todd,
Camilla Kennedy Harper, and Andrea Elsik. Sophie Carapetian and Rebecca
Coles provided excellent research assistance and support.

I think I should also thank Megan Laws, the indefatigable LSE
anthropology graduate student whose entire job is to monitor my
“impact.” I can only hope this book will facilitate her efforts.


About the Author

[images]

© MARI JAN MURAT

David Graeber is a Professor of Anthropology at the London School of
Economics. He is the author of DEBT: The First 5,000 Years, and a
contributor to Harper’s, The Guardian, and The Baffler. He lives in
London.

MEET THE AUTHORS, WATCH VIDEOS AND MORE AT

SimonandSchuster.com

Authors.SimonandSchuster.com/David-Graeber

[Image] [Image] [Image] @simonbooks

We hope you enjoyed reading this Simon & Schuster ebook.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Get a FREE ebook when you join our mailing list. Plus, get updates on
new releases, deals, recommended reads, and more from Simon & Schuster.
Click below to sign up and see terms and conditions.

CLICK HERE TO SIGN UP

Already a subscriber? Provide your email again so we can register this
ebook and send you more of what you like to read. You will continue to
receive exclusive offers in your inbox.

ALSO BY DAVID GRAEBER

Debt: The First 5,000 Years

The Utopia of Rules: On Technology, Stupidity, and the Secret Joys of
Bureaucracy


Notes

Preface: On the Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs

1. I’ve got a lot of push-back about the actuaries, and now think I was
being unfair to them. Some actuarial work does make a difference. I’m
still convinced the rest could disappear with no negative consequences.

2. David Graeber, “The Modern Phenomenon of Bullshit Jobs,” Canberra
(Australia) Times online, last modified September 3, 2013,
www.canberratimes.com.au/national/public-service/the-modern-phenomenon-of-bullshit-jobs-20130831-2sy3j.html.

3. To my knowledge, only one book has ever been written on the subject
of bullshit jobs, Boulots de Merde!, by Paris-based journalists Julien
Brygo and Olivier Cyran (2015)—and the authors told me it was directly
inspired by my article. It’s a good book but covers a rather different
range of questions than my own.

Chapter 1: What Is a Bullshit Job?

1. “Bullshit Jobs,” LiquidLegends,
www.liquidlegends.net/forum/general/460469-bullshit-jobs?page=3, last
modified October 1, 2014.

2. “Spanish Civil Servant Skips Work for 6 Years to Study Spinoza,”
Jewish Telegraphic Agency (JTA), last modified February 26, 2016,
www.jta.org/2016/02/26/news-opinion/world/spanish-civil-servant-skips-work-for-6-years-to-study-spinoza.

3. Jon Henley, “Long Lunch: Spanish Civil Servant Skips Work for Years
Without Anyone Noticing,” Guardian (US), last modified February 26,
2016,
www.theguardian.com/world/2016/feb/12/long-lunch-spanish-civil-servant-skips-work-for-years-without-anyone-noticing.
Perhaps he was inspired by Spinoza’s argument that all beings strive to
maximize their power, but that power consists equally of the ability to
have effects on other beings, but also, to be affected by them. From a
Spinozan perspective, having a job where you affect and are affected by
no one would be the worst possible employment situation.

4. Post carriers are clearly not bullshit jobs but the implication of
the story seems to be that since 99 percent of the mail they chose not
to deliver was junk mail, they might as well have been. This seems
unlikely to have actually been the case but the story reflects on public
attitudes. For shifting attitudes toward postal workers, see my Utopia
of Rules (2015), 153–163.

5. http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/europe/3410547.stm?a, accessed April
7, 2017.

6. “Vier op tien werknemers noemt werk zinloos,”
http://overhetnieuwewerken.nl/vier-op-tien-werknemers-noemt-werk-zinloos/,
accessed July 10, 2017.

7. Typical remark, from Rufus: “I’d love to tell you that my most
worthless job was making lattes for very particular and peculiar people,
but in retrospect, I understand I played a vital role in helping them
through their day.”

8. I should observe that the following is drawn mainly from pop culture
representations of hit men, rather than any ethnographic or sociological
analysis of real ones.

9. Interestingly enough, “bull” is not an abbreviation for “bullshit,”
but “bullshit” is an early-twentieth-century elaboration on “bull.” The
term is ultimately derived from the French bole, meaning “fraud or
deceit.” The term “bullshit” is first attested in an unpublished poem by
T. S. Eliot. “Bollocks” is another derivation from “bole.”

10. I would have said “lying” but the philosopher Harry Frankfurt (2005)
famously argued that bullshitting is not the same as lying. The
difference between them is analogous to the difference between murder
and manslaughter; one is intentional deception, the other, reckless
disregard for the truth. I’m not sure the distinction entirely works in
this context but I didn’t think entering a debate on the subject would
be particularly helpful.

11. To fully appreciate the feudal connection, the reader might consider
the name “Corleone.” This was the name of the fictional Mafia family in
Mario Puzo’s novel and Francis Ford Coppola’s film The Godfather but, in
fact, it’s the name of a town in Sicily that is notorious for being the
home of many famous mafiosi. In Italian it means “lion-heart.” The
reason for this appears to be that the Normans who conquered England in
1066 had also conquered previously Arab-held Sicily, and imported many
features of Arabic administration. Readers will recall in most Robin
Hood stories, the archvillain is the Sheriff of Nottingham, and the
distant king away at the crusades is “Richard the Lion-Hearted.” The
word “sheriff” is just an anglicization of the Arabic sharif and was one
of those positions inspired by the administration of Sicily. The exact
connection between Corleone and the British king is debated, but some
connection definitely exists. So however indirectly, the Marlon Brando
character in The Godfather is named after Richard the Lion-Hearted.

12. Many burgle in their spare time. An apartment complex in which I
once lived was once plagued by a series of burglaries, that always took
place on a Monday. It was eventually determined that the burglar was a
hairdresser, who generally get Mondays off.

13. Many thieves, ranging from art thieves to ordinary shoplifters, will
hire out their services, but as such they are still just independent
contractors, hence, self-employed. The case of the hit man is more
ambiguous. Some might argue that if one is a long-standing but
subordinate member of a criminal organization that does qualify as a
“job,” but it’s not my impression (I don’t really know, of course) that
most people in such positions see it quite that way.

14. I do not say such a job is “a form of paid employment that feels so
completely pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious that even the employee
cannot justify its existence,” I say it’s “a form of paid employment
that is so completely pointless, unnecessary, or pernicious that even
the employee cannot justify its existence.” In other words, I am not
just saying that the employee believes his work to be bullshit, but that
his belief is both valid and correct.

15. Let me take my own situation as an example. I am currently employed
as a professor of anthropology at the London School of Economics. There
are people who consider anthropology to be the very definition of a
bullshit subject. In 2011 Governor Rick Scott of Florida even singled
out the discipline as his prime example of one his state’s universities
would be better off without (Scott Jaschik, “Florida GOP Vs. Social
Science,” Inside Higher Education, last modified October 12, 2011,
www.insidehighered.com/news/2011/10/12/florida_governor_challenges_idea_of_non_stem_degrees).

16. I’ve been told that inside Countrywide Financial, one of the key
players in the subprime mortgage scandals of 2008, there were basically
two ranks in the company—the lowly “nerds,” and the insiders—the
insiders being those who had been told about the scams. I encountered an
even more extreme example in my own research: one woman wrote to me that
she had worked for almost a year selling advertising for an in-flight
magazine that she gradually realized did not exist. She became
suspicious when she realized she had never once seen a copy of the
magazine in the office, or on an airplane, despite the fact she was a
fairly frequent flyer. Eventually her coworkers quietly confirmed that
the entire operation was a fraud.

17. There are exceptions to this as to all rules. In many large
organizations like banks, as we will see, top-level managers will hire
consultants or internal auditors to figure out what it is that people
actually do; one bank analyst told me about 80 percent of bank workers
are engaged in unnecessary tasks and most he felt were unaware of it,
since they were kept in the dark about their role in the larger
organization. Still, he said, their supervisors didn’t know much better,
and his suggestions for reform were invariably rejected. It’s important
to emphasize here, too, it’s not that people mistakenly believed their
jobs to be bullshit, but quite the other way around.

18. Even here one can imagine objections. What about Scientologists?
Most of those who provide e-meter sessions to allow people to discover
traumas in their past lives seem to be convinced their work has enormous
social value, even as the great majority of the population is convinced
they are delusional, or frauds. But again this isn’t really relevant as
no one is really saying “faith-healer” is a bullshit job.

19. A case could be made that often propaganda which is ostensibly aimed
at tricking outsiders is really primarily aimed at assuaging the
consciences of the propagandists themselves.

20. The remarks were extempore and not written down. The quotation is
reconstructed partly from the passages cited in John Adam Byrne,
“Influential Economist Says Wall Street Is Full of Crooks,” New York
Post online, April 28, 2013,
http://nypost.com/2013/04/28/influential-economist-says-wall-streets-full-of-crooks,
partly from a partial transcript in a Business Insider article by Janet
Tavakoli,
www.businessinsider.com/i-regard-the-wall-street-moral-environment-as-pathological-2013-9?IR=T,
accessed April 21, 2017), and partly from my own notes taken at the
time.

21. In fact, over the course of my research, I’ve run into a surprising
number of people (well, three) with college educations who, frustrated
by the pointlessness of the office work available to them, actually did
become cleaners simply to feel they were doing an honest day’s work.

22. I really shouldn’t have to point this out but since I find there
will always be some readers who have a hard time with basic logic:
saying shit jobs tend to be useful and productive is not saying that all
useful and productive jobs tend to be shit.

23. House of the Dead, 1862, trans. Constance Garnett (Mineola, NY:
Dover, 2004), 17–18. My friend Andrej Grubacic tells me this was
actually done to his grandfather as a form of torture in a Titoist
reeducation camp in Yugoslavia in the 1950s. The jailers had evidently
read the classics.

24. The three-part list is not meant to be comprehensive. For instance,
it leaves out the category of what’s often referred to as “guard labor,”
much of which (unnecessary supervisors) is bullshit, but much of which
is simply obnoxious or bad.

25. In David Graeber, The Utopia of Rules: On Technology, Stupidity, and
the Secret Joys of Bureaucracy (Brooklyn, NY: Melville House, 2015), 9,
I refer to this as “the Iron Law of Liberalism”: that “any market
reform, any government initiative intended to reduce red tape and
promote market forces will have the ultimate effect of increasing the
total number of regulations, the total amount of paperwork, and the
total number of bureaucrats the government employs.”

26. In fact, that’s largely what making someone wear a uniform means,
since uniforms are often placed on people (say, those working in a hotel
laundry) who are never seen by the public at all. It’s a way of saying
“you should think of yourself as being under military discipline.”

27. Oddly, the survey did break down the results by political voting
preferences (Tory voters were least, and UKIP voters most likely to
think their jobs were bullshit) and region (Southern England outside
London was highest at 42 percent bullshit rate, Scotland lowest at 27
percent). Age and “social grade” seemed relatively insignificant.

28. The Restaurant at the End of the Universe (Hitchhiker’s Guide to the
Galaxy, book #2) (London: Macmillan Pan Books, 1980), 140.

29. There has been some debate as one might imagine among Douglas Adams
fans on this topic but the consensus seems to be that while some jobs in
the 1970s involved cleaning phones and other electronic equipment,
“telephone sanitizer” as a separate profession did not exist. This did
not stop Adams from collaborating with Graham Chapman of Monty Python in
creating a TV special starring Ringo Starr called The Telephone
Sanitisers of Navarone, which, sadly, was never produced.

30. To be fair, we learn later that the joke was on the Golgafrinchams,
since they all eventually die from a plague that started from an
improperly sanitized telephone. But no one ever seems to remember that
part.

31. Hair salons in immigrant communities will often serve a similar role
for both men and women. I even had some friends who became the in-house
barbers for a big London squat who found this started happening to them
as well: anyone new to town would stop in for a trim to find out what
was going on.

32. Not to mention, she added, the fact that the amount of money
invested in keeping them dancing on boxes could, if redirected, easily
suffice to head off the threat of climate change. “The sex industry
makes it evident that the most valuable thing that many women can offer
is their bodies as sexual commodities when they are very young. It
determines that many women earn more at eighteen to twenty-five than
they ever do again in their lives. This is definitely the case in my own
life”—the author being a successful academic and author who still
doesn’t make as much a year as she once might have in three months’
stripping.

33. As evidence for this generalization: if telemarketers or useless
middle managers were to be made illegal, a black market would be
unlikely to emerge to replace them. Obviously, historically this has
tended to happen in the case of sex work. This is why one might say the
problem is patriarchy itself—the concentration of so much wealth and
power in the hands of males who are then kept sexually unfulfilled or
taught to seek out certain forms of gratification rather than others—and
therefore something much more essential to the nature of society itself.

34. “L’invasion des «métiers à la con», une fatalité économique?,”
Jean-Laurent Cassely, Slate, August 26, 2013,
www.slate.fr/story/76744/metiers-a-la-con. Accessed 23 September, 2013.

Chapter 2: What Sorts of Bullshit Jobs Are There?

1. I did this by creating an email account
(“doihaveabsjoborwhat@gmail.com”), and asking for input on Twitter.
Gmail, rather quaintly, does not allow the word “bullshit” in addresses.

2. The names therefore are all made up, and I have avoided naming any
specific employers, or geographic information that might give identities
away: for instance, “a famous university in New Haven, Connecticut,” or
“a small publishing firm based in Devon County, England, owned by a
consortium in Berlin.” In some cases, such details are changed; in other
cases, simply left out.

3. The quotations that follow are all drawn from this database unless
otherwise indicated. I have kept them largely as I received them, except
for some light editing—changing abbreviations into full words, adjusting
punctuation, minor grammatical or stylistic tweaks, and so forth.

4. One BBC video that has been drawn to my attention divides “pointless
jobs” into three types, “No Work at Work,” “Managers of Management that
Manage Managers,” and “Negative Social Value.” See “Do You Have a
Pointless Job?,” BBC online, last modified April 20, 2017,
www.bbc.com/capital/story/20170420-do-you-have-a-pointless-job.

5. So in 1603 one William Perkins wrote “it is required that such as are
commonly called serving-men should have beside the office of waiting,
some other particular calling, unless they tend on men of great place
and state . . . For waiting-servants, by reason they spend most of their
time in eating and drinking, sleeping and gaming after dinner and after
supper, do prove the most unprofitable members both in Church and
Commonwealth. For when either their good masters die, or they be turned
out of their office for some misdemeanour, they are not fit for any
calling, being unable to labor, and thus they give themselves either to
beg or to steal” (in Thomas 1999: 418). On the history of the term
“waiter” see chapter 6. I should also emphasize that I am not saying
real feudal retainers were “bullshit jobs” in the modern sense, since
they rarely felt obliged to claim to be anything other than what they
were; insofar as they misrepresented themselves, it was by pretending to
do less than they actually did, not more.

6. They also ran occasional errands. One gets a sense of how common such
characters used to be by how many different words for them there were:
not just footmen, but flunkies, henchmen, gofers, minions, lackeys,
cronies, menials, attendants, hirelings, knaves, myrmidons, retainers,
and valets—and these are just those that most immediately come to mind.
All these are not to be confused with toadies, cronies, sidekicks,
sycophants, parasites, stooges, yes-men, and the like, who are more in
the order of independent hangers-on. It’s worthy of pointing out that in
European courts it was really the courtiers who performed no useful
function; the uniformed attendants actually did all sorts of odd jobs
when they weren’t standing around during ceremonial events. But the
whole point was to look as if they didn’t.

7. I recognize that it is extremely rare for the rate of extraction to
be that high, but as I say, this is just a thought experiment to bring
out the dynamics that tend to emerge in such situations.

8. One might even say it’s one of those things of which what we call
“honor” historically consisted of.

9. The number of domestic servants in North Atlantic countries has
declined precipitously since the First World War, but to a large extent
their ranks have been replaced, first by what are called “service
workers” (“waiter,” for instance, was originally the name for a kind of
household servant), and second by ever-growing legions of administrative
assistants and other such underlings in the corporate sector. For an
example of old feudal styles of unnecessary labor bleeding into the
present day, consider this account: “My friend is working on a film set
at an old manor house in Hertfordshire, where he runs errands and
ensures that the crew don’t mess up the nice old building. At the end of
every day he has to spend two solid hours ‘candle watching.’ The Lord
and Lady of the house told the crew that after the candles are
extinguished in the main hall someone must watch them for at least TWO
hours to make sure they don’t spontaneously burst into flames again and
burn the house down. My friend is not allowed to douse the candles in
water or ‘cheat’ it any way.” When asked why he wasn’t allowed to stick
the candles in water, he replied, “They gave no explanation.”

10. Just to be absolutely clear: there are plenty of receptionists who
serve a necessary function. I am referring here to those who do not.

11. The same remains true today, incidentally. I am personally
acquainted with one young woman who, despite having no military
experience whatsoever, ended up, as personal assistant to a NATO
official, actually writing many strategic plans for operations in a war
zone (neither do I have any reason to believe her plans weren’t just as
good or better than any NATO general would have come up with).

12. At the very least this is true of high-tech weaponry. One might
argue that most countries also maintain armies to suppress real or
potential civil unrest, but this rarely involves a need for fighter
jets, submarines, or MX missiles. Historically, Mexico has had an
explicit policy of not wasting money on such expensive toys, arguing
that owing to their geographic position, the only countries they’d be
likely to enter into hostilities with would be either the USA, or
Guatemala. If they went to war with the USA, they’d lose, pretty much
regardless of armament; if they went to war with Guatemala, they’d win,
with or without fighter jets. Hence, Mexico merely maintains such
equipment as would suffice to suppress domestic dissent.

13. Such conversations are particularly challenging to me since in the
1980s academics such as myself largely abandoned the idea that consumer
demand was the product of marketing manipulation, and took up the idea
that consumers were basically patching together crazy-quilt identities
by using consumer goods in ways that had never really been intended (as
if everyone in America had turned into Snoop Dogg, or RuPaul). Granted I
was always pretty suspicious of that narrative. But it’s clear that many
of those who work in the industry are quite certain that they really are
what everyone thought they were in the sixties and seventies.

14. A crude natural language script dating back to the late 1960s.

15. I have personal experience of this: lecturers at LSE are expected to
fill out elaborate time-allocation reports, with an hour-by-hour
breakdown of weekly professional activities. The forms offer endless
fine distinctions between different sorts of administrative activity but
no explicit category for “reading and writing books.” When I pointed
this out I was told I could place such activities under “LSE-funded
research,” that is, what was important about research from the school’s
perspective was 1. that I had not got myself outside funding to pay for
this reading and writing activity, and 2. that therefore they were
paying me to do it when I could be doing my real job.

16. A fairly typical testimony from within the IT industry: “I have
often seen projects designed to obscure responsibility. For example, to
evaluate an IT system. The purpose is not to affect the decision, which
is taken somewhere in the corridors, but to claim that everyone was
heard and all concerns were taken seriously. Since the project is only a
pretense all work on the project is wasted, and people soon realize and
stop taking it seriously.” This kind of false consensus-seeking is
common in ostensibly collegial institutions like universities or NGOs,
but is quite common in the more hierarchical corporations as well.

17. To give a sense of the scale of this industry, Citigroup announced
in 2014 that by the next year, it would have thirty thousand employees
working in compliance, or about 13 percent of the total staff. Sital S.
Patel, “Citi Will Have Almost 30,000 Employees in Compliance by
Year-end,” The Tell (blog), MarketWatch, July 14, 2014,
http://blogs.marketwatch.com/thetell/2014/07/14/citi-will-have-almost-30000-employees-in-compliance-by-year-end.

18. Except, of course, by trying to make some special arrangement that
would allow someone else to do the paperwork for her, this was
considered, for some reason, quite out of the question.

19. Another good example of a public/private box-ticking industry is in
construction. Consider the following testimony:

Sophie: I’m in this lucrative ‘consultant’ line of work for planning
permissions. Back in the sixties just about the only consultant who
submitted information for a planning permission was the architect. Now a
planning permission for a large-ish building is accompanied by a long
list of reports by consultants (including me!):

Environmental impact assessment

Landscape and visual impact assessment

Transport report

Wind microclimate assessment

Sunlight/daylight analysis

Heritage setting assessment

Archaeology assessment

Landscape maintenance management report

Tree impact assessment

Flood risk assessment . . .

. . . and there’s more than that!

Each report is about 50 to 100 pages, and yet the strange thing is, the
resulting buildings are ugly boxes remarkably similar to the ones we
built in the sixties, so I don’t think the reports are serving any
purpose!”

20. Or only ostensible role.

21. One corporate consultant wrote: “I look forward to the day that
someone in my industry steps up and goes full Sokal affair—i.e., submits
a consulting report that is entirely made up of vague business
buzzwords, and doesn’t actually contain any structured information at
all. Although I suspect this has already happened many times, just
without the consultants in question being conscious of it.”

22. This made sense, in retrospect, because if you are a medical
researcher, you already have all these journals in the library or have
access to digitized versions; there would be no reason to fall back on
interlibrary loan.

23. It’s interesting to compare corporate magazines with the ones that
Labor unions put out, which I suspect predate them as a literary form.
They certainly have their share of puff pieces, but also discuss serious
problems. My father was a member of Amalgamated Lithographers Local 1 in
New York, a printers’ union, and I remember as a child taking pride in
the fact that their in-house magazine, Lithopinion, was by far the most
beautiful magazine I’d ever seen, owing to their eagerness to show off
new graphic techniques. It also contained real hard-hitting political
analysis.

24. For instance, a recent survey determined that 80 percent of
employees feel their managers are useless and that they could do their
job just as well without them. It does not appear to document how many
managers agree, but one has to assume the number is substantially lower
(“Managers Can be Worse than Useless, Survey Finds,” Central Valley
Business Times, December 5, 2017,
http://www.centralvalleybusinesstimes.com/stories/001/?ID=33748,
accessed December 18, 2017.

25. As we shall see, this is no less true of America, or anywhere else.

26. Here Chloe seems to be responding to the title of a version of my
original essay that had run on evonomics.com under the title “Why
Capitalism Creates Pointless Jobs.” I didn’t make up the title. Normally
I avoid attributing agency to abstractions.

27. This must be assumed unless there is some reason to believe that
pointless occupations require either more or less support work than
useful ones.

28. This figure is obviously inexact. On the one hand, a very large
percentage of cleaners, electricians, builders, etc., work for private
individuals and not for firms at all. On the other hand, I am counting
the 13 percent who say they aren’t sure if their jobs are bullshit or
nonbullshit jobs. The 50 percent figure (actually 50.3 percent) is based
on the assumption these two factors would roughly cancel each other out.

Chapter 3: Why Do Those in Bullshit Jobs Regularly Report Themselves
Unhappy? (On Spiritual Violence, Part 1)

1. And as we’ll see even these tended to be highly ambivalent.

2. After writing this I presented my analysis to Eric, who confirmed it
and added details: “I could definitely see that the middle- and
upper-middle-class kids in the lower rungs of that job were seeing it as
a path to career advancement—partly in terms of how they socialized
around work (watching the rugby on a weekend in someone’s suburban
Bovis-home conservatory; cocktails in tacky wine bars but always
networking, networking), and that for some it was merely a stop-gap that
filled in an otherwise-blank spot on the CV until a family member found
them a better opportunity.” He added, “It’s interesting that you mention
the idea of the caring classes. My father’s first remark when I quit
that position was to say that I was a nonsensical idiot to turn down
such a good paycheck. His second was to ask, ‘What good could that job
do for anyone anyway?’ ”

On the other hand, Eric pointed out he does now have two advanced
degrees, a research fellowship, and a successful career—he attributes
much of this to the knowledge of social theory he gained while living in
the squat.

3. Rufus more or less confirmed this when I asked about his father’s
motivations: he said his father couldn’t stand the company, either, felt
he was basically in a bullshit job himself, and just wanted his son to
have something to put on his CV. The question remains why, as VP, he
couldn’t just have lied.

4. It is interesting to note that the British welfare state, like most
post–World War II welfare states, was consciously constructed against
the principle that the poor need to be compelled to labor. This started
to change almost everywhere starting in the 1970s.

5. Since the seventies, surveys have regularly revealed that 74 percent
to 80 percent of workers claim that, if they won the lottery or came
into some similar fortune, they would continue working. The first study
was by Morse and Weiss (1966), but it has been replicated frequently
since.

6. Classic source on this: Robert D. Atkinson. 2002. “Prison Labor: It’s
More than Breaking Rocks.” Policy Report, Washington, DC, Progressive
Policy Institute—though by citing I am in no sense supporting his policy
conclusions that prison labor should be made generally available to
industry!

7. And also, crucially, that they might just as easily not have done it.
Hence, Groos defined the attendant joy as being the feeling of freedom.

8. So, for instance, another psychoanalyst, G. A. Klein, writes, “[W]hen
the baby starts to grasp articles, sits up, tries to walk, he begins a
process that eventually yields the sense that the locus and origins of
these achievements is in himself. When the child thus feels the change
as originating within himself, he begins to have a sense of being
himself, a psychologically, not simply physically, autonomous unit”
(1976: 275).

Francis Broucek, “The Sense of Self,” Bulletin of the Menninger Clinic
41 (1977): 86, feels this doesn’t go far enough: “The sense of efficacy
is at the core of the primitive sense of self and not a property of some
already defined self. This primitive feeling of efficacy is what the
psychoanalytic literature refers to as infantile omnipotence—a sense of
efficacy, the limits of which are not yet apprehended . . . The primary
sense of self emerges from effectance pleasure associated with the
successful correspondence of intention and effect.” There is thus a
fundamental joy in the knowledge of one’s own existence that is tied to
one’s freedom to have effects on the world around you, including others,
at first regardless of what those may be.

9. Francis Broucek, “Efficacy in Infancy: A Review of Some Experimental
Studies and Their Possible Implications to Clinical Theory,”
International Journal of Psycho-Analysis 60 (January 1, 1979): 314. “The
total inner separation from the environment in response to such traumata
may foreshadow later schizophrenic, depressive, narcissistic or phobic
behaviour, depending on the frequency, severity and duration of the
experiences of failed influence or invalidated expectancy, the age at
which such traumata occur, and how much of a sense of self based on
efficacy experiences has been established prior to the traumata.”

10. I am, of course, offering an extremely simplified version of
Schiller’s philosophy.

11. In legal terms, most slaveholding societies justify the institution
by the legal fiction that slaves are prisoners of war—and, in fact, many
slaves in human history were captured as the result of military
operations. The first chain gangs were employed in Roman plantations.
They were made up of slaves who had been placed in the plantation’s
ergastulum, or prison, for disobedience or attempted escape.

12. There is certainly work on moralists in China, India, the classical
world, and their concepts of work and idleness—for instance, the Roman
distinction of otium and negotium—but I am speaking here more of the
practical questions, such as when and where even useless work came to be
seen as preferable to no work at all.

13. Writing of sixteenth- and seventeenth-century weavers, E. P.
Thompson informs us: “The work pattern was one of alternate bouts of
intense labor and of idleness, wherever men were in control of their own
working lives. (The pattern persists among some self-employed—artists,
writers, small farmers, and perhaps also with students—today, and
provokes the question whether it is not a “natural” human work rhythm.)
On Monday or Tuesday, according to tradition, the hand-loom went to the
slow chant of Plen-ty of Time, Plen-ty of Time: on Thursday and Friday,
A day t’lat, A day” (1967:73).

14. When I was in high school there was a kind of macho game among the
coolest students, before exams, where they would boast how many hours
they’d gone without sleep-cramming beforehand: thirty-six, forty-eight,
even sixty hours. It was macho because it implied such students had not
done any study at all before, since they had been thinking about more
important things. I rapidly figured out that if one reduced oneself to a
mindless zombie, the extra hours of study weren’t actually going to
help. I suspect this is one reason I am now a professor.

15. Hunting versus gathering again being the paradigmatic example.
Child-care is probably the most dramatic exception: it’s largely a
woman’s domain, but it is always generating stories.

16. I am ignoring here the managerial functions of running their
estates, but it’s not clear this was considered labor at the time. I
suspect it wasn’t.

17. Historically speaking, the institution of wage labor is a
sophisticated latecomer. The very idea of wage labor involves two
difficult conceptual steps. First, it requires the abstraction of man’s
labor from both his person and his work. When one purchases an object
from an ancient craftsman, one has not bought his labor but the object,
which he has produced under his own time and his own conditions of work.
But when one purchases an abstraction, labor power, which the purchaser
then uses it at a time and under conditions which he, the purchaser, not
the “owner” of the labor power, determines (and for which he normally
pays after he has consumed it). Second, the wage-labor system requires
the establishment of a method of measuring the labor one has purchased,
for purposes of payment, commonly by introducing a second abstraction,
labor time.) M. I. Finley, The Ancient Economy (Berkeley: University of
California Press, 1973), 65–66: “We should not underestimate the
magnitude, speaking socially rather than intellectually, of these two
conceptual steps; even the Roman jurists found them difficult.”

18. An early Christian would have been outright offended, since time,
properly speaking, belonged only to God.

19. Though, in fact, Homer represents the fate of the thes, or
occasional agricultural hireling, who rented himself out in this manner,
as actually worse than a slave, since a slave at least is a member of a
respectable household (Odyssey 11.489–91).

20. The only notable exception to this rule is that free citizens in
democracies were often willing to hire themselves out to the government
for public works: but this is because the government being seen as a
collective of which the citizen was a member, it was essentially seen as
working for oneself.

21. See David Graeber, “Turning Modes of Production Inside Out: Or, Why
Capitalism Is a Transformation of Slavery (Short Version),” Critique of
Anthropology 26, no. 1 (March 2006): 61–81.

22. E. E. Evans-Pritchard, The Nuer: A Description of the Modes of
Livelihood and Political Institutes of a Nilotic People (Oxford:
Clarendon Press, 1940), 103. Maurice Bloch, in Anthropology and the
Cognitive Challenge (Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2012),
80–94, argues that Evans-Pritchard overstates things, and is no doubt
correct if Evans-Pritchard really is making arguments as radical as is
sometimes attributed to him, but I don’t think he truly is. Anyway, the
counterarguments have to do mainly with a sense of historical time
rather than day-to-day activity.

23. E. P. Thompson, “Time, Work Discipline and Industrial Capitalism,”
Past & Present 38 (1967): 56–97.

24. See Jacques LeGoff, Time, Work and Culture in the Middle Ages
(Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1982), for classic essays
extending E. P. Thompson’s insights back to the High Middle Ages.

25. Those who designed modern universal education systems were quite
explicit about all this: Thompson himself cites a number of them. I
remember reading that someone once surveyed American employers about
what it was they actually expected when they specified in a job ad that
a worker must have a high school degree: a certain level of literacy? Or
numeracy? The vast majority said no, a high school education, they
found, did not guarantee such things—they mainly expected the worker
would be able to show up on time. Interestingly, the more advanced the
level of education, however, the more autonomous the students and the
more the old episodic pattern of work tends to reemerge.

26. The West Indian Marxist Eric Williams (1966) first emphasized the
history of plantations in shaping the techniques of worker control later
employed in factories; Marcus Rediker, The Slave Ship: A Human History
(London: Penguin, 2004), adds ships, focusing on merchant vessels active
in the slave trade, as the main other experiment-zone for rationalized
work discipline during the period of merchant capital. Naval vessels are
relevant, too, especially as they often employed unfree labor as well,
since many of the sailors were “pressed” into service against their
will. All of them involved contexts where in the absence of long
traditions of what one could or could not demand of an employee—which
were still felt to apply in areas that had emerged more directly from
feudal relations—closely supervised work could itself be reorganized
around new ideals of clocklike efficiency.

27. One reason all this is not obvious is that we have been conditioned
to think, when we think of “wage labor,” first of all of factory work,
and factory work, in turn, as production-line work where the pace of
labor is set by the machines. In fact, only a very small percentage of
wage labor has ever been factory work and a relatively small percentage
of that based on conveyer-belt-style production lines. I’ll be writing
more about the effect of such misconceptions in chapter 6.

28. Don’t believe me? You can hire them here:
www.smashpartyentertainment.com/living-statues-art.

29. I was slightly surprised that someone born around 1900 or 1910 had
already internalized such an attitude and asked Wendy if her grandmother
had ever been a supervisor or employer. She didn’t think so, but later
discovered that her grandmother had briefly helped run a chain of
groceries many years before.

Chapter 4: What Is It Like to Have a Bullshit Job? (On Spiritual
Violence, Part 2)

1. As noted in the last chapter, it’s true that the entire class-period
structure is really just a way to teach students time discipline for
later factory work, and might now be considered redundant on that basis.
But that’s the system that exists.

2. My translation from the French: Je suis conseiller technique en
insolvabilité dans un ministère qui serait l’équivalent de l’Inland
Revenue. Environ 5 percent de ma tâche est de donner des conseil
techniques. Le reste de la journée j’explique à mes collègues des
procédures incompréhensibles, je les aide à trouver des directives qui
ne servent à rien, I cheer up the troops, je réattribue des dossiers que
“le système” a mal dirigé.

Curieusement j’aime aller au travail. J’ai l’impression que je suis payé
60 000$/an pour faire l’équivalent d’un Sudoku ou mots croisés.

3. Obviously, such environments are not always nearly as carefree for
members of the public who have to interact with such officials.

4. Obviously, the 4 percent figure would only be the case if no workers
surveyed felt their work was both useful and unfulfilling, which is
unlikely.

5. While it is quite rare for supervisors to tell workers directly they
are supposed to pretend to work, it does happen occasionally. One car
salesman wrote: “According to my superiors, if I’m being paid a salary,
I have to be doing ‘something’ and ‘pretend’ to be productive even
though there’s no real value to the work. So, I spend several hours a
day making phone calls to nobody. Does that make any sense?” Too much
honesty in such matters appears to be a profound taboo almost anywhere.
I remember once in graduate school, I had a gig doing research for a
Marxist professor who among many other things specialized in the
politics of workplace resistance. I figured if I could be honest with
anyone, it would be him, so after he had explained to me how the
timesheet worked I asked, “So how much can I lie? How many hours is it
okay to just make up?” He looked at me as if I’d just said I was a
starseed from another galaxy so I quickly changed the subject and
assumed the answer was “a discrete amount.”

6. Many workplaces are keenly aware of the dangers of easygoing
supervisors and take active measures to head them off. Those who work
counters in fast-food chains, which, of course, are in my terms
generally shit jobs and not bullshit jobs, often tell me that each
branch is carefully wired by closed-circuit TV to ensure that workers
with nothing to do are not allowed to just sit around relaxing; if they
are observed to do so by those monitoring in some central locations,
their supervisor is called up and chewed out.

7. Roy Baumeister, Sara Wotman, and Arlene Stillwell, “Unrequited Love:
On Heartbreak, Anger, Guilt, Scriptlessness, and Humiliation,” Journal
of Personality and Social Psychology 64, no. 3 (March 1993): 377–94. One
friend of mine who once had a prolonged affair with a married man noted
a similar difficulty—unlike the betrayed wife, there’s very little in
the way of cultural models telling the “other woman” how she’s supposed
to feel. She’s thinking of writing a book to begin to make up the gap. I
hope she does so.

8. Nouri, the software developer, provides an interesting insight,
suggesting that the hostility and mutual hatreds in a bullshit office
might actually be functional in inspiring workers to act at all. He
reports that while working in an obviously doomed banner ad company, an
enterprise that made him depressed and sick, “I was so bored that a
couple programmers snitched to management (excuse me, Scrum Master)
about my productivity. So he hostilely gave me a month to prove myself,
trying to accumulate evidence that I was missing doctor’s notices. In
two weeks, I outperformed the rest of the team combined, and the
company’s lead architect declared my code ‘perfect.’ Scrum Master was
suddenly all smiles and rainbows again, telling me the doctor’s notes
were of no concern.

“I advised him to continue insulting me and threatening my job, if he
wanted me to remain a high-performer. It was my twisted version of fun.
Like an idiot, he refused.

“Lesson: hate is a great motivator, at least when there’s no passion and
fun. Maybe explains a lot of workplace aggression. Picking fights with
someone at least gives you reason to carry on.”

9. Erich Fromm, The Anatomy of Human Destructiveness (New York: Holt,
Rinehart and Winston, 1973). Fromm’s prime example of a nonsexual sadist
is Joseph Stalin, and of a nonsexual necrophiliac, Adolf Hitler.

10. Lynn Chancer, Sadomasochism in Everyday Life: The Dynamics of Power
and Powerlessness (New Brunswick, NJ: Rutgers University Press, 1992).

11. Romance novels, for instance, tend to feature attractive men who
appear cruel and heartless but are ultimately revealed to be kindhearted
and decent instead. One might argue that BDSM practice, from a
submissive woman’s perspective, encodes the possibility of this
transformation as part of the structure of the event and under her own
ultimate control.

12. Article 23 of the UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights, for
example, states: “Everyone has the right to work, to free choice of
employment, to just and favorable conditions of work and to protection
against unemployment.” It also guarantees equal pay for equal work,
compensation adequate to support a family, and the right to form labor
unions. It says nothing about the purpose of the work itself.

13. The office was also “rife with bullying and deeply, deeply strange
office politics”—the usual sadomasochistic dynamics one can expect to
ensue in hierarchical environments, as usual, too, exacerbated by the
shared guilty knowledge that there’s nothing really at stake.

14. There is a happy ending to this one, at least temporarily: Rachel
reports she was soon after able to find work for a program teaching
remedial math to poor children. It is everything her insurance job is
not and pays well enough that she should be able to afford grad school.

15. Patrick Butler, “Thousands Have Died After Being Found Fit for Work,
DWP Figures Show,” Guardian (US), last modified August 27, 2015,
www.theguardian.com/society/2015/aug/27/thousands-died-after-fit-for-work-assessment-dwp-figures.

16. Mark: “Personally I often used to wish I wasn’t aware that my job
was bullshit. Kind of like how Neo in the Matrix movies may sometimes
have wished he hadn’t taken the red pill. I’d despair (and still do)
that I’m working in the public sector to help people, but I rarely if
ever help anyone. I also feel a sense of guilt that I’m paid by
taxpayers to do this.”

17. He adds: “Herbert Read’s ‘To hell with culture’ best describes this
situation.” I checked. It isn’t bad.

18. It is important to emphasize that in professional environments, the
ability to play the role is generally far more important than the
ability to actually do the work. Mathematician Jeff Schmidt in his
excellent Disciplined Minds (2001) carefully documents how the bourgeois
obsession with prioritizing form over content has played havoc with the
professions. Why is it, he asks, that Catch Me If You Can–style
imposters can often successfully pretend to be airline pilots or
surgeons without anyone noticing they have no qualifications for the
job? The answer he suggests is that it’s almost impossible to get fired
from a professional job—even pilot or surgeon—for mere incompetence, but
very easy to get fired for defiance of accepted standards of external
behavior, that is, for not properly playing the part. The imposters have
zero competence, but play the part perfectly; hence, they are much less
likely to be dismissed from their positions than, say, an accomplished
pilot or surgeon who openly defies the unspoken codes of external
comportment attendant on the role.

19. Psychological studies have shown that taking part in protests and
street actions, at least, tend to have overall health benefits, reducing
overall stress and with it rates of heart disease and other ailments:
John Drury, “Social Identity as a Source of Strength in Mass Emergencies
and Other Crowd Events,” International Journal of Mental Health 32, no.
4 (December 1, 2003): 77–93; also M. Klar and T. Kasser, “Some Benefits
of Being an Activist,” Political Psychology 30, no. 5 (2009): 755–77.
The study, however, focuses on street actions; it would be interesting
to see if this also extends to less embodied forms of protest.

20. Many, of course, then quit in horror and disgust. But we don’t know
the real numbers. Rachel suggested to me that many young people, unless
in expensive metropolises like London, were less inclined to stick it
out than their parents had been simply because the cost of housing and
life in general is so ridiculously inflated that nowadays even an
entry-level corporate job is not going to guarantee stability and
security anymore.

Chapter 5: Why Are Bullshit Jobs Proliferating?

1. Louis D. Johnston, “History Lessons: Understanding the Declines in
Manufacturing,” MinnPost, last modified February 22, 2012,
www.minnpost.com/macro-micro-minnesota/2012/02/history-lessons-understanding-decline-manufacturing.

2. It would be vain to try to list them all but Reich’s book was The
Work of Nations (1992), and the classic statement on immaterial labor is
Maurizio Lazzarato (1996), though it became famous largely through Hardt
and Negr’s Empire (1994, 2000), which predicted the revolt of the
computer geeks.

3. There are many such studies. For one example, see Western and Olin
Wright 1994.

4. I had a friend who was addicted to heroin and went on a methadone
program. Bored of waiting for doctors to decide he was “ready” to begin
reducing his dosage, he started pouring off a little of the drug each
day until, some months later, he was able to announce triumphantly that
he was clean. His doctor was furious, and told him only professionals
have the competence to decide when he should have done this. It turns
out the program was funded on the basis of the number of patients they
served and had no incentive to actually get anyone off drugs.

One should never underestimate the power of institutions to try to
preserve themselves. One explanation for the thirty-year impasse of the
Israeli-Palestinian “peace process”—if at this point one can even call
it that—is that on both sides, there are now powerful institutional
structures which would lose their entire raison d’être if the conflict
ended, but also, a vast “peace apparatus” of NGOs and UN bureaucrats
whose careers have become entirely dependent on maintaining the fiction
that a “peace process” is, in fact, going on.

5. UKIP doesn’t count.

6. To head off any possible accusations of essentialism: I am proposing
these three levels as modes of analysis, and not suggesting the
existence of autonomous levels of social reality that in any sense exist
in their own right.

7. I sometimes ask my students, when discussing Marx, “What was the
unemployment level in ancient Greece? Or medieval China?” The answer, of
course, is zero. Having a large proportion of the population who wish to
work, but cannot, appears to be peculiar to what Marx liked to call “the
capitalist mode of production.” But it appears to be, like public debt,
a structural feature of the system which must nonetheless be treated as
if it were a problem to be solved.

8. To take a random example, the famous March on Washington in 1963, at
which Martin Luther King gave his “I Have a Dream” speech, was
officially called the “March on Washington for Jobs and Freedom: demands
included not just antidiscrimination measures but also a full-employment
economy, jobs programs, and a minimum-wage increase” (Touré F. Reed,
“Why Liberals Separate Race from Class,” Jacobin 8.22.2015,
www.jacobinmag.com/2015/08/bernie-sanders-black-lives-matter-civil-rights-movement/),
accessed June 10, 2017.

9. David Sirota, “Mr. Obama Goes to Washington,” Nation, June, 26, 2006.

10. Of course, some might argue that Obama was being disingenuous here,
and downplaying the political power of the private health industry, in
the same way that politicians justified bank bailouts by claiming it was
in the interest of millions of minor bank employees who might otherwise
have been laid off—a concern they most certainly do not evince when,
say, transit or textile workers are faced with unemployment. But the
very fact that he was willing to make the argument is revealing.

11. To those who accuse me of being a paranoid conspiracy theorist for
suggesting that government plays any conscious role in creating and
maintaining bullshit jobs, I hereby rest my case. Unless you think Obama
was lying about his true motives (in which case, who exactly is the
conspiracy theorist?), we must allow that those governing us are, in
fact, aware that “market solutions” create inefficiencies, and
unnecessary jobs in particular, and at least in certain contexts look
with favor on them for that very reason.

12. I might note in passing that the same is true of many orthodox
Marxists, who argue that since by Marx’s definition all labor within the
capitalist mode of production must either produce surplus value, or aid
in the reproduction of the apparatus of value-creation, the appearance
that a job is useless must be an illusion based on a false folk theory
of social value on the part of the jobholder. This is really just as
much a statement of faith as the libertarian insistence that the market
can never be responsible for social problems. One might argue whether
this position was really held by Marx but even this is basically a
theological debate. It ultimately depends on whether one accepts the
premise that capitalism is a totalizing system: that is, that within a
capitalist system social value is determined only by the market system.
I will discuss this further in the next chapter.

13. This is then preemptive. I acknowledge that historically, for an
author to head off obvious objections almost never succeeds in stopping
future critics from raising those objections anyway; generally, they
just pretend their objections were never anticipated and ignore any
counterarguments to them that might have been made. But I figured it was
worth a try.

14. www.economist.com/blogs/freeexchange/2013/08/labourlabor-markets-0.
Accessed April 1, 2017.

15. For instance, it contained glaring flaws in basic logic: the author
attempted to refute my argument that giving workers security and leisure
time will often result in social unrest by noting unrest by workers who
did not have security and leisure time. Even those who have received no
training in formal logic, and therefore have never heard of the logical
fallacy of affirming the consequent, but still have basic common sense,
are generally aware that the statement “if A then B” is not the same as
“if B then A.” As Lewis Carroll adroitly put it ,“You might as well say
‘I see what I eat’ is the same as ‘I eat what I see’ ”.

16. The piece has no byline.

17. If you ask: “Are you really saying the market is always right?” they
will often reply, “Yes, I am saying the market is always right.”

18. Instead, it’s always assumed the burden of proof is on those who
question such assertions.

19. I note in passing—and this will be important later—that while the
number of administrators has gone up, the real explosion has been in
administrative staff. This figure does not, I should emphasize, refer to
caterers or cleaners, who were, in fact, being largely outsourced during
this period, but to administrative underlings.

20. Most of the changes that did directly affect teaching, such as, say,
class chat rooms, were managed by the (proportionally declining numbers
of) teachers themselves.

21. Some phrases generated by the random Financial Bullshit Generator,
accessed July 4, 2017,
www.makebullshit.com/financial-bullshit-generator.php.

22. There are other enterprises, of course, that are basically
fraudulent in nature—or, in some cases, are dedicated to providing the
means for others to commit fraud. A number of testimonials I received
were from college paper writers. There have always been smart students
or graduates willing to pick up a little cash writing term papers for
lazy classmates, but in America in recent decades, this has coalesced
into an entire industry, coordinated on a national level, employing
thousands of full-time paper writers. One of them suggested to me that
the industry was the predictable result of the convergence of
credentialism—the fact that one now needed a degree of some kind to gain
access to almost all desirable jobs in America—and business logic.

Barry: When I first started this work, I imagined I would be constantly
learning fascinating, new information about a broad array of subjects.
While I have had the opportunity to write the rare, interesting essay on
queer theory or the history of Roman blood sport, I’ve found that I’m
largely writing countless papers about business and marketing.

After some consideration, this makes a lot of sense to me. Higher
education is constantly justified on the basis that it is an investment
in your future. The crippling load of student debt is worth it because
it is going to allow for a stable six-figure income someday. It’s hard
for me to imagine that many folks are studying to get a Bachelor of
Business Administration because it’s their passion—I’m pretty sure
they’re just jumping through the hoops to get the degree that they see
as their path to a high-paying job. As for my clients, I think they see
themselves as willing to increase their level of investment in return
for a lower workload and guaranteed good marks. The amount I charge for
writing a few key term papers is only a tiny fraction of the average
tuition cost.

This makes sense to me, too. If you’re actually paying attention in
business courses when the professor tells you that it’s normal and even
admirable to attempt to get the greatest benefit for the least amount of
investment, and that same professor then assigns you a paper, there’s
really no reason not to hire someone else to write it if that’s the most
efficient thing to do.

23. For the record, I don’t know which of the four it was.

24. Another reason sometimes cited for the multiplication of unnecessary
levels of executive or administrative staff is protection from the
threat of lawsuits. Here’s the account of one bank employee, Aaron:
“It’s common to now see ‘Chief of Staff’ roles in large financial
institutions . . . they are simply an ineffectual buffer between senior
managers and any potential litigation from regulators or disgruntled
employees. This buffer never works because in litigation, the plaintiff
will always name the senior manager in the court papers as this
maximizes the likelihood the case gets settled to avoid embarrassment.
So what do the Chiefs of Staff end up doing? Well, they tend to organize
meetings with senior managers and their leadership teams and commission
lots of pointless management consultant surveys to try and work out why
morale is so low (a question that could be answered much more easily by
simply asking employees what they think. You often see them organizing
charity days and puff pieces in newspapers or journals.” According to
Aaron, HR staff are now less likely to fulfill such roles, as they, too,
fear legal liability. Clearly, the situation varies in different banks.

25. It’s probably relevant, admittedly, that the economics department in
my college was entirely dominated by Marxists; the phrase goes back at
least to Perry Anderson (1974).

26. Much of this argument and several of the examples are taken from the
first chapter of Graeber, Utopia of Rules, 3–44.

27. Of course, this is not the way things are represented, and,
naturally, in any branch of industry defined as “creative,” whether
software development or graphic design, production is typically
outsourced to small groups (the celebrated Silicon Valley start-ups) or
individuals (casualized independent contractors) who do work
autonomously. But such people are often largely uncompensated. For a
good recent critical history of managerialism, see Hanlon, 2016.

28. Definitions of feudalism vary, from any economic system based on
tribute-taking, to the specific system prevalent in Northern Europe
during the High Middle Ages, in which land was granted in exchange for
military service in ostensibly voluntary relations of vassalage—a system
which outside Europe is documented mainly in Japan. From this
perspective most other Asian empires and kingdoms operated with, as
Weber called them “patrimonial prebendal” systems where lords or
important officials collected the income from a certain territory but
did not necessarily occupy or directly administer it, an approach
European kings also later attempted to impose when they had the power.
All this could be endlessly dissected but here I really only want to
make the point that in such systems, where there are people who are
primary producers, and others whose basic job it is to move those things
around, the latter almost invariably end up organized into very
elaborate chains of command. The nineteenth-century Ganda kingdom in
East Africa might seem a particularly telling example in this regard:
all farming and most productive work was done by women; most men, as a
result, ended up part of an elaborate hierarchy of titled officials
running from the village to the king, or as flunkies or retainers to
such officials. When too many idle men accumulated, rulers would start
wars or sometimes simply round thousands up and massacre them. (For the
best recent synthesis on feudalism from a Marxist perspective, Wood,
2002; on the Ganda, Ray, 1991.)

29. Cited as an anonymous source in Alex Preston, “The War Against
Humanities in Britain’s Universities,” Guardian, Education Section, 1,
March 29, 2015.

30. One might argue that Marcel Duchamp, by placing a urinal in a
gallery and declaring it a work of art, opened the door to the entry of
managerialism into the arts. At any rate he eventually became horrified
by the door he’d opened up, and spent the last decades of his life
playing chess, which, he argued, was also one of the few things he could
do that could not possibly be commodified.

31. Many suggest to me one reason for the dishwater mediocrity or even
plain incoherence of so many contemporary movie scripts is that each of
these supernumeraries will typically insist on changing at least a line
or two, just to be able to say they had some influence on the final
product. I first heard about this when after seeing the endlessly
terrible 2008 remake of The Day the Earth Stood Still. The entire plot
seemed to be designed to lead up to a moment of realization, where the
alien comes to understand the true nature of humanity (that they are not
basically evil, just very bad at handling grief). Yet when the moment
came, the alien never actually said this. I asked a friend in the
industry how this could have happened and he assured me that the line I
was expecting was almost certainly in the original script; some useless
executives must have intervened to change it. “You see there are usually
dozens of these guys hovering around any production and every one of
them will feel they have to jump in and change around at least one
line—or else what’s the excuse for their even being there?”

32. Joseph Campbell was an historian of religion whose book The Hero
with a Thousand Faces argued that all hero myths have the same basic
plot. The book was an enormous influence on George Lucas in developing
the plots for the original Star Wars trilogy. While Campbell’s argument
for a universal archetypal hero narrative is now considered at best
something of an entertaining curio by scholars of epic or heroic myth,
the analysis he offers probably would be valid now for Hollywood movies,
since almost all screenwriters and producers are familiar with the book
and attempt to use it in designing plots.

33. Holly Else, “Billions Lost in Bids to Secure EU Research Funding,”
Times Higher Education Supplement, October 6, 2016, accessed June 23,
2017.
www.timeshighereducation.com/news/billions-lost-in-bids-to-secure-european-union-research-funding#survey-answer.

34. “Of Flying Cars and the Declining Rate of Profit,” Baffler, no. 19
(Spring 2012): 66–84, with an expanded version in Graeber, Utopia of
Rules, 105–148.

35. These titles were, in fact, produced by using the random bullshit
job title generator at the website BullShit Job,
www.bullshitjob.com/title.

36. The argument of this paragraph is a very abbreviated version of the
argument of the introductory essay in Graeber, Utopia of Rules, 33–44.

Chapter 6: Why Do We as a Society Not Object to the Growth of Pointless
Employment?

1. For instance, at the height of the Greek debt crisis, public opinion
in Germany was almost unanimous that Greek debt should not be forgiven
because Greek workers were entitled and lazy. This was countered by
statistics showing Greek workers actually put in longer hours than
German ones; which, in turn, was countered by the argument that this
might be true on paper but Greek workers slacked off on the job. At no
point did anyone suggest that German workers were working too hard,
creating an overproduction problem that could only be solved by lending
foreign countries money to be able to import their goods, let alone that
the Greek ability to enjoy life was in any way admirable or a model for
others. To take another example, when, in the 1990s, the French
Socialist Party ran on the platform of a thirty-five-hour workweek, I
remember being struck by the fact that no American news source I was
able to find that deigned to mention this fact suggested that reducing
working hours might be seen as, let alone be, good in itself, but only
presented it as a tactic for reducing unemployment. In other words,
allowing people to work less could only be treated as a social good if
it allowed more people to be working.

2. Technically the measure is “marginal utility,” the degree to which
the consumer finds an additional unit of the good useful in this way;
hence, if one already has three bars of soap stockpiled in one’s house,
or for that matter three houses, how much additional utility is added by
a fourth. For the best critique of marginal utility as a theory of
consumer preference, see Steve Keen, Debunking Economics, 44–47.

3. And I should note just for the sake of clarity that most of those who
embrace the labor theory of value do not make this argument; some value
comes from nature, as Marx himself, the most famous advocate of the
labor theory of value, did occasionally point out.

4. Of course, this is exactly the position also taken by the most
radical free market libertarians.

5. Since reproduction is technically “the production of production,”
then maintaining the physical infrastructure or other elements exploited
by capitalism would also count.

6. Similarly, in the domain of values, when market comparisons can be
made, they are assumed to be somehow incidental, not a reflection of the
object’s true worth. No one would actually insist that a Damien Hirst
shark is worth, say, two hundred thousand Vipassana meditation retreats,
or a Vipassana retreat, one hundred fudge sundaes. It just happens to
come out that way.

7. Civil servants in particular would favor the term “help” over
“value,” though its use was by no means limited to civil servants.

8. See Graeber 2013:84–87.

9. I’m assuming that there is no genre of music, art, etc., that doesn’t
cause more happiness for some than it annoys others. I could be wrong.

10. Some Belgian friends told me the net effects were extremely
beneficial, as almost all major parties were committed to the then
European-wide consensus about the need for austerity, but the lack of a
government in Belgium at that critical moment meant reforms were not
carried out, and the Belgian economy ended up growing substantially
faster than its neighbors’. It’s also worth noting that Belgium does
have seven different regional governments that were unaffected.

11. Caitlin Huston, “Uber IPO Prospects May Be Helped by Resignation of
CEO Travis Kalanick,” MarketWatch, last modified June 22, 2017,
www.marketwatch.com/story/uber-ipo-prospects-may-be-helped-by-resignation-of-ceo-travis-kalanick-2017-06-21.

12. Rutger Bregman, Utopia for Realists: The Case for Universal Basic
Income, Open Borders, and a 15-Hour Workweek (New York: Little, Brown,
2017).

Even police strikes rarely have the anticipated effects. In December
2015 New York police carried out a work stoppage for all but “urgent”
police business; there was no effect on crime rate, but city revenues
plummeted owing to the lack of fines for traffic violation and similar
infractions. The complete disappearance of police in a major city,
either owing to a full strike, or in one documented case in Amsterdam
during World War II, mass arrest by German occupiers, tends to lead to a
rise in property crime like burglary, but leave violent crime
unaffected. In rural areas with some tradition of self-governance, like
the part of Madagascar where I lived between 1989 and 1991, the
withdrawal of police due to IMF austerity measures made almost no
difference at all—when I visited again twenty years later people were
almost universally convinced that violent crime had increased sharply
since the police had returned.

13. Benjamin B. Lockwood, Charles G. Nathanson, and E. Glen Weyl,
“Taxation and the Allocation of Talent,” Journal of Political Economy
125, no. 5 (October 2017): 1635–82,
www.journals.uchicago.edu/doi/full/10.1086/693393. The reference to
Marketers is however taken from an earlier (2012) version of the same
paper, with the same title, published at
https://eighty-thousand-hours-wp-production.s3.amazonaws.com/2014/12/TaxationAndTheAllocationOfTalent_preview.pdf,
16.

14. Eilis Lawlor, Helen Kersley, and Susan Steed, A Bit Rich:
Calculating the Value to Society of Different Professions (London: New
Economics Foundation, 2009),
http://b.3cdn.net/nefoundation/8c16eabdbadf83ca79_ojm6b0fzh.pdf. I have
standardized and averaged out some of the salaries, which the original
report gave sometimes as hourly wages, sometime as yearly salaries, but
in the latter case, usually as ranges.

15. See, for instance, Gordon B. Lindsay, Ray M. Merrill, and Riley J.
Hedin, “The Contribution of Public Health and Improved Social Conditions
to Increased Life Expectancy: An Analysis of Public Awareness,” Journal
of Community Medicine & Health Education 4 (2014): 311–17, which
contrasts the received scientific understanding of such matters with
popular perception, which assumes improvements are almost entirely due
to doctors.
https://www.omicsonline.org/open-access/the-contribution-of-public-health-and-improved-social-conditions-to-increased-life-expectancy-an-analysis-of-public-awareness-2161-0711-4-311.php?aid=35861.

16. Another exception would be highly paid athletes or entertainers.
Many get paid so much they are often held out as avatars of bullshit,
but I would tend to disagree. If such people succeed in bringing
happiness or excitement into others’ lives, why not? Obviously,
questions could be raised about how much more they are responsible for
that happiness and excitement than the teams surrounding them, support
staff, and the like, most of whom are paid far less.

17. If it had anything to do with the dangers of the job, on the other
hand, the highest-paid workers in America would be either loggers or
fishermen, and in Britain, farmers.

18. One (in my opinion rather obtuse) economist and blogger named Alex
Tabarrok wrote a response to my original bullshit jobs piece that
claimed my point about the inverse relation of pay and social benefit
was “a great example of faulty economic reasoning,” since, he said, I
was simply talking about the diamonds-water paradox (which goes back to
the Middle Ages, and Adam Smith famously used to propose a distinction
between use value and exchange value), that he said had been “solved” a
century ago with the introduction of the concept of marginal utility.
Actually, my impression was that it had been “solved” at least as far
back as Galileo, but the bizarre thing about his claim is that I hadn’t
engaged in economic reasoning at all, since I didn’t propose any
explanation for the inverse relation, but just pointed out that it
exists
(http://marginalrevolution.com/marginalrevolution/2013/10/bs-jobs-and-bs-economics.html).
How can simply pointing out a fact be faulty reasoning? The example of
the relative supply of nurses is drawn from Peter Frase’s reply to that
piece (www.jacobinmag.com/2013/10/the-ethic-of-marginal-value/); for the
glut of lawyers, see, for instance, L. M. Sixel, “A Glut of Lawyers Dims
Job Prospects for Many,” Houston Chronicle online, last modified March
25, 2016,
http://wtonchronicle.com/business/article/A-glut-of-lawyers-dims-job-prospects-for-many-7099998.php.

I might note that Tabarrok’s ploy—take a simple empirical observation
and pretend it’s an economic argument, and then “refute” it—seems to be
common among bad economic bloggers; I once saw a simple observation I
had made that kindhearted merchants will sometimes give poor customers a
discount on necessities characterized as an attempted “refutation” of
economic theory, which the blogger then went on to disprove—as if
economists really believed no merchant ever did anything out of
kindness!

19. I first encountered the argument in G. A. Cohen, “Back to Socialist
Basics,” New Left Review, no. 207 (1994): 2–16, his critique of the
Labour Party manifesto. Various versions of it can be found in his other
work, notably in “Incentives, Inequality, and Community: The Tanner
Lectures on Human Values” (lecture, Stanford University, Stanford, CA,
May 21 and 23, 1991,
https://tannerlectures.utah.edu/_documents/a-to-z/c/cohen92.pdf).

20. Back in the 1990s, when I still used to argue with libertarians, I
found they would almost invariably justify inequality in terms of work.
If I would observe, say, that some disproportionate share of social
wealth was being distributed upward, a typical response would be along
the lines of “to me this just shows that some people are working harder,
or working smarter, than others.” This particular formulation always
stuck in my head because of the telltale slipperiness. One cannot, of
course, really argue that a CEO who makes a thousand times more than a
bus driver is working a thousand times harder, so you slip in
“smarter”—which implies “more productive” but, in fact, here just seems
to be “in a way for which you’re paid much more.” All that saves this
statement from absolutely meaningless circularity (they’re smart because
they’re rich because they’re smart, and on and on) is that it emphasizes
that (most of) the very rich do have jobs.

21. This is why the books they produce become ever shorter, more
simplistic, and less well researched.

22. Geoff Shullenberger, “The Rise of the Voluntariat,” Jacobin online,
last modified May 5, 2014,
www.jacobinmag.com/2014/05/the-rise-of-the-voluntariat.

23. Bertrand Russell puts it nicely in his essay “In Praise of
Idleness”: “What is work? Work is of two kinds: first, altering the
position of matter at or near the earth’s surface relatively to other
such matter; second, telling other people to do so. The first kind is
unpleasant and ill paid; the second is pleasant and highly paid.”
(1935:13).

24. Genesis 3.16. Hannah Arendt in The Human Condition (1958:107n53)
makes the argument that nowhere in the Bible is it suggested that work
itself is punishment for disobedience; God simply makes the labor more
harsh; others are simply reading Genesis through Hesiod. This might be
true, but it doesn’t really affect my argument; especially since
Christians writing and thinking on the subject have assumed that was the
meaning of the biblical passage for centuries. For instance, in 1664
Margaret Cavendish argued “neither can tennis be a pastime, for  . . .
there can be no recreation in sweaty labor; for it is laid as a curse
upon man, that they shall live by the sweat of their brows” (in Thomas
1999: 9). For the best discussion of the early Christian debates on Adam
and Eve, which argues that it was Saint Augustine who was really
responsible for the notion that all humans are tainted, and, hence,
cursed, because of original sin, see Pagels (1988).

25. Much of the next section is a summary of an earlier essay of mine,
“Manners, Deference, and Private Property” (1997), itself an abbreviated
version of my master’s thesis, The Generalization of Avoidance: Manners
and Possessive Individualism in Early Modern Europe (Chicago, 1987).
Some of the classic works on traditional Northern European marriage
patterns and life-cycle service include Hajnal (1965, 1982), Laslett
(1972, 1977, 1983, 1984), Stone (1977), Kassmaul (1981), and Wall
(1983); for a more recent survey of the state of the literature, see
Cooper (2005). The primary difference between Northern European and
Mediterranean marriage patterns from the Middle Ages through the Early
Modern period is that in the latter, while men also would often marry
late, women married much earlier, and life-cycle service was limited to
certain social and professional groups but in no sense a norm.

26. Nowadays, of course, the word “waiter” is used only for those who
“wait” tables at restaurants, a mainstay of the “service economy,” but
the term was still being used primarily for domestic servants—ranking
one step below the butler—in Victorian households. The word
“dumbwaiter,” for example, originally referred to the fact that servants
who brought food to the master’s table would often gossip about what
they overheard people saying around it; mechanical dumbwaiters performed
the same function but could not speak.

27. This is inaccurate. Most were apprenticed in early adolescence.

28. I have quoted it myself in the Manners paper (1997:716–17). The
translation goes back to: Charlotte A. Sneyd, A relation, or rather A
true account, of the island of England; with sundry particulars of the
customs of these people, and of the royal revenues under King Henry the
Seventh, about the year 1500, by an Italian, Camden Society volume
xxxvi, 1847, 14–15.

29. Susan Brigden, “Youth and the English Reformation,” Past & Present
95 (1982): 37–38.

30. In Renaissance England, for example, one frequent representative of
the king was a noble servant entitled the “Groom of the Stool,” because
he was in charge of emptying the king’s chamber pot (Starkey 1977).

31. My father, for example, was for most of his life a plate stripper in
offset photo lithography shops. At one point, while first learning my
medieval history, I was telling him about the guild system. “Yes,” he
said, “I served an apprenticeship, too. I retired as a ‘journeyman
printer.’ ” When I asked if there were any master printers, he said,
“No, we don’t have masters anymore. Well, unless you want to say that’s
the boss.”

32. Phillip Stubbes, Anatomie of Abuses, 1562. This line of objection,
of course, reached its peak with Malthus, who came to argue that the
working classes would thus tend to breed everyone into poverty, and
famously advocated fostering unsanitary conditions to kill them off.
Cazenove, who is cited later, was a disciple of Malthus.

33. K. Thomas 1976:221.

34. Max Weber’s (1905) arguments about the relation of Calvinism and the
origins of capitalism, I believe, should be understood in this light.
That there was some connection between Protestantism, an ethic of
self-disciplined work, and economic growth was considered self-evident
by many at the time (Tawney 1924) but few examine the confluence of the
three factors: Northern European life-cycle service, Protestantism, and
emerging capitalism, even though they appear to broadly coincide.

35. Thomas Carlyle, Past and Present (London: Chapman and Hall, 1843),
173–74. It is interesting to contrast Carlyle’s praise of work for
freeing the soul from cares to Nietzsche, who condemned it for that very
reason: “In the glorification of ‘work’ and the never-ceasing talk about
the ‘blessing of labor’ I see  . . . fear of everything individual. For
at the sight of work—that is to say, severe toil from morning till
night—we have the feeling that it is the best police, viz., that it
holds everyone in check and effectively hinders the development of
reason, of greed, and of desire for independence. For work uses up an
extraordinary proportion of nervous force, withdrawing it from
reflection, meditation, dreams, cares, love, and hatred” (Daybreak, 1881
[1911:176–77]). One wonders if this is a direct response to Carlyle.

36. Carlyle, Past and Present, 175. Much of the essay is a condemnation
of capitalism, as “Mammonism,” and like so many nineteenth-century works
sounds vaguely Marxist to the modern ear, even when it comes to
conservative conclusions: “Labor is not a devil, even while encased in
Mammonism; Labor is ever an imprisoned god, writhing unconsciously or
consciously to escape out of Mammonism!” (257).

37. John Cazenove, Outlines of Political Economy; Being a Plain and
Short View of the Laws Relating to the Production, Distribution and
Consumption of Wealth (London: P. Richardson, 1832), 21–22. As far as I
know, the first use of the labor theory of value to argue that workers
are exploited by their employers is found in a pamphlet called The
Rights of Nature Against the Usurpations of Establishments, written by
the British Jacobin John Thelwall in 1796.

38. From Edward Pessen, Most Uncommon Jacksonians: The Radical Leaders
of the Early Labor Movement (Albany, NY: SUNY Press, 1967), 174: Faler’s
(1981) study of the town of Lynn in Massachusetts from 1780 to 1860
documents at length the degree to which the labor theory of value formed
the framework of public debate for almost a century after the
Revolution.

39. Marx’s own works, for example, were little known in the US at the
time, though not completely unknown, since Marx himself was working as a
freelance newspaper opinion writer and would often publish columns in US
papers. Marx, in his capacity as head of the Workingmen’s Association,
also wrote directly to Lincoln with his own analysis of the American
situation a few years later, in 1865, and while Lincoln seems to have
read the letter, he had one of his adjuncts respond.

40. Already in 1845, New York state assemblyman Mike Walsh was arguing
along explicitly anticapitalist lines: “What is capital, but that
all-grasping power which has been wrung, by fraud, avarice, and malice
from the labor of this and all ages past.” In Noel Ignatiev, How the
Irish Became White (New York: Routledge, 2008), 149.

41. E. P. Goodwin, Home Missionary Sermon, 1880, in Josiah Strong, Our
Country: Its Possible Future and Its Present Crisis (New York: Baker &
Taylor, 1891), 159. Denis Kearney was a California labor leader of the
time, now remembered largely for his campaigning against Chinese
immigration, and Robert Ingersoll, the author of well-known refutations
of the Bible, is now mainly known secondhand through Clarence Darrow’s
arguments against the literal interpretation of Genesis in the play
Inherit the Wind, which appear to be taken directly from Ingersoll’s
writings. I can add a personal testimony here: my own grandfather
Gustavus Adolphus (“Dolly”) Graeber, who, owing to my family’s
peculiarly long generations, was born before the US Civil War and worked
as a musician for many years along the Western frontier at exactly the
time Goodwin was writing—he is reputed to be the man who introduced the
mandolin into American music—was, my father once told me, “an Ingersoll
man” and, hence, a fervent atheist. He was never a Marxist, but my
father became one later.

42. The movie Treasure of the Sierra Madre is based on a novel of the
same name by B. Traven, the pseudonym for a German anarchist novelist
who fled his own country and lived most of the years of his life in
southern Mexico. His real identity remains the object of speculation to
this day.

43. Thus, for instance, when in 1837 the group of businessmen from
Amherst, Massachusetts, proposed to create a limited-liability carriage
company, the proposal was opposed by a petition by journeymen on the
grounds that “as journeymen, they looked forward to being their own
masters when they would not have to relinquish to others the value they
created,” stating “ ‘incorporations put means into the hands of
inexperienced capitalists, to take from us the profits of our art, which
has cost us years of labor to obtain, and which we consider to be our
exclusive privilege to enjoy’ ” (Hanlon 2016:57). Ordinarily such
requests were only approved if the company was dedicated to creating and
maintaining public works of an obviously useful nature such as a
railroad or canal.

44. Durrenberger and Doukas 2008:216–17.

45. 1974:246.

46. There is some debate over the relative weight, in medieval Christian
theology, of the degree to which work was seen as an imitation of divine
creation, and as a means of perfecting the self (see the discussion in
Ehmer and Lis 2009:10–15), but both principles appear to have been
present from the very beginning.

47. Classic studies include Kraus, Côté, and Keltner 2010, and Stellar,
Manzo, Kraus, and Keltner 2011.

48. As a result underlings will also tend to care more about their
superiors than their superiors will care about them, and this extends to
almost any relation of structural inequality: men and women, rich and
poor, black and white, and so on. It has always seemed to me this is one
of the main forces that allows such inequalities to continue. (I’ve
discussed this in various places, but the curious reader might consult
the second chapter of Graeber, Utopia of Rules, 68–72.)

49. From this perspective, for instance, money, markets, finance are
just ways of strangers alerting us to what they care about, because we
care that caring is directed appropriately; which implies, in turn, that
contemporary banking is simply a bad form of caring labor, insofar as it
aims it in the wrong direction.

50. The book was eventually renamed Crack Capitalism (2010), which I’ve
always felt was a far inferior title.

51. One oft-quoted passage from Studs Terkel’s Working: “Unless a guy’s
a nut, he never thinks about work or talks about it. Maybe about
baseball or about getting drunk the other night or he got laid or he
didn’t get laid. I’d say one out of a hundred really get excited about
work” (1972:xxxiv); but at the same time, from the same testimony,
“somebody has to do this work. If my kid ever goes to college, I just
want him to have a little respect” (1972:xxxv).

52. Gini and Sullivan 1987:649, 651, 654.

53. Noel Ignatiev’s How the Irish Became White (1995) is the classic
study of this phenomenon.

54. The formula was later reduced to “the greatest good for the greatest
number,” but Bentham’s original theory was based on hedonistic
calculation and that’s what Carlyle was responding to.

55. Carlyle 1843:134.

56. Ibid.

Chapter 7: What Are the Political Effects of Bullshit Jobs, and Is There
Anything That Can Be Done About This Situation?

1. Matthew Kopka, “Bailing Out Wall Street While the Ship of State is
Sinking? (Part 2),” The Gleaner, January 25, 2010,
http://jamaica-gleaner.com/gleaner/20100125/news/news5.html, accessed
July 22, 2017. At the time, one frequently circulated claim was that
autoworkers were making as much as $75 an hour, but this was based on an
industry PR statement that took the total costs of all wages, benefits,
and pensions for all workers, and divided them by the total number of
hours worked. Obviously, if one calculated by these means, almost any
worker in any industry could be represented as getting two or three
times his or her actual hourly wage.

2. The second reason was that as factory workers they were all
concentrated in the same place, which made it easy to organize together.
This meant that they could threaten strikes that would have a serious
effect on the economy.

3. Eli Horowitz, “No Offense Meant to Individuals Who Work With Bovine
Feces,”
http://rustbeltphilosophy.blogspot.co.uk/2013/08/no-offense-meant-to-individuals-who.html,
accessed August 31, 2013.

4. What follows is drawn largely from an essay that appeared in long
format as “Introduction: The Political Metaphysics of Stupidity.” In The
Commoner (www.thecommoner.org.uk), Spring 2005, and shorter format in
Harper’s as “Army of Altruists: On the Alienated Right to Do Good,”
Harper’s, January 2007, 31–38.

5. Insofar as there are not quite enough children of privilege to go
around—since elites almost never give birth to enough offspring to
reproduce themselves demographically—the jobs are likely to go to the
most remarkable children of immigrants. Executives with Bank of America,
or Enron, when facing a similar demographic problem, are much more
likely to recruit from poorer white folk like themselves. This is partly
because of racism; partly, too, because corporations tend to encourage a
broadly anti-intellectual climate themselves. It is well known at Yale,
where I once worked, that executive recruiters tend to prefer to hire
Yale’s “B” students, since they are more likely to be people “they’ll
feel comfortable with.”

6. There has been a great deal of effort to normalize the idea that
caring tasks can or should be carried out by machines, but I don’t think
it has been or really could be successful in the long run.

7. It is interesting to note in this context that Vonnegut had, in fact,
been enrolled for a master’s degree in anthropology at the University of
Chicago immediately after the war, though he never completed his
dissertation. This no doubt explains why one of the main characters in
the book is an anthropologist. Perhaps if he’d studied harder, he’d have
realized that his premise—that workers would not be able to handle too
much leisure—was profoundly flawed. (Ray Fogelson, who was there at the
time, told me he returned many years later with a thesis so obviously
dashed together it left the department in a quandary, so they decided to
grant him a degree, instead, for Cat’s Cradle.)

8. The most likely at #702 is Telemarketer; the least, at #1,
Recreational Therapist; Anthropologists such as myself are fairly safe
at #32. See Frey and Osborne (2017)—the original, online version of the
paper appeared in 2013, and received a good deal of news coverage at the
time.

9. Stanislaw Lem, Memoirs of a Space Traveler: The Further Reminiscences
of Ijon Tichy (Evanston, IL: Northwestern University Press), 1981 [1971]
19–20.

10. Lem was writing in still-Socialist Poland in the 1970s; but for what
it’s worth, his satire of Stalinism is just as merciless. On another
journey, Ijon Tichy finds himself in a planet governed by a vast
irrigation bureaucracy that has become so caught up in their mission
that they have developed the ideology that humans are naturally evolving
into fish. The inhabitants are forced to practice “breathing water” for
increasing numbers of hours every day.

11. Bear in mind that, averaged over a year, even medieval serfs did not
work even close to a forty-hour week.

12. I’m not going to dignify here arguments put forward in some quarters
that reducing hours of employment will lead to an increase in crime,
unhealthy practices, or other negative social effects. I’m sure
identical arguments could have been made against freeing slaves, and
likely were. I see them as having an equivalent moral standing. How is
arguing that people should be forced to work forty hours a week they
would not otherwise have to work because they might otherwise drink,
smoke, or commit crimes any different from arguing that the entire
population should be placed in prison for an equivalent amount of time
as a form of preventative detention?

13. One might call it “human production,” and I have done so elsewhere;
but in this context, even that seems to hit the wrong note.

14. No doubt one could quibble over who received the most money from
whom in what circumstances, but it was Bill Clinton who presided over
the repeal of Glass-Steagall, thus “liberalizing” finance and opening
the way to the 2008–09 crisis, and Tony Blair in the UK who first
introduced tuition in the British universities.

15. Frank 2016.

16. Brown 1983.

17. Gorz’s actual words: “The search for higher productivity would lead
to the standardization and industrialization of such activities,
particularly those involving the feeding, minding, raising and education
of children. The last enclave of individual or communal autonomy would
disappear; socialization, ‘commodification’ and preprogramming would be
extended to the last vestiges of self-determined and self-regulated
life. The industrialization, through home computers, of physical and
psychical care and hygiene, children’s education, cooking or sexual
technique is precisely designed to generate capitalist profits from
activities still left to individual fantasy” (Gorz 1997:84, originally
published in French in 1980, which makes it really quite prophetic). The
more specific engagement with the Wages for Housework movement is in
Critique of Economic Reason 2010:126, 161–64, 222).

18. The details can be found in Sarath Davala, etc. Basic Income: A
Transformative Policy for India (London: Bloomsbury Academic Press,
2015).

19. For the most thorough recent exploration of the current arguments
for basic income, see Standing (2017).

20. In fact, in some ways, they might have to be expanded. One could
make the argument UBI wouldn’t work with a rent-based economy because,
say, if most homes were rented, landlords would just double rents to
grab the additional income. At the very least controls would have to be
imposed.

21. This is also why conditional versions of the same program, or
guaranteed jobs programs, are in no sense variations on—let alone
“improved versions of”—the same thing. The key to UBI is the
unconditional element, which allows for a massive reduction of the role
of government intrusion in citizens’ lives. These supposedly “modified”
or “improved” versions either will not do this, or will have the
opposite effect.

22. Obviously, moral philosophy tends to assume that the “free rider”
problem is a fundamental question of social justice, outweighing
considerations of human freedom, and therefore usually concludes that it
would be justifiable to set up a system of surveillance and coercion so
as to ensure that not even a small number of people live off of others’
work (unless they’re rich, in which case that’s usually somehow totally
okay). My own position, which is the typical Libertarian Socialist
position, is, “So what if they do?”

23. I never met Foucault, but I base my descriptions on some of those
who did.

24. It is sometimes said that Foucault never defines “power” and it’s
true that he was often slightly coy about the matter, but when he did,
he defined power as “a set of actions on other actions,” and its
exercise as “acting on another’s actions” (1982:789). This is,
surprisingly, closer to the Parsonian tradition than anything else.

25. Foucault 1988:18–19.


Bibliography

Ackroyd, Stephen, and Paul Thompson. Organizational Misbehaviour.
London: Sage, 1999.

Anderson, Perry. Passages from Antiquity to Feudalism. London: Verso
Press, 1974.

Applebaum, Herbert. The Concept of Work: Ancient, Medieval, and Modern
(SUNY Series in the Anthropology of Work). Albany, NY: SUNY Press, 1992.

Arendt, Hannah. The Human Condition. Chicago: University of Chicago
Press, 1958.

Baumeister, Roy, Sara Wotman, and Arlene Stillwell. “Unrequited Love: On
Heartbreak, Anger, Guilt, Scriptlessness, and Humiliation.” Journal of
Personality and Social Psychology 64, no. 3 (1993): 377–94.

Beder, Sharon. Selling the Work Ethic: From Puritan Pulpit to Corporate
PR. London: Zed Books, 2000.

Black, Bob. “The Abolition of Work.” The Abolition of Work and Other
Essays. Port Townsend, WA: Loompanics, 1986.

Bloch, Maurice. Anthropology and the Cognitive Challenge. Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press, 2012.

Braverman, Harry. Labor and Monopoly Capital: The Degradation of Work in
the Twentieth Century. New York: Monthly Review Press, 1974.

Bregman, Rutger. Utopia for Realists: The Case for Universal Basic
Income, Open Borders, and a 15-Hour Workweek. Amsterdam: The
Correspondent, 2016.

Brigden, Susan. “Youth and the English Reformation.” Past & Present 95
(1982): 37–67.

Broucek, Francis. “The Sense of Self.” Bulletin of the Menninger Clinic
41 (1977): 85–90.

______. “Efficacy in Infancy: A Review of Some Experimental Studies and
Their Possible Implications for Clinical Theory.” International Journal
of Psycho-Analysis 60 (January 1, 1979): 311–16.

Brown, Wilmette. Black Women and the Peace Movement. Bristol, UK:
Falling Wall Press, 1983.

Brygo, Julien, and Olivier Cyran. Boulots de Merde! Enquête sur
l’utilité et la nuisance sociales des métiers. Paris: La Découverte,
2016.

Budd, John W. The Thought of Work. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press,
2011.

Carlyle, Thomas. Past and Present. London: Chapman and Hall, 1843.

Chancer, Lynn. Sadomasochism in Everyday Life: The Dynamics of Power and
Powerlessness. New Brunswick, NJ: Rutgers University Press, 1992.

Clark, Alice. Working Life of Women in the Seventeenth Century. London:
George Routledge and Sons, 1919.

Cooper, Sheila McIsaac. “Service to Servitude? The Decline and Demise of
Life-Cycle Service in England.” History of the Family 10 (2005): 367–86.

Davala, Sarath, Renana Jhabrala, Soumya Kapor, et al. Basic Income: A
Transformative Policy for India. London: Bloomsbury Academic Press,
2015.

Doukas, Dimitra. Worked Over: The Corporate Sabotage of an American
Community. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 2003.

Durrenberger, E. Paul, and Dimitra Doukas. “Gospel of Wealth, Gospel of
Work: Counterhegemony in the U.S. Working Class,” American
Anthropologist (new series) 110, no. 2 (2008): 214–24.

Ehmer, Josef, and Catharina Lis. “Introduction: Historical Studies in
Perception of Work.” In The Idea of Work in Europe from Antiquity to
Modern Times, edited by Ehmer and Lis, 33–70. Farnham, UK: Ashgate,
2009.

Ehrenreich, Barbara. Fear of Falling: The Inner Life of the Middle
Class. New York: Pantheon, 1989.

Ehrenreich, Barbara, and John Ehrenreich. “The Professional-Managerial
Class.” In Between Labor and Capital, edited by Paul Walker. Boston:
South End Press, 1979, 5–45.

Evans-Pritchard, E. E. The Nuer: A Description of the Modes of
Livelihood and Political Institutes of a Nilotic People. Oxford:
Clarendon Press, 1940.

Faler, Paul G. Mechanics and Manufacturers in the Early Industrial
Revolution: Lynn, Massachusetts, 1780–1860. Albany, NY: State University
of New York Press, 1981.

Finley, Moses I. The Ancient Economy. Berkeley: University of California
Press, 1973.

Fleming, Peter. The Mythology of Work: How Capitalism Persists Despite
Itself. London: Pluto Press, 2015.

Ford, Martin. The Rise of the Robots: Technology and the Threat of Mass
Unemployment. London: Oneworld, 2015.

Foucault, Michel. “The Subject and Power.” Critical Inquiry 8, no. 4
(1982): 777–95.

________. The Final Foucault. Cambridge, MA: MIT Press, 1988.

Frank, Thomas. Listen Liberal, Or What Ever Happened to the Party of the
People? New York: Henry Holt, 2016.

Frayne, David. The Refusal of Work: The Theory and Practice of
Resistance to Work. London: Zed Books, 2015.

Frey, Carl B., and Michael A. Osborne. “The Future of Employment: How
Susceptible Are Jobs to Computerisation?” Technological Forecasting and
Social Change 114 (2017): 254–80.

Fromm, Erich. The Anatomy of Human Destructiveness. New York: Henry
Holt, 1973.

Galbraith, John Kenneth. American Capitalism: The Concept of
Countervailing Power. Harmondsworth, UK: Penguin, 1963.

________. The New Industrial State. Harmondsworth, UK: Penguin, 1967.

________. The Affluent Society. Harmondsworth, UK: Penguin, 1969.

________. “On Post-Keynesian Economics.” Journal of Post-Keynesian
Economics 1, no. 1 (1978): 8–11.

Gini, Al. “Work, Identity and Self: How We Are Formed by the Work We
Do.” Journal of Business Ethics 17 (1998): 707–14.

________. My Job, My Self: Work and the Creation of the Modern
Individual. London: Routledge, 2012.

Gini, Al, and Terry Sullivan. “Work: The Process and the Person.”
Journal of Business Ethics 6 (1987): 649–55.

Ginsberg, Benjamin. The Fall of the Faculty. New York: Oxford University
Press, 2013.

Glenn, Joshua, and Mark Kingwell. The Wage Slave’s Glossary. Windsor,
Can.: Biblioasis, 2011.

Gorz, Andre. Farewell to the Working Class: An Essay on Post-industrial
Socialism. London: Pluto, 1997.

________. Critique of Economic Reason. London: Verso, 2010.

Graeber, David. “Manners, Deference, and Private Property.” Comparative
Studies in Society and History 39, no. 4 (1997): 694–728.

________. Debt: The First 5,000 Years. Brooklyn, NY: Melville House,
2011.

________. “Of Flying Cars and the Declining Rate of Profit.” Baffler,
no. 19 (Spring 2012): 66–84.

________. The Utopia of Rules: Technology, Stupidity, and the Secret
Joys of Bureaucracy. Brooklyn, NY: Melville House, 2015.

Gutman, Herbert G. “Protestantism and the American Labor Movement: The
Christian Spirit in the Gilded Age.” American Historical Review 72, no.1
(1966): 74–101.

Hajnal, John. “European Marriage Patterns in Perspective.” In Population
in History: Essays in Historical Demography, edited by D. V. Glass and
D. E. C. Eversley, 101–43. London: Edward Arnold, 1965.

________. “Two Kinds of Preindustrial Household Formation System.”
Population and Development Review 8, no. 3 (September 1982): 449–94.

Hanlon, Gerard. The Dark Side of Management: A Secret History of
Management Theory. London: Routledge, 2016.

Hardt, Michael, and Antonio Negri. Labor of Dionysus: A Critique of the
State Form. Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press, 1994.

________. Empire. Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 2000.

Hayes, Robert M. “A Simplified Model for the Fine Structure of National
Information Economies.” In Proceedings of NIT 1992: The Fifth
International Conference on New Information Technology, 175–94. W.
Newton, MA. MicroUse Information, 1992.

Hochschild, Arlie Russell. The Managed Heart: Commercialization of Human
Feeling. Berkeley: University of California Press, 2012.

Holloway, John. Crack Capitalism. London: Pluto Press, 2010.

Ignatiev, Noel. How the Irish Became White. New York: Routledge, 1995.

Kazin, Michael. The Populist Persuasion: An American History. New York:
Basic Books, 1995.

Keen, Steve. Debunking Economics: The Naked Emperor Dethroned? London:
Zed, 2011.

Klein, G. S. “The Vital Pleasures.” In Psychoanalytic Theory: An
Exploration of Essentials, edited by M. M. Gill and Leo Roseberger,
210–38. New York: International Universities Press, 1967.

Kraus, M .W., S. Côté, and D. Keltner. “Social Class, Contextualism, and
Empathic Accuracy.” Psychological Science 21, no. 11 (2010): 1716–23.

Kussmaul, Anne. Servants in Husbandry in Early-Modern England.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1981.

Laslett, Peter. “Characteristics of the Western Family Considered over
Time.” In Household and Family in Past Time, edited by P. Laslett and R.
Wall. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1972.

________. Family Life and Illicit Love in Earlier Generations.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1977.

________. “Family and Household as Work Group and Kin Group.” In Family
Forms in Historic Europe, edited by R. Wall. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press, 1983.

________. The World We Have Lost, Further Explored: England Before the
Industrial Revolution. New York: Charles Scribner’s Sons, 1984.

Lazerow, Jama. Religion and the Working Class in Antebellum America.
Washington, DC: Smithsonian Institution Press, 1995.

Lazzarato, Maurizio. “Immaterial Labor.” In Radical Thought in Italy,
edited by Paolo Virno and Michael Hardt, 133–47. Minneapolis: University
of Minnesota Press, 1996.

Le Goff, Jacques. Time, Work and Culture in the Middle Ages. Chicago:
University of Chicago Press, 1982.

Lockwood, Benjamin B., Charles G. Nathanson, and E. Glen Weyl, “Taxation
and the Allocation of Talent.” Journal of Political Economy 125, no. 5
(October 2017): 1635–82,
www.journals.uchicago.edu/doi/full/10.1086/693393.

Maier, Corinne. Bonjour Paresse: De l’art et la nécessité d’en faire le
moins possible en entreprise. Paris: Editions Michalan, 2004.

Mills, C. Wright. White Collar: The American Middle Classes. New York:
Galaxy Books, 1951.

Morse, Nancy, and Robert Weiss. “The Function and Meaning of Work and
the Job.” American Sociological Review 20, no. 2 (1966): 191–98.

Nietzsche, Friedrich. Dawn of the Day. 1911). New York: Macmillan, 1911.

Orr, Yancey, and Raymond Orr. “The Death of Socrates: Managerialism,
Metrics and Bureaucratization in Universities.” Australian Universities’
Review 58, no. 2 (2016): 15–25.

Pagels, Elaine. Adam, Eve and the Serpent. New York: Vintage Books,
1988.

Paulsen, Roland. Empty Labor: Idleness and Workplace Resistance.
Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2014.

Pessen, Edward. Most Uncommon Jacksonians: The Radical Leaders of the
Early Labor Movement. Albany, NY: SUNY Press, 1967.

Ray, Benjamin C. Myth, Ritual and Kingship in Buganda. London: Oxford
University Press, 1991.

Rediker, Marcus. The Slave Ship: A Human History. London: Penguin, 2004.

Reich, Robert. The Work of Nations: Preparing Ourselves for 21st Century
Capitalism. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1992.

Russell, Bertrand. In Praise of Idleness. London: Unwin Hyman, 1935.

Schmidt, Jeff. Disciplined Minds: A Critical Look at Salaried
Professionals and the Soul-Battering System That Shapes Their Lives.
London: Rowman & Littlefield, 2001.

Sennett, Richard. The Fall of Public Man. London: Penguin, 2003.

________. Respect: The Formation of Character in an Age of Inequality.
London: Penguin, 2004.

________. The Corrosion of Character: The Personal Consequences of Work
in the New Capitalism. New York: Norton, 2008.

________. The Craftsman. New York: Penguin, 2009.

Standing, Guy. The Precariat: The New Dangerous Class (Bloomsbury
Revelations). London: Bloomsbury Academic Press, 2016.

________. Basic Income: And How We Can Make It Happen. London: Pelican,
2017.

Starkey, David. “Representation Through Intimacy: A Study in the
Symbolism of Monarchy and Court Office in Early Modern England.” In
Symbols and Sentiments: Cross-Cultural Studies in Symbolism, edited by
Ioan Lewis, 187–224. London: Academic Press, 1977.

Stellar, Jennifer, Vida Manzo, Michael Kraus, and Dacher Keltner. “Class
and Compassion: Socioeconomic Factors Predict Responses to Suffering.”
Emotion 12, no. 3 (2011): 1–11.

Stone, Lawrence. The Family, Sex and Marriage in England, 1500–1800.
London: Weidenfeld and Nicolson, 1977.

Summers, John. The Politics of Truth: Selected Writings of C. Wright
Mills. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2008.

Tawney, R. H. Religion and the Rise of Capitalism. New York: Harcourt,
Brace & World, 1924.

Terkel, Studs. Working: People Talk About What They Do All Day and How
They Feel About What They Do. New York: New Press, 1972.

Thomas, Keith. Religion and the Decline of Magic. New York: Scribner
Press, 1971.

________. “Age and Authority in Early Modern England.” Proceedings of
the British Academy 62 (1976): 1–46.

________. The Oxford Book of Work. Oxford: Oxford University Press,
1999.

Thompson, E. P. The Making of the English Working Class. London: Victor
Gollancz, 1963.

________. “Time, Work-Discipline and Industrial Capitalism.” Past &
Present 38 (1967): 56–97.

Thompson, Paul. The Nature of Work: An Introduction to Debates on the
Labour Process. London: Macmillan, 1983.

Veltman, Andrea. Meaningful Work. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2016.

Wall, Richard. Family Forms in Historic Europe. Cambridge: Cambridge
University Press, 1983.

Weber, Max. The Protestant Ethic and the Spirit of Capitalism. London:
Unwin Press, 1930.

Weeks, Kathi. The Problem with Work: Feminism, Marxism, Antiwork
Politics, and Postwork Imaginaries. Durham, NC: Duke University Press,
2011.

Western, Mark, and Erik Olin Wright. “The Permeability of Class
Boundaries to Intergenerational Mobility Among Men in the United States,
Canada, Norway, and Sweden.” American Sociological Review 59, no. 4
(August 1994): 606–29.

White, R. “Motivation Reconsidered: The Concept of Competence.”
Psychological Review 66 (1959): 297–333.

Williams, Eric. Capitalism and Slavery. New York: Capricorn Books, 1966.

Wood, Ellen Meiksins. The Origins of Capitalism: A Longer View. London:
Verso, 2002.

[images]

Simon & Schuster

1230 Avenue of the Americas

New York, NY 10020

www.SimonandSchuster.com

Copyright © 2018 by David Graeber

Most names and many identifying characteristics have been changed.

All rights reserved, including the right to reproduce this book or
portions thereof in any form whatsoever. For information, address Simon
& Schuster Subsidiary Rights Department, 1230 Avenue of the Americas,
New York, NY 10020.

First Simon & Schuster hardcover edition May 2018

SIMON & SCHUSTER and colophon are registered trademarks of Simon &
Schuster, Inc.

For information about special discounts for bulk purchases, please
contact Simon & Schuster Special Sales at 1-866-506-1949 or
business@simonandschuster.com.

The Simon & Schuster Speakers Bureau can bring authors to your live
event. For more information or to book an event, contact the Simon &
Schuster Speakers Bureau at 1-866-248-3049 or visit our website at
www.simonspeakers.com.

Interior design by Carly Loman

Jacket design by David L Itman

Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data is available.

ISBN 978-1-5011-4331-1

ISBN 978-1-5011-4334-2 (ebook)
